5388
Cultural_anthropology
Cultural anthropology is a branch of anthropology focused on the study of  cultural variation among humans, collecting data about the impact of global economic and political processes on local cultural realities. Anthropologists use a variety of methods, including observation, interviews and surveys. Their research is often called fieldwork because it involves the anthropologist spending an extended period of time at the research location.OriginsOne of the earliest articulations of the anthropological meaning of the term culture came from Sir Edward Tylor who writes on the first page of his 1897 book: Culture, or civilization, taken in its broad, ethnographic sense, is that complex whole which includes knowledge, belief, art, morals, law, custom, and any other capabilities and habits acquired by man as a member of society.(Tylor,Edward. 1920 1871. Primitive Culture. New York: J.P. Putnams Sons.1.) The term civilization later gave way to definitions by Gordon Childe, with culture forming an umbrella term and civilization becoming a particular kind of culture.(Sherratt, Andrew V. Gordon Childe: Archaeology and Intellectual History, Past and Present, No. 125. (Nov., 1989), pp. 151185.)The anthropological concept of culture reflects in part a reaction against earlier Western discourses based on an opposition between culture and nature, according to which some human beings lived in a state of nature. Anthropologists have argued that culture is human nature, and that all people have a capacity to classify experiences, encode classifications symbolically (i.e. in language), and teach such abstractions to others.Since humans acquire culture through the learning processes of enculturation and socialization, people living in different places or different circumstances develop different cultures. Anthropologists have also pointed out that through culture people can adapt to their environment in non-genetic ways, so people living in different environments will often have different cultures. Much of anthropological theory has originated in an appreciation of and interest in the tension between the local (particular cultures) and the global (a universal human nature, or the web of connections between people in distinct places/circumstances).The rise of cultural anthropology occurred within the context of the late 19th century, when questions regarding which cultures were primitive and which were civilized occupied the minds of not only Marx and Freud, but many others. Colonialism and its processes increasingly brought European thinkers in contact, directly or indirectly with primitive others.(Rosaldo, Renato. Culture and Truth. 1993. Beach Press.) The relative status of various humans, some of whom had modern advanced technologies that included engines and telegraphs, while others lacked anything but face-to-face communication techniques and still lived a Paleolithic lifestyle, was of interest to the first generation of cultural anthropologists.Parallel with the rise of cultural anthropology in the United States, anthropology, in which sociality is the central concept and which focuses on the study of social statuses and roles, groups, institutions, and the relations among them, developed as an academic discipline in Britain. An umbrella term socio-cultural anthropology makes reference to both cultural and social anthropology traditions.(Campbell, D.T. (1983) The two distinct routes beyond kin selection to ultrasociality: Implicationsfor the Humanities and Social Sciences. In: The Nature of Prosocial Development: Theoriesand Strategies D. Bridgeman (ed.), pp. 11-39, Academic Press, New York)A brief historyModern cultural anthropology has its origins in, and developed in reaction to, 19th century ethnology, which involves the organized comparison of human societies. Scholars like E.B. Tylor and J.G. Frazer in England worked mostly with materials collected by others  usually missionaries, traders, explorers, or colonial officials  this earned them their current sobriquet of arm-chair anthropologists.Ethnologists had a special interest in why people living in different parts of the world often had similar beliefs and practices. In addressing this question, ethnologists in the 19th century divided into two schools of thought. Some, like Elliot Smith, argued that different groups must somehow have learned from one another, however indirectly; in other words, they argued that cultural traits spread from one place to another, or diffused.Other ethnologists argued that different groups had the capability of creating similar beliefs and practices independently. Some of those who advocated independent invention, like Henry Morgan, additionally supposed that similarities meant that different groups had passed through the same stages of evolution (See also social evolutionism). Morgan, in particular, acknowledged that certain forms of society and culture could not possibly have arisen before others. For example, industrial farming could not have been invented before simple farming, and metallurgy could not have developed without previous non-smelting processes involving metals (such as simple ground collection or mining). Morgan, like other 19th century social evolutionists, believed there was a more or less orderly progression from the primitive to the civilized.20th-century anthropologists largely reject the notion that all human societies must pass through the same stages in the same order, on the grounds that such a notion does not fit the empirical facts. Some 20th-century ethnologists, like Steward, have instead argued that such similarities reflected similar adaptations to similar environments (see evolution).Others, such as Lvi-Strauss (who was influenced both by American cultural anthropology and by French Durkheimian sociology), have argued that apparently similar patterns of development reflect fundamental similarities in the structure of human thought (see structuralism). By the mid-20th century, the number of examples of people skipping stages, such as going from hunter-gatherers to post-industrial service occupations in one generation, were so numerous that 19th-century evolutionism was effectively disproved.(Diamond, Jared. Guns, Germs and Steel.)In the 20th century, most cultural (and social) anthropologists turned to the crafting of ethnographies. An ethnography is a piece of writing about a people, at a particular place and time. Typically, the anthropologist lives among people in another society for a considerable period of time, simultaneously participating in and observing the social and cultural life of the group.Numerous other ethnographic techniques have resulted in ethnographic writing or details being preserved, as cultural anthropologists also curate materials, spend long hours in libraries, churches and schools poring over records, investigate graveyards, and decipher ancient scripts. A typical ethnography will also include information about physical geography, climate and habitat. It is meant to be a holistic piece of writing about the people in question, and today often includes the longest possible timeline of past events that the ethnographer can obtain through primary and secondary research.Malinowski (who conducted fieldwork in the Islands and taught in England) developed this method, and Boas (who conducted fieldwork in Island and taught in the States) promoted it. Boass students drew on his conception of culture and relativism to develop cultural anthropology in the United States. Simultaneously, Malinowski and A.R. Radcliffe Browns students were developing anthropology in the United Kingdom. Whereas cultural anthropology focused on symbols and values, social anthropology focused on social groups and institutions. Today socio-cultural anthropologists attend to all these elements.Although 19th-century ethnologists saw diffusion and independent invention as mutually exclusive and competing theories, most ethnographers quickly reached a consensus that both processes occur, and that both can plausibly account for cross-cultural similarities. But these ethnographers also pointed out the superficiality of many such similarities. They noted that even traits that spread through diffusion often were given different meanings and function from one society to another.Accordingly, these anthropologists showed less interest in comparing cultures, generalizing about human nature, or discovering universal laws of cultural development, than in understanding particular cultures in those cultures own terms. Such ethnographers and their students promoted the idea of relativism, the view that one can only understand another persons beliefs and behaviors in the context of the culture in which he or she lived or lives.In the early 20th century, socio-cultural anthropology developed in different forms in Europe and in the United States. European social anthropologists focused on observed social behaviors and on social structure, that is, on relationships among social roles (for example, husband and wife, or parent and child) and social institutions (for example, religion, economy, and politics).American cultural anthropologists focused on the ways people expressed their view of themselves and their world, especially in symbolic forms, such as art and myths. These two approaches frequently converged and generally complemented one another. For example, kinship and leadership function both as symbolic systems and as social institutions. Today almost all socio-cultural anthropologists refer to the work of both sets of predecessors, and have an equal interest in what people do and in what people say.Ethnography dominates socio-cultural anthropology. Nevertheless, many contemporary socio-cultural anthropologists have rejected earlier models of ethnography as treating local cultures as bounded and isolated. These anthropologists continue to concern themselves with the distinct ways people in different locales experience and understand their lives, but they often argue that one cannot understand these particular ways of life solely from a local perspective; they instead combine a focus on the local with an effort to grasp larger political, economic, and cultural frameworks that impact local lived realities. Notable proponents of this approach include Appadurai, Clifford, Marcus, Mintz, Taussig and Wolf.A growing trend in anthropological research and analysis is the use of multi-sited ethnography, discussed in George Marcuss article, Ethnography In/Of the World System: the Emergence of Multi-Sited Ethnography. Looking at culture as embedded in macro-constructions of a global social order, multi-sited ethnography uses traditional methodology in various locations both spatially and temporally. Through this methodology, greater insight can be gained when examining the impact of world-systems on local and global communities.Also emerging in multi-sited ethnography are greater interdisciplinary approaches to fieldwork, bringing in methods from cultural studies, media studies, science and technology studies, and others. In multi-sited ethnography, research tracks a subject across spatial and temporal boundaries. For example, a multi-sited ethnography may follow a thing, such as a particular commodity, as it is transported through the networks of global capitalism.Multi-sited ethnography may also follow ethnic groups in diaspora, stories or rumours that appear in multiple locations and in multiple time periods, metaphors that appear in multiple ethnographic locations, or the biographies of individual people or groups as they move through space and time. It may also follow conflicts that transcend boundaries. An example of multi-sited ethnography is Scheper-Hughess work on the international black market for the trade of human organs. In this research, she follows organs as they are transferred through various legal and illegal networks of capitalism, as well as the rumours and urban legends that circulate in impoverished communities about child kidnapping and organ theft.Sociocultural anthropologists have increasingly turned their investigative eye on to Western culture. For example, Bourgois won the Mead Award in 1997 for In Search of Respect, a study of the entrepreneurs in a Harlem crack-den. Also growing more popular are ethnographies of professional communities, such as laboratory researchers, Street investors, law firms, or technology (IT) computer employees.( Dissertation Abstract)Related topics* of art* of media* of religion* anthropology* Communitas* studies* anthropology* anthropology* inheritance theory* anthropology* anthropology* anthropology* Ethnobotany* Ethnography* Ethnomusicology* Ethnozoology* anthropology* anthropology* behavioral ecology* anthropology* anthropology* anthropology* anthropology* anthropology* psychology* psychology* anthropology* anthropology* anthropology* anthropologySee also* hypothesis* studies* inheritance theory* Gellner* behavioral ecology* Hunter-gatherers* Cultural Heritage* Neuroanthropology* Nomads* Sociology* anthropology* society vs societyReferencesExternal links* Webpage History of German Anthropology/Ethnology 1945/49-1990* The Moving Anthropology Student Network-website - The site offers tutorials, information on the subject, discussion-forums and a large link-collection for all interested scholars of cultural anthropology* Review of Nettls 2005 revised edition of The Study of Ethnomusicology tembiapoguiguaantropologijaculturala sociln antropologiede:Kulturanthropologieet:Kultuuriantropoloogiasocialantropologioculturellefy:Folkekundeculturlbudayais:Flagsmannfriculturaleantropologijaantropologieantropolgiaantropologieja:kulturowacultural  antropolgiafi:Kulttuuriantropologiath:antropolojifiu-vro:Kultuuriantropoloogiazh:
5399
Colorado
Colorado (pronounced  or, )() is a state that encompasses much of the Mountains as well as the northeastern portion of the Plateau and the western edge of the Plains. Colorado is part of the United States and the States.The state was named for the River, which early Spanish explorers named the Ro Colorado for the red colored () silt the river carried from the mountains. On August 1, 1876, U.S. President Ulysses S. Grant signed a proclamation admitting Colorado as the 38th state.  Colorado is nicknamed the Centennial State because it was admitted to the Union as the 38th state in 1876, the centennial year of the States Declaration of Independence.Colorado is bordered by the northwest state of Wyoming to the north, the midwest states of Nebraska and Kansas to the northeast and east, on the south by Mexico and a small portion of the southern state of Oklahoma, and on the west by Utah. The four states of Colorado, Mexico, Arizona, and Utah meet at one common point known as the Corners, which is known as the heart of the American Southwest. Colorado is one of only three U.S. states with no natural borders, the others being neighboring Wyoming and Utah.Colorado is noted for its vivid landscape of mountains, forests, high plains, mesas, canyons, plateaus, rivers, and desert lands. The United States Census tallied the state population at 5,029,196 as of April 1, 2010, an increase of 16.92% since the United States Census. Denver is the capital and the most populous city of Colorado. Residents of the state are properly known as Coloradans, although the archaic term Coloradoan is still used.(Writers Style Guide, Colorado State University. Retrieved January 19, 2009.)() Geography The borders of Colorado were originally defined to be lines of latitude and longitude, making its shape a latitude-longitude* quadrangle() which stretches from 37N to 41N latitude and from 10203W to 10903W longitude (25W to 32W from the Meridian).( Colorado, Wyoming and Utah are the only states which have boundaries defined solely by lines of latitude and longitude. When placing the border markers for the of Colorado, minor surveying errors resulted in several nearly imperceptible kinks, most notably along the border with the of Utah. Once agreed upon by the federal, state, and territorial governments, those surveyors benchmarks, became the legal boundaries for the Colorado Territory, kinks and all.()File:Tenmile Fletcher Group.jpg|thumb|left|Range near ColoradoThe summit of Elbert at  in elevation in Lake County is the highest point of Colorado and the Rocky Mountains.() Colorado is the only U.S. state that lies entirely above  elevation. The point where the River flows out of County, Colorado, and into County, Kansas, is the lowest point in Colorado at  elevation. This point holds the distinction of being the highest low elevation point of any state.()()File:6601-RedRocksTheater.JPG|thumb|Rocks Amphitheatre, west of Denver, where the Plains meet the Rockies.A little over one fourth of the area of Colorado is flat and rolling land. East of the Rocky Mountains are the Eastern Plains of the High Plains, the section of the Great Plains within Colorado at elevations ranging from roughly . The midwest plains states of Kansas and Nebraska border Colorado to the east and northeast. The Colorado plains are usually thought of as prairies, but actually they have many patches of forests, buttes, and canyons, much like the high plains in New Mexico as well. Eastern Colorado is presently mainly covered in farmland, along with small farming villages and towns. Precipitation is fair, averaging from  annually.() The summers in the plains are normally hot and dry, while the winters are often quite cold, snowy, and icy. Corn, wheat, hay, soybeans, and oats are all typical crops, and most of the villages and towns in this region boast both a tower and a elevator. As well as the farming of crops, Eastern Colorado has a good deal of livestock raising, such as at cattle ranches and hog farms and irrigation water is available from the South Platte, the Arkansas River, and a few other streams, and also from subterranean sources, including wells. However, heavy use of ground water from wells for irrigation has caused underground water reserves to decline.File:ChicoClosedBasin.jpg|thumb|The high desert terrain of the Luis Valley in southern Colorado.Most of Colorados population resides along the eastern edge of the Rocky Mountains in the Range Urban Corridor between Wyoming, and Colorado. This region is partially protected from prevailing storms that blow in from the Pacific Ocean region by the high Rockies in the middle of Colorado. The only other significant population centers are at Grand Junction and Durango in far western Colorado.File:LovelandPass CMM.jpg|thumb|left|upright|The Divide dips down to  at Pass.To the west of Great Plains of Colorado rises the eastern slope of the Rocky Mountains. Notable peaks of the Rocky Mountains include Peak, Evans, Peak, and the Peaks near Walsenburg, in southern Colorado. This area drains to the east and the southeast, ultimately either via the River or the Grande into the of Mexico.The Divide extends along the crest of the Rocky Mountains. The area of Colorado to the west of the Continental Divide is called the Western Slope of Colorado. Drainage water west of the Continental Divide flows to the southwest via the Green River and the Colorado River into the of California.Within the interior of the Rocky Mountains are several large so-called parks or high broad basins. In the north, on the east side of the Continental Divide is the North Park of Colorado. The North Park is drained by the Platte River, which flows north into Wyoming and Nebraska. Just to the south of North Park, but on the western side of the Continental Divide, is the Middle Park of Colorado, which is drained by the Colorado River. The South Park of Colorado is the region of the headwaters of the South Platte River.In southmost Colorado is the large Luis Valley, where the headwaters of the Grande are located. The valley sits between the De Cristo Mountains and Juan Mountains, and consists of large desert lands that eventually run into the mountains. The Rio Grande drains due south into New Mexico, Mexico, and Texas. Across the de Cristo Range to the east of the San Luis Valley lies the Mountain Valley. These basins, particularly the San Luis Valley, lie along the Grande Rift, a major formation of the Rocky Mountains, and its branches.The Rocky Mountains within Colorado contain about 54 peaks that are  or higher in elevation above sea level, known as fourteeners.() These mountains are largely covered with trees such as conifers and aspens up to the line, at an elevation of about  in southern Colorado to about  in northern Colorado. Above this only alpine vegetation grows. Only small parts of the Colorado Rockies are snow-covered year round. Much of the alpine snow melts by mid-August with the exception of a few snowcapped peaks and a few small glaciers. The Mineral Belt, stretching from the Juan Mountains in the southwest to Boulder and Central City on the front range, contains most of the historic gold- and silver-mining districts of Colorado.File:Mount Elbert2.JPG|thumb|Elbert, the tallest peak in the Mountains.The 30 highest major summits of the Mountains of America all lie within the state. Colorado is home to four national parks, six national monuments, two national recreation areas, two national historic sites, three national historic trails, a national scenic trail, 11 national forests, two national grasslands, 41 national wilderness areas, two national conservation areas, eight national wildlife refuges, 44 state parks, a state forest, 323 state wildlife areas, and numerous other scenic, historic, and recreational attractions.The Western Slope of Colorado is drained by the Colorado River and its tributaries (primarily the Green River and the San Juan River), or by evaporation in its arid areas. Prominent in the southwestern area of the Western Slope are the high San Juan Mountains, a rugged mountain range, and to the west of the San Juan Mountains, the Plateau, a high arid region that borders Southern Utah. The city of Junction, Colorado, is the largest city on the Western Slope, Grand Junction and Durango are the only major centers of radio and broadcasting, newspapers, and higher education on the Western Slope. The State College in Grand Junction, Western State College in Gunnison, and Fort Lewis College in Durango are the only four-year colleges in Colorado west of the Divide.Grand Junction is located along Interstate 70, the only major highway of Western Colorado. Grand Junction is also along the major railroad of the Western Slope, the Pacific, which also provides the tracks for Amtraks Zephyr passenger train, which crosses the Rocky Mountains between Denver and Grand Junction via a route on which there are no continuous highways.To the southeast of Grand Junction is the Mesa, said to be the worlds largest flat-topped mountain. Other towns of the Western Slope include Glenwood Springs with its resort hot springs, and the resorts of Aspen, Breckenridge, Vail, Crested Butte, Steamboat Springs, and Telluride.File:Grand Mesa and Mt. Garfield.jpg|thumb|Mesa, the largest mesa in the world.The northwestern corner of Colorado is a sparsely-populated region, and it contains part of the noted National Monument, which is not only a paleontological area, but is also a scenic area of high, rocky hills, canyons, and streambeads. Here, the Green River briefly crosses over into Colorado.From west to east, the land of Colorado consists of desert lands and desert plateaus, then alpine mountains with National Forests, then some scattered desert land in the southern mountain areas in the state, and then the relatively-flat grasslands and scattered forests of the Plains. The famous Peak is located just west of Colorado Springs. Its isolated peak is visible from nearly the Kansas border on clear days, and also far to the north and the south.() The desert lands in Colorado are located in and around areas such as, the Gorge, Pueblo, Canon City, Florence, Sand Dunes National Park and Preserve, Luis Valley, Cortez, of the Ancients National Monument, National Monument, Mountain, Delta, Grand Junction, National Monument, Plateau, and other areas surrounding the Plateau and National Forest.File:DNM Morrison.jpg|thumb|National Monument.Colorado is one of four states in the United States that share a common geographic point the Corners, together with Arizona, New Mexico, and Utah. At this intersection, it is possible to stand in four states at once. Climate File:Bearlakeinspring2.jpg|thumb|Spring melt at Bear Lake in Mountain National Park.The climate of Colorado is quite complex compared to most of the United States. Unlike in other states, southern Colorado is not necessarily warmer than northern Colorado. Most of Colorado is made up of mountains, foothills, high plains, and desert lands. Mountains and surrounding valleys greatly affect local climate. As a general rule, with an increase in elevation comes a decrease in temperature and an increase in precipitation. Northeast, east, and southeast Colorado are mostly the high plains, while Northern Colorado is a mix of high plains, foothills, and mountains. Northwest and west Colorado are predominantly mountainous, with some desert lands mixed in. Southwest and southern Colorado are a complex mixture of desert and mountain areas. Eastern Plains File:PivotWithDrops.JPG|thumb|pivot irrigation of wheat growing in Yuma County.The climate of the Eastern Plains is semi-arid (climate classification BSk) with low humidity and moderate precipitation, usually from  annually. The area is known for its abundant sunshine and cool clear nights, which give this area a great average diurnal temperature range. In summer, this area can have many days above  and sometimes ,(DRI.edu Western Regional Climate Center. Retrieved October 24, 2006.) although  is the maximum in the front range cities above . In the plains, the winter extremes can be from 0 F (-18 C) to  and . About 75% of the precipitation falls within the growing season, from April to September, but this area is very prone to droughts. Most of the precipitation comes from thunderstorms, which are often severe, and from major snowstorms that occur most often in the early spring, late autumn, and sometimes winter. Otherwise, winters tend to be mostly dry and cold. In much of the region, March and April are the snowiest months. April and May are normally the rainiest months, while April is the wettest month overall. The Front Range cities closer to the mountains tend to be warmer in the winter due to winds which warm the area, sometimes bringing temperatures of  or higher in the winter.( The average July temperature is  in the morning and close to  in the afternoon. The average January temperature is  in the morning and  in the afternoon, although variation between consecutive days can be 40 F (22 C). West of the plains and foothills of the Western Slope from Grand Junction.West of the plains and foothills, the weather of Colorado is much less uniform. Even places a few miles apart can experience entirely different weather depending on the topography of the area. Most valleys have a semi-arid climate, which becomes an climate at higher elevations. Humid microclimates also exist in some areas. Generally, the wettest season in western Colorado is winter while June is the driest month. This is the opposite of precipitation patterns in the east. The mountains have cool summers with many days of high temperatures around  to , although frequent thunderstorms can cause sudden drops in temperature. Summer nights are cool or even cold at the highest elevations, which sometimes get snow even in the middle of the summer. The winters bring abundant, powdery snowfall to the mountains with plenty of sunshine in between major storms. The western slope has high summer temperatures similar to those found on the plains, while the winters tend to be slightly cooler due to the lack of warming winds common to the plains and Front Range. Other areas in the west have their own unique climate. Extreme weather Extreme weather is a common occurrence in Colorado. Thunderstorms are common east of the Continental divide in the spring and summer, and Colorado is one of the leading states in deaths due to lightning. Hail is a common sight in the mountains east of the divide and in the northwest part of the state. The Eastern Plains have some of the biggest hail storms in North America.( Also the Eastern Plains are part of Alley and produce some of the deadliest U.S. tornadoes. Some damaging tornadoes in the Eastern Plains include the 1990 Limon F3 tornado and the 2008 Windsor EF3 tornado, which devastated the town.()The plains are also susceptible to floods, which are caused both by thunderstorms and by the rapid melting of snow in the mountains during warm weather. Denvers record in 1921 for the number of consecutive days above  was broken during the summer of 2008. The new record of 24 consecutive days surpassed the previous record by almost a week.() Much of Colorado is a relatively dry state averaging only  of rain per year statewide and rarely experiences a time when some portion of the state is not in some degree of drought.() The lack of precipitation contributes to the severity of wildfires in the state such as the Fire, one of the largest wildfires in American history, and the Fourmile Canyon Fire of 2010, the most destructive wildfire in Colorados recorded history.However, there are some of the mountainous regions of Colorado which receive a huge amount of moisture via winter snowfalls. The spring melts of these snows often cause great waterflows in such rivers as the River, the Grand River, the Colorado River, the Rio Grande, the Arkansas River, Cherry Creek, the North Platte River, and the South Platte River. Water flowing out of the Colorado Rocky Mountains is a very significant source of water for the farms, towns, and cities of fellow southwest states of New Mexico, Arizona, Utah, Nevada, as well as midwest like Nebraska and Kansas, and also southern states like Oklahoma and Texas. A significant amount of water is also diverted for use in California; occasionally (formerly naturally and consistently) the flow of water reaches northern Mexico. Records The highest temperature  recorded in Colorado was  on July 11, 1888, at Bennett, whereas the lowest was  on February 1, 1985, at Maybell.()()EarthquakesOn August 22, 2011, a 5.3 magnitude earthquake occurred nine miles WSW of the city of Trinidad.(http://earthquake.usgs.gov/earthquakes/recenteqsus/Maps/US2/36.38.-106.-104.php) No casualties and only small damage was reported. It was the second largest earthquake in Colorado since a magnitude 5.7 earthquake was recorded in 1973.() History File:Mesa-Verde---Cliff-Palace-in 1891 - edit1.jpg|thumb|The ruins of the Palace at Mesa Verde as photographed by Nordenskild in 1891.The region that is today the state of Colorado has been inhabited by Native Americans for more than 13 millennia. The Site in Larimer County contains artifacts dating from approximately 11200 BCE to 3000 BCE. The eastern edge of the Mountains was a major migration route that was important to the spread of early peoples throughout the Americas. The Pueblo Peoples lived in the valleys and mesas of the Plateau.(Genocide Wiped Out Native American Population , Discovery News, September 20, 2010.) The Nation inhabited the mountain valleys of the Rocky Mountains and the Rocky Mountains. The Nation and the Nation moved west to hunt across the High Plains.The United States acquired a territorial claim to the eastern flank of the Rocky Mountains with the Purchase from France in 1803. This U.S. claim conflicted with the claim of Spain to a huge region surrounding its colony of F de Nuevo Mjico as its sovereign trading zone with native peoples. Pike led a U.S. Army reconnaissance expedition into the disputed region in 1806. Colonel Pike and his men were arrested by Spanish cavalrymen in the Luis Valley the following February, taken to Chihuahua, and then expelled from Mexico the following July.File:Beol court25.jpg|thumb|Old Fort along the River operated from 1833 to 1849.The United States relinquished its claim to all land south and west of the River and south of parallel north and west of the meridian west as part of its purchase of Florida from Spain with the Treaty of 1819. The treaty took effect February 22, 1821. Having settled its border with Spain, the United States admitted the southeastern portion of the of Missouri to the Union as the of Missouri on August 10, 1821. The remainder of the Territory, including what would become northeastern Colorado, became unorganized territory, and would remain so for 33 years over the question of slavery. After 11 years of war, Spain finally recognized the independence of Mexico with the of Crdoba signed on August 24, 1821. Mexico eventually ratified the Adams-Ons Treaty in 1831. The Revolt of 18351836 fomented a dispute between the United States and Mexico which eventually erupted into the War in 1846. Mexico surrendered its northern territory to the United States with the of Guadalupe Hidalgo at the conclusion of the war in 1848.Most American settlers traveling overland west to the Country, the new goldfields of California, or the new Mormon settlements of Deseret in the Lake Valley, avoided the rugged Rocky Mountains, and instead followed the Platte River and Sweetwater River to Pass, the lowest crossing of the Divide between the Southern Rocky Mountains and the Central Rocky Mountains. In 1849, the Mormons of the Salt Lake Valley organized the extralegal of Deseret, claiming the entire Basin and all lands drained by the Green, Grand, and Colorado rivers. The federal government of the United States flatly refused to recognize the new Mormon government, because it was theocratic and sanctioned plural marriage. Instead, the of 1850 divided the Cession and the northwestern claims of Texas into a new state and two new territories, the of California, the of New Mexico, and the of Utah. On April 9, 1851, American settlers from the area of Taos settled the village of San Luis, then in the Mexico Territory, later to become Colorados first permanent Euro-American settlement.File:Wpdms kansas nebraska utah territories 1860 idx.png|thumb|The territories of New Mexico, Utah, Kansas, and Nebraska before the creation of the of Colorado.In 1854, Senator A. Douglas persuaded the Congress to divide the unorganized territory east of the Divide into two new organized territories, the of Kansas and the of Nebraska, and an unorganized southern region known as the territory. Each new territory was to decide the fate of slavery within its boundaries, but this compromise merely served to fuel animosity between soil and pro-slavery factions.Gold was discovered along the Platte River then in western Territory in July 1858, precipitating the Peak Gold Rush.() The placer gold deposits along the rivers and streams of the region rapidly played out, but prospectors soon discovered far more valuable seams of hard rock gold in the nearby mountains.File:Denver 1859.jpg|thumb|A lithograph of the Denver City mining camp in 1859.The gold seekers organized the Provisional Government of the Territory of Jefferson on August 24, 1859, but this new territory failed to secure approval from the of the United States embroiled in the debate over slavery. The election of Lincoln for the President of the United States on November 6, 1860, led to the secession of nine southern states and the threat of civil war among the states. Seeking to augment the political power of the Union states, the Republican Party dominated Congress quickly admitted the eastern portion of the of Kansas into the Union as the free State of Kansas on January 29, 1861, leaving the western portion of the Kansas Territory, and its gold-mining areas, as unorganized territory.Thirty days later on February 28, 1861, outgoing U.S. President Buchanan signed an Act of Congress organizing the free of Colorado.() The original boundaries of Colorado remain unchanged today. The name Colorado was chosen because it was commonly believed that the River originated in the territory.(Early explorers identified the River in Colorado as the headwaters of the Colorado River. The Grand River in Colorado was later tentively identified as the primary headwaters of the river. Finally in 1916, LaRue, the Chief Hydrologist of the States Geological Survey, identified the Green River in southwestern Wyoming as the proper headwaters of the actual, overall  Colorado River.) In 1776, Spanish priest Vlez de Escalante recorded that Native Americans in the area knew the river as el Rio Colorado for the red-brown silt that the river carried from the mountains.() In 1859, a Army topographic expedition led by Captain John Macomb located the confluence of the Green River with the Grand River in what is now National Park in Utah.(Report of the exploring expedition from Santa F, New Mexico, to the junction of the Grand and Green Rivers of the great Colorado of the West, in 1859: under the command of Capt. J. N. Macomb, Corps of topographical engineers, Volume 1 @ archive.org) The Macomb party designated the confluence as the source of the Colorado River. File:The-Battle-of-Glorieta-Pass.jpg|thumb|left|The of Glorieta Pass, 1862On April 12, 1861, Carolina artillery opened fire on Sumter to start the Civil War. While many gold seekers held sympathies for the Confederacy, the vast majority remained fiercely loyal to the Union cause. In 1862, a force of Texas cavalry invaded the of New Mexico and captured Santa Fe on March 10. The object of this Western Campaign was to seize or disrupt the gold fields of Colorado and California and to seize ports on the Pacific Ocean for the Confederacy. A hastily organized force of Colorado volunteers force-marched from City, Colorado Territory, to Pass, New Mexico Territory, in an attempt to block the Texans. On March 28, the Coloradans and local New Mexico volunteers stopped the Texans at the of Glorieta Pass, destroyed their cannon and supply wagons, and ran off 500 head of their horses and mules. The Texans were forced to retreat to Santa Fe. Having lost the supplies for their campaign and finding little support in New Mexico, the Texans abandoned Santa Fe and returned to Antonio in defeat. The Confederacy made no further attempts to seize the United States.In 1864, Territorial Governor John Evans appointed the Reverend Chivington as Colonel of the Colorado Volunteers with orders to protect white settlers from Cheyenne and Arapaho warriors who were accused of stealing cattle. Colonel Chivington ordered his men to attack a band of Cheyenne and Arapaho encamped along Sand Creek. Chivington reported that his troops killed more than 500 warriors. The militia returned to Denver City in triumph, but several officers reported that the so called battle was a blatant massacre of Indians at peace, that most of the dead were women and children, and that bodies of the dead had been mutilated and desecrated in hideous manner. Three U.S. Army inquiries condemned the action, and incoming President Johnson asked Governor Evans for his resignation, but none of the perpetrators was ever punished.File:Mount of the Holy Cross.jpeg|thumb|left|of the Holy Cross was photographed by Henry Jackson in 1874In the midst and aftermath of Civil War, many discouraged prospectors returned to their homes, but a determined few stayed on to develop mines, mills, farms, ranches, roads, and towns in the Territory. On September 14, 1864, James Huff discovered silver near Pass, the first of many silver strikes. In 1867, the Pacific Railroad laid its tracks west to Weir, now Julesburg, in the northeast corner of the Territory. The Union Pacific linked up with the Pacific Railroad at Summit, Utah, on May 10, 1869, to form the Transcontinental Railroad. The Pacific Railway reached Denver in June of the following year, and the Pacific arrived two months later to forge the second line across the continent. In 1872, rich veins of silver were discovered in the Juan Mountains on the Ute Indian reservation in southwestern Colorado. The Ute people were removed from the San Juans the following year.The States Congress passed an enabling act on March 3, 1875, specifying the requirements for the of Colorado to become a state.() On August 1, 1876 (28 days after the of the United States), U.S. President S. Grant signed a proclamation admitting Colorado to the Union as the 38th state and earning it the moniker Centennial State.()File:Georgetown loop 1899.jpg|thumb|The Loop of the Central Railroad as photographed by Henry Jackson in 1899The discovery of a major silver lode near Leadville in 1878, triggered the Silver Boom. The Silver Purchase Act of 1890 invigorated silver mining, and Colorados last, but greatest, gold strike at Cripple Creek a few months later lured a new generation of gold seekers. Colorado women were granted the right to vote beginning on November 7, 1893, making Colorado the second state to grant suffrage and the first one by a vote (of Colorado men). The repeal of the Sherman Silver Purchase Act in 1893 led to a staggering collapse of the mining and agricultural economy of Colorado, but the state slowly and steadily recovered.Colorado became the first western state to host a major political convention when the Democratic Party met in Denver in 1908. By the U.S. Census in 1930, the population of Colorado first exceeded one million residents. Colorado suffered greatly through the Depression and the Bowl of the 1930s, but a major wave of immigration following World War II boosted Colorados fortune. Tourism became a mainstay of the state economy, and technology became an important economic engine. The States Census Bureau estimated that the population of Colorado exceeded five million in 2009.Three warships of the Navy have been named the USS Colorado. The first USS Colorado was named for the Colorado River. The later two ships were named in honor of the state, including the battleship USS Colorado which served in World War II in the Pacific beginning in 1941. At the time of the on Pearl Harbor, this USS Colorado was located at the naval base in San Diego, Calif. and hence went unscathed. Demographics footnote  Sources: 1910-2010()Colorados most populous city, and capital, is Denver. The Combined Statistical Area with an estimated 2009 population of 3,110,436, is home to 61.90% of the states residents.As of 2005, Colorado has an estimated population of 4,665,177, which is an increase of 63,356, or 1.4%, from the prior year and an increase of 363,162, or 8.4%, since the year 2000. This includes a natural increase since the last census of 205,321 people (that is 353,091 births minus 147,770 deaths) and an increase due to net migration of 159,957 people into the state. Immigration from outside the United States resulted in a net increase of 112,217 people, and migration within the country produced a net increase of 47,740 people.The largest increases are expected in the Range Urban Corridor, especially in the metropolitan area. The states fastest-growing counties are Douglas and Weld.() The of population of Colorado is located just north of the village of Critchell in Jefferson County.()Colorado has a high proportion of Hispanic, mostly Mexican-American, citizens in Metropolitan Denver, Colorado Springs, as well as the smaller cities of Greeley and Pueblo, and in many other smaller cities and towns all throughout the state. Colorado is well known for its strong Latino culture and presence. Southern, Southwestern, and Southeastern Colorado has a large number of Hispanos, the descendants of the early Mexican settlers of colonial Spanish origin. The United States Census found that 10.5% of people aged five and over in Colorado speak only Spanish at home, with the 2009 estimate being roughly 14%. Colorado also has a large immigration presence all throughout the state, which has led to Colorado cities being referred to as Sanctuary Cities for illegal immigrants as well. Colorado has the 5th highest percentage of undocumented people in the U.S., only behind Nevada, Arizona, California, and tied with Texas. An estimated 5.5-6.0% of the states population is composed of illegal immigrants. Also, over 20% of the states prisoners are undocumented inmates.()() Colorado, like New Mexico, is very rich in archaic Spanish idioms.()Colorado also has some African-American communities located in Denver, in the neighborhoods of Montbello, Green Valley Ranch, Park Hill, Five Points, Whittier, and many other East Denver areas. A decent amount of African Americans are also found in Colorado Springs on the east and southeast side of the city. The state has sizable numbers of Asian-Americans of Mongolian, Chinese, Filipino, Korean, Asian and Japanese descent. The highest population of Asian Americans can be found on the south and southeast side of Denver, as well as some on Denvers southwest side. The Denver metropolitan area is considered more liberal and diverse than much of the state when it comes to political issues and environmental concerns.According to the 2000 Census, the largest ancestry groups in Colorado are German (22%) including of Swiss and Austrian nationalities, Mexican (18%), Irish (12%), and English (12%). Persons reporting German ancestry are especially numerous in the Front Range, the Rockies (west-central counties) and Eastern parts/High Plains.() Denver, as well as all of Colorado, have numerous amount of predominately Latino neighborhoods and communities. Also, Denver and nearby areas on the Front Range has sizable German, Scandinavian, Italian, Slavic and Jewish American communities, partly a legacy of rushes in the late 19th century (18611889).According to the U.S. Census, Colorado had a population of 5,029,196. In terms of race and ethnicity, the state was 81.3% White (70.0% Non-Hispanic White Alone), 4.0% Black or African American, 1.1% American Indian and Alaska Native, 2.8% Asian, 0.1% Native Hawaiian and Other Pacific Islander, 7.2% from Some Other Race, and 3.4% from Two or More Races. Hispanics and Latinos of any race made up 20.7% of the population.(http://factfinder2.census.gov/faces/tableservices/jsf/pages/productview.xhtml?pidDEC_10_DP_DPDP1&prodTypetable)There were a total of 70,331 births in Colorado in 2006. (Birth Rate of 14.6). In 2007, non-Hispanic whites were involved in 59.1% of all the births.() Some 14.06% of those births involved a non-Hispanic white person and someone of a different race, most often with a couple including one Hispanic. A birth where at least one Hispanic person was involved counted for 43% of the births in Colorado.(CDPHE.state.co.us, COHID Birth Data Request) As of the 2010 Census, Colorado has the seventh highest percentage of Hispanics (20.7%) in the U.S. behind Mexico (46.3%), California (37.6%), Texas (37.6%), Arizona (29.6%), Nevada (26.5%), and Florida (22.5%). Per the 2000 census, the Hispanic population is estimated to be 918,899 or approximately 20% of the state total population. Colorado has the 4th largest population of Mexican-Americans behind California, Texas, and Arizona. In percentages, Colorado has the 6th highest percentage of Mexican-Americans behind New Mexico, California, Texas, Arizona, and Nevada.(http://www.statemaster.com/state/CO-colorado/peo-people, Statemaster Colorado) Religion File:Colorado Rocky Mtn Church.jpg|thumb|The on the Rock at Camp Saint Malo near Allenspark.File:USAFA Chapel from terrazzo.JPG|thumb|The Cadet Chapel at the States Air Force Academy near Colorado Springs.Major religious affiliations of the people of Colorado are:()* Christian  64%** Protestant  44%*** Evangelical  23%*** Mainline  19%*** Other Protestant  2%** Roman Catholic  19%** Latter Day Saint / Mormon  2%** Orthodox  1%* Jewish  2%* Muslim  1%* Other Religions  5%* Unaffiliated  25%The largest denominations by number of adherents in 2000 were the Roman Catholic Church with 752,505; Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints with 92,326 (133,727 year-end 2007) ; and Baptist with 85,083.()At 25%, Colorado also has an above-average proportion of citizens who claim no religion. The U.S. average is 17%. Health Colorado also has a reputation for being a state of active and athletic people. According to several studies, Coloradans have the lowest rates of obesity of any state in the US.(http://calorielab.com/news/wp-images/post-images/fattest-states-2007-big.gif) As of 2007 the 18% of the population was considered medically obese, and while the lowest in the nation, the percentage had increased from 17% from 2004. Colorado Governor Bill Ritter commented: As an avid fisherman and bike rider, I know first-hand that Colorado provides a great environment for active, healthy lifestyles, although he highlighted the need for continued education and support to slow the growth of obesity in the state.() Culture File:ColoradoHistoryMuseum.jpg|thumb|History Museum in Denver* of museums in Colorado Fine arts * of Colorado* in Colorado Cuisine Colorado is known for its Southwest and Mountain cuisine. Mexican restaurants are throughout the state.Colorado was named Americas Foodiest Town 2010 by Apptit.() Boulder, and Colorado in general, is home to a number of national food and beverage companies, top-tier restaurants and farmers markets. Colorado also has more Master Sommeliers per capita than any other city, including San Francisco and New York.()The & Wine Classic held annually each June in Colorado. Aspen also has a reputation as the culinary capital of the Rocky Mountain region.()Colorado is known for steak, but now has a diverse culinary scene with many top-tier restaurants.() Wine wines include award-winning varietals that have attracted favorable notice from outside the state.() With wines made from traditional vinifera grapes along with wines made from cherries, peaches, plums and honey, Colorado wines have won top national and international awards for their quality.() Colorados grape growing regions contain the highest elevation vineyards in the United States,() with most viticulture in the state practiced between  and  feet sea level. The mountain climate ensures warm summer days and cool nights. Colorado is home to two designated Viticultural Areas of the Valley AVA and the Elks AVA,(http://www.ttb.gov/appellation/us_by_ava.pdf) where most of the vineyards in the state are located. However, an increasing number of wineries are located along the Range.() Economy File:Denver CO DT WTC AMH 322.JPG|thumb|upright|right|World Trade Center.The Denver financial district along 17th Street is known as the Wall Street of the West.CNBCs list of Top States for Business for 2010 has recognized Colorado as the third best state in the nation, falling short to only Texas and Virginia.(Americas Top States for Business 2010. CNBC Special Report (2010): 1. Web. 9 May 2011. .)production in Colorado.jpg|thumb|upright|right|Corn growing in Larimer CountyFile:DSCN2549 beevesnearwalden 600.jpg|thumb|upright|right|ranching in Jackson CountyFile:Grand Junction Trip 92007 131.JPG|thumb|upright|right|An well in western ColoradoThe of Economic Analysis estimates that the total state product in 2010 was $257.6 billion.()  Per capita personal income in 2010 was $51 940, ranking Colorado 11th in the nation.() The states economy broadened from its mid-19th century roots in mining when irrigated agriculture developed, and by the late 19th century, raising livestock had become important. Early industry was based on the extraction and processing of minerals and agricultural products. Current agricultural products are cattle, wheat, products, corn, and hay.The federal government is also a major economic force in the state with many important federal facilities including NORAD, States Air Force Academy and Air Force Base in Springs; NOAA and the Institute of Standards and Technology in Boulder; Geological Survey and other government agencies at the Denver Federal Center in Lakewood; the Mint, Air Force Base, and 10th Circuit Court of Appeals in Denver; and a federal Supermax Prison and other federal prisons near Caon City. In addition to these and other federal agencies, Colorado has abundant National Forest land and four National Parks that contribute to federal ownership of  of land in Colorado, or 37% of the total area of the state.( Colorado Department of Agriculture: Land Ownership)In the second half of the 20th century, the industrial and service sectors have expanded greatly. The states economy is diversified and is notable for its concentration of scientific research and high-technology industries. Other industries include processing, transportation equipment, machinery, chemical products, the extraction of metals such as gold (see mining in Colorado), silver, and molybdenum. Colorado now also has the largest annual production of beer of any state.() Denver is an important financial center.A number of nationally known brand names have originated in Colorado factories and laboratories. From Denver came the forerunner of telecommunications giant Qwest in 1879, Samsonite luggage in 1910, Gates belts and hoses in 1911, and Stover Candies in 1923. Kuner canned vegetables began in Brighton in 1864. From Golden came Coors beer in 1873, CoorsTek industrial ceramics in 1920, and Rancher candy in 1949. CF&I railroad rails, wire, nails and pipe debuted in Pueblo in 1892. Holly Sugar was first milled from beets in Holly in 1905, and later moved its headquarters to Colorado Springs. The present-day Swift packed meat of Greeley evolved from Monfort of Colorado, Inc., established in 1930. Estes model rockets were launched in Penrose in 1958. Fort Collins has been the home of Governor Companys motor controllers (governors) since 1870, and Waterpik dental water jets and showerheads since 1962. Seasonings herbal teas have been made in Boulder since 1969. Mountain Chocolate Factory made its first candy in Durango in 1981.Colorado has a flat 4.63% tax, regardless of income level. Unlike most states, which calculate taxes based on federal adjusted gross income, Colorado taxes are based on taxable income  income after federal exemptions and federal itemized (or standard) deductions.(Colorado individual income tax return (2005) Revenue.state.co.us. Retrieved September 26, 2006.)(U.S. Individual Income Tax Return (2005) online copy. Retrieved September 26, 2006.) Colorados state tax is 2.9% on retail sales. When state revenues exceed state constitutional limits, full-year Colorado residents can claim a sales tax refund on their individual state income tax return. Many counties and cities charge their own rates in addition to the base state rate. There are also certain county and special district taxes that may apply.estate and personal business property are taxable in Colorado. The states senior property tax exemption was temporarily suspended by the Colorado Legislature in 2003. The tax break is scheduled to return for assessment year 2006, payable in 2007.As of September 2010, the states unemployment rate is 8.2%.(Bls.gov; Local Area Unemployment Statistics) Philanthropy Major philanthropic organizations based in Colorado, including the Fund, the Anschutz Family Foundation, the Family Foundation, the El Pomar Foundation and the Foundation, grant approximately $400 million(Coloradofunders.org) each year from approximately $7 billion(http://www.cof.org/files/Documents/Government/StateGiving/CO.pdf) of assets. Natural resources Colorado has significant hydrocarbon resources. According to the Information Administration, Colorado hosts seven of the Nations 100 largest gas fields and two of its 100 largest fields. Conventional and unconventional natural gas output from several Colorado basins typically account for more than 5 percent of annual U.S. natural gas production. Colorados shale deposits hold an estimated  of oil  nearly as much oil as the entire worlds proven oil reserves; the economic viability of the oil shale, however, has not been demonstrated.() Substantial deposits of bituminous, subbituminous, and lignite coal are found in the state. Kimberlite pipes have been found in Colorado; the Lake Diamond Mine operated for several years, recovering gem quality diamonds.Colorados high Rocky Mountain ridges and eastern plains offer power potential, and geologic activity in the mountain areas provides potential for power development. Much of the state is sunny and could produce power. Major rivers flowing from the Rocky Mountains offer hydroelectric power resources. Corn grown in the flat eastern part of the state offers potential resources for ethanol production. Transportation Colorado transportation system connects its cities, residents, and visitors through a diverse and well regulated modes. Highways and roads  Aviation File:Denver International Airport security.jpg|thumb|upright|International Airport Rail gobeirne.jpg|thumb|upright|Union Station in Denver. Mass transit *Denver and Colorado Springs are serviced by the FREX regional bus.*Fort Collins, Loveland, Berthoud, and Longmont are serviced by the FLEX regional bus.() Accidents In 2011, Colorado ranked among the five deadliest states for debris/littercaused vehicle accidents per total number of registered vehicles and population size. Figures derived from the Highway Traffic Safety Administration (NHTSA) show at least 16 persons in Colorado were killed each year in motor vehicle collisions with non-fixed objects, including debris, dumped litter, animals and their carcasses.In the States including Colorado, most civil aviation incidents are investigated by the Transportation Safety Board (NTSB), as well as the Bureau of Investigations (CBI). When investigating an aviation disaster, NTSB investigators piece together evidence from the crash and determine the likely cause or causes. Where as the CBI will also investigate if there is any involved criminal actions. Government and politics  State government File:Denver capital.jpg|thumb|left|The State Capitol in DenverJust like all the states, Colorados constitution provides for three branches of government: the legislative, the executive, and the judicial branches. The Governor heads the states executive branch. The Supreme Court is the highest judicial court in the state. The state legislative body is the General Assembly, which is made up of two houses, the House of Representatives and the Senate.The House has 65 members and the Senate has 35. Currently, the House is controlled by the Republican Party by a one vote majority and the Senate is controlled by the Democratic Party. The 2005 Colorado General Assembly was the first to be controlled by the Democrats in forty years. The incumbent governor is Democrat Hickenlooper.Most Coloradans are originally native to other states (nearly 60% according to the 2000 census),() and this is illustrated by the fact that the state did not have a native-born governor from 1975 (when David Vanderhoof left office) until 2007, when Bill Ritter took office; his election the previous year marked the first electoral victory for a native-born Coloradan in a gubernatorial race since 1958 (Vanderhoof had ascended from the Lieutenant Governorship when Arthur Love was given a position in Nixons administration in 1973).  State symbols  Federal politics Colorado is considered a state in both state and federal elections. Coloradans have elected 17 Democrats and 12 Republicans to the governorship in the last 100 years. In presidential politics, Colorado supported Democrats Clinton in 1992 and Obama in 2008, and supported Republicans Robert J. Dole in 1996 and W. Bush in 2000 and 2004. The presidential outcome in 2008 was the second closest to the national popular vote, after Virginia.()Colorado politics has the contrast of conservative cities such as Colorado Springs and liberal cities such as Boulder. Democrats are strongest in metropolitan Denver, the college towns of Fort Collins and Boulder, southern Colorado (including Pueblo), and a few western ski resort counties. The Republicans are strongest in the Eastern Plains, Colorado Springs, Greeley, and far Western Colorado near Grand Junction.Former Colorado senator and attorney general Salazar is the current States Secretary of the Interior (as of January 20, 2009).The state of Colorado is represented by its two States Senators:*United States Senate Class 2  Emery Udall (Democratic) 2009*United States Senate Class 3  Farrand Bennet (Democratic)(Governor Ritter appointed Bennet to serve the remaining two years of States Senator Salazar term of office which was left vacant on January 20, 2009, when new United States President Obama appointed the Colorado Senator to serve in his Cabinet as States Secretary of the Interior.) 2009Colorado is represented by seven Representatives to the States House of Representatives:*1st congressional district - Louise DeGette (Democratic) 1997-*2nd congressional district - Schutz Polis (Democratic) 2009-*3rd congressional district -  Tipton (Republican) 2011*4th congressional district -  Gardner (Republican) 2011*5th congressional district - Douglas L. Doug Lamborn (Republican) 2007-*6th congressional district - Mike Coffman (Republican) 2009-*7th congressional district - Edwin George Ed Perlmutter (Democratic) 2007- Counties of Colorado counties, labelled.svg|thumb|An enlargeable map of the 64 counties of the state of ColoradoThe state of Colorado is divided into 64 counties.()  Counties are important units of government in Colorado since the state has no secondary civil subdivisions such as townships.  Two of these counties, the City and County of Denver and the City and County of Broomfield, have consolidated city and county governments.Nine Colorado counties have a population in excess of 250,000 each, while eight Colorado counties have a population of less than 2,500 each.  The ten most populous Colorado counties are located in the Range Urban Corridor. Metropolitan areas File:Colorado census statistical areas.svg|thumb|Map of the 14 Based Statistical Areas in the state of Colorado.The States Office of Management and Budget (OMB) has defined one Statistical Area (CSA),(The States Office of Management and Budget defines a Statistical Area (CSA) as an aggregate of adjacent Based Statistical Areas that are linked by commuting ties.) seven Statistical Areas (MSAs),(The States Office of Management and Budget defines a Statistical Area (MSA) as a Based Statistical Area having at least one urbanized area of 50,000 or more population, plus adjacent territory that has a high degree of social and economic integration with the core as measured by commuting ties.) and seven Statistical Areas (SAs)(The States Office of Management and Budget defines a Statistical Area (SA) as a Based Statistical Area having at least one urban cluster of at least 10,000 but less than 50,000 population, plus adjacent territory that has a high degree of social and economic integration with the core as measured by commuting ties.) in the state of Colorado.()The most populous of the 14 Based Statistical Areas in Colorado is the CO Metropolitan Statistical Area.  This area had a population of 2,543,482 at the United States Census, an increase of 17.88% since the United States Census.()The more extensive CO Combined Statistical Area had a population of 3,090,874 at the 2010 United States Census, an increase of +17.52% since the 2000 United States Census.(The most populous extended metropolitan region in Rocky Mountain Region is the Range Urban Corridor along the northeast face of the Rocky Mountains.  This region with Denver at its center had a population of 4,333,742 at the 2010 United States Census, an increase of +17.50% since the 2000 United States Census.( Municipalities The state of Colorado currently has 271 active incorporated municipalities, including 196 towns, 73 cities, and two consolidated city and county governments.()()Colorado municipalities operate under one of five types of municipal governing authority.  Colorado has one town with a territorial charter, 160 statutory towns, 12 statutory cities, 96 home rule municipalities (61 cities and 35 towns), and 2 consolidated city and county governments.The City and County of Denver and the City of Aurora both levy an Occupational Privilege Tax (OPT or Head Tax) on employers and employees.*If any employee performs work in the city limits and is paid over US$500.00 for that work in a single month, the employee and employer are both liable for the OPT regardless of where the main business office is located or headquartered.*In Denver, the employer is liable for US$4.00 per employee per month and the employee is liable for US$5.75 per month.*In Aurora, both employer and employees are liable for US$2.00 per month.*It is the employers responsibility to withhold, remit, and file the OPT returns. If an employer does not comply, they can be held liable for both portions of the OPT as well as penalties and interest. Unincorporated communities In addition to its 271 municipalities, Colorado has 187 unincorporated United States census designated places and many other small communities. Districts The state of Colorado has more than 3,000 districts with taxing authority. These districts may provide schools, law enforcement, fire protection, water, sewage, drainage, irrigation, transportation, recreation, infrastructure, cultural facilities, business support, redevelopment, or other services.Some of these districts have authority to levy sales tax and well as property tax and use fees.  This has led to a hodgepodge of sales tax and property tax rates in Colorado.  There are some street intersections in Colorado with a different sales tax rate on each corner, sometimes substantially different.Some of the more notable Colorado districts are:* The Transportation District (RTD), which affects the counties of Denver, Boulder, Jefferson, and portions of Adams, Arapahoe, Broomfield, and Douglas Counties* The and Cultural Facilities District (SCFD), a special regional tax district with physical boundaries contiguous with county boundaries of Adams, Arapahoe, Boulder, Broomfield, Denver, Douglas, and Jefferson Counties** It is a 0.1% retail sales and use tax (one penny on every $10).** According to the Colorado statute, the SCFD distributes the money to local organizations on an annual basis. These organizations must provide for the enlightenment and entertainment of the public through the production, presentation, exhibition, advancement or preservation of art, music, theater, dance, zoology, botany, natural history or cultural history.** As directed by statute, SCFD recipient organizations are currently divided into three tiers among which receipts are allocated by percentage.*** Tier I includes regional organizations: the Denver Art Museum, the Denver Botanic Gardens, the Denver Museum of Nature and Science, the Denver Zoo, and the Denver Center for the Performing Arts. It receives 65.5%.*** Tier II currently includes 26 regional organizations. Tier II receives 21%.*** Tier III has over 280 local organizations such as small theaters, orchestras, art centers, and natural history, cultural history, and community groups. Tier III organizations apply for funding to the county cultural councils via a grant process. This tier receives 13.5%.** An 11-member board of directors oversees the distributions in accordance with the Colorado Revised Statutes. Seven board members are appointed by county commissioners (in Denver, the Denver City Council) and four members are appointed by the Governor of Colorado.* The Football Stadium District (FD or FTBL), approved by the voters to pay for and help build the Broncos stadium Field at Mile High* Local Improvement Districts (LID) within designated areas of southeast Jefferson and Boulder counties* Regional Transportation Authority (RTA) taxes at varying rates in Basalt, Carbondale, Glenwood Springs, Gunnison County Education image:Cadet chapel.jpg|thumb|upright|right|The States Air Force Academy.Colleges and universities in Colorado:image:Norlin Library - Colorado.jpg|thumb|upright|right|The of Colorado at Boulder.image:University of Denver campus pics 003.jpg|upright|right|thumb|The of Denver. Military installations image:PetersonAFB.jpg|thumb|upright|Air Force Base*Reserve Personnel Center*Air Force Base*Carson (U.S. Army)**Canyon Maneuver Site*Air Force Base**Mountain Directorate*Chemical Depot (U.S. Army)*Air Force Base*States Air Force Academy Protected areas image:Coloradodunes.jpg|thumb|upright|Sand Dunes National Park and Preserveimage:SpruceTreeHouseLong.jpg|thumb|upright|Spruce Tree House in Verde National ParkUnits of the National Park System in Colorado:*National Recreation Area(Managed by the States Department of Agriculture, Forest Service.)*Old Fort National Historic Site*Canyon of the Gunnison National Park*of the Ancients National Monument(Managed by the States Department of the Interior, of Land Management.)*National Monument*Divide National Scenic Trail(Jointly managed by the States Department of Agriculture, Forest Service, and the States Department of the Interior, Park Service and of Land Management.)*National Recreation Area*National Monument*Fossil Beds National Monument*Sand Dunes National Park and Preserve*National Monument*Verde National Park and UNESCO Heritage Site*Spanish National Historic Trail*Express National Historic Trail*Mountain National Park*Creek Massacre National Historic Site*Fe National Historic Trail*House National Monument Sports  Professional sports teams image:Coors field 1.JPG|thumb|upright|The Rockies League baseball club at Field in Denver.image:Denver invesco stadium 1.jpg|thumb|upright|Authority Field at Mile High, home of the Broncos Football League club and the Outlaws League Lacrosse club.image:Pepsi Center.jpg|thumb|upright|Center in Denver, home of the Nuggets Basketball Association club, the Avalanche Hockey League club, and the Mammoth Lacrosse League club.Colorado is the least populous state with a franchise in each of the professional sports leagues. College athletics The following universities and colleges participate in the Collegiate Athletic Association Division I.See also*of federal lands in Colorado*List of National Register of Historic Places in Colorado*of people from Colorado*List of places in Colorado*peaks of Colorado*stateReferences Further reading * Explore Colorado, A Naturalists Handbook, The Denver Museum of Natural History and Westcliff Publishers, 1995, ISBN 1-56579-124-X for an excellent guide to the ecological regions of Colorado.* The Archeology of Colorado, Revised Edition, E. Steve Cassells, Johnson Books, Boulder, Colorado, 1997, trade paperback, ISBN 1-55566-193-9.* Chokecherry Places, Essays from the High Plains, Merrill Gilfillan, Johnson Press, Boulder, Colorado, trade paperback, ISBN 1-55566-227-7.* The Tie That Binds, Haruf, 1984, hardcover, ISBN 0-03-071979-8, a fictional account of farming in Colorado.* Railroads of Colorado: Your Guide to Colorados Historic Trains and Railway Sites, Claude Wiatrowski, Voyageur Press, 2002, hardcover, 160 pages, ISBN 0-89658-591-3 External links State government*Colorado state government website**Colorado information**Colorado state government**Colorado state agencies***Colorado Department of Transportation****Colorado highway maps*****Colorado Travel Map**Colorado counties**Colorado municipalities**Colorado special districts**Colorado tourism* Colorado State and County Government Websites*List of searchable databases produced by Colorado state agencies hosted by the American Library Association Government Documents Roundtable.Federal government* Energy & Environmental Data for Colorado* USGS Colorado state facts, real-time, geographic, and other scientific resources of Colorado* United States Census Bureau** Colorado QuickFacts** Colorado economic data** Colorado housing data** Colorado social data* USDA ERS Colorado state factsOther* * Colorado County Evolution* Ask Colorado* 2000 Census of Population and Housing for Colorado* Mountain and Desert Plants of Colorado and the Southwest,* Climate of Colorado*  Southeast  af:Coloradoang:Coloradoar:an:Coloradoarc:frp:Coloradoast:Coloradoaz:Koloradobn:zh-min-nan:Coloradobe-x-old:bcl:Coloradobi:Coloradobo:bs:Coloradobr:Coloradobg:ca:Coloradocv:cs:Coloradocy:Coloradoda:Coloradode:ColoradoNitsaa Hahoodzoet:Coloradoel:es:Coloradoeo:Koloradioeu:Coloradofa:hif:Coloradofo:Coloradofr:Coloradofy:Koloradoga:Coloradogv:Coloradogag:Koloradogd:ColoradoEstados Unidos de Amricahak:Kh-l-l-txal:haw:Kololakohy:hi:hr:Coloradoio:Koloradoig:Coloradobpy:id:Coloradoia:Coloradoie:Coloradoiu:/kuuluuraatuuik:Coloradoos:is:Coloradoit:Coloradohe:jv:Coloradopam:Colorado()kk:kw:Koloradosw:Coloradoht:Koloradoku:Coloradomrj:lad:Coloradola:Coloratumlv:Kolordo(Bundesstaat)(valstija)lij:Coloradoli:Coloradojbo:koloradoslmo:Coloradohu:Coloradomk:mg:Koloradoml:mi:Coloradomr:arz:ms:Coloradomn:my:nah:Colorado(staat)ja:frr:Coloradono:Coloradonn:Colorado(estat)uz:Koloradopa:pnb:pap:Coloradopms:Coloradotpi:Koloradonds:Coloradopl:Koloradopt:Coloradoro:Coloradorm:Coloradosuyuru:()sa:sq:Coloradoscn:Coloradusimple:Colorado(tt USA)sl:Koloradoszl:Koloradockb:sr:sh:Coloradofi:Coloradosv:Coloradotl:Koloradota:()th:chy:Coloradotr:Koloradouk:ur:Shitativec:Coloradovi:Coloradovo:Coloradowar:Coloradoyi:yo:Coloradodiq:Colorado(valstj)zh:
5429
Geography_of_Cambodia
largest lake  SapCambodia is a country in Asia, bordering the of Thailand, between Thailand, Vietnam, and Laos.  Its approximate geographical coordinates are .  Its 2,572 km border is split among Vietnam (1,228 km), Thailand (803 km) and Laos (541 km), as well as 443 km of coastline. Cambodia covers 181,040 square kilometres in the southwestern part of the Indochina peninsula. It lies completely within the tropics; its southernmost points are only slightly more than 10 above the equator. Roughly square in shape, the country is bounded on the north by Thailand and by Laos, on the east and southeast by Vietnam, and on the west by the Gulf of Thailand and by Thailand. Much of the countrys area consists of rolling plains. Dominant features are the large, almost centrally located, Sap (Great Lake) and the River, which traverses the country from north to south and is the 12th longest river in the world.The climate is monsoonal and has marked wet and dry seasons of relatively equal length. Both temperature and humidity generally are high throughout the year. Forest covers about two-thirds of the country, but it has been somewhat degraded in the more readily accessible areas by burning (a method called slash-and-burn agriculture), and by shifting agriculture.Topographythumb|right|300px|Detailed map of Cambodiathumb|right|300px|TopographyCambodia falls within several well-defined geographic regions. The largest part of the country, about 75 percent, consists of the Tonle Sap Basin and the Mekong Lowlands. To the southeast of this great basin is the Mekong Delta, which extends through Vietnam to the China Sea. The basin and delta regions are rimmed with mountain ranges to the southwest by the Mountains and the Range and to the north by the Mountains. Higher land to the northeast and to the east merges into the Central Highlands of southern Vietnam.The Tonle Sap Basin-Mekong Lowlands region consists chiefly of plains with elevations generally of less than 100 meters. As the elevation increases, the terrain becomes more rolling and dissected.The Cardamom Mountains in the southwest, oriented generally in a northwest-southeast direction, rise to more than 1,500 meters. The highest mountain in Cambodia--Aural, at 1,771 metersis in the eastern part of this range. The Elephant Range, an extension running toward the south and the southeast from the Cardamom Mountains, rises to elevations of between 500 and 1,000 meters. These two ranges are bordered on the west by a narrow coastal plain that contains Saom Bay, which faces the of Thailand. This area was largely isolated until the opening of the port of Saom (formerly called Sihanoukville) and the construction of a road and railroad connecting Kampong Saom, Kampot, Takev, and Penh in the 1960s.The Dangrek Mountains at the northern rim of the Tonle Sap Basin consist of a steep escarpment with an average elevation of about 500 meters, the highest points of which reach more than 700 meters. The escarpment faces southward and is the southern edge of the Plateau in Thailand. The watershed along the escarpment marks the boundary between Thailand and Cambodia. The main road through a pass in the Dangrek Mountains at Smach connects northwestern Cambodia with Thailand. Despite this road and those running through a few other passes, in general the escarpment impedes easy communication between the two countries. Between the western part of the Dangrek and the northern part of the Cardamom ranges, however, lies an extension of the Tonle Sap Basin that merges into lowlands in Thailand, which allows easy access from the border to Bangkok.The Mekong Valley, which offers a communication route between Cambodia and Laos, separates the eastern end of the Dangrek Mountains and the northeastern highlands. To the southeast, the basin joins the Mekong Delta, which, extending into Vietnam, provides both water and land communications between the two countries.ClimateCambodias climate, like that of the rest of Southeast Asia is dominated by monsoons, which are known as tropical wet and dry because of the distinctly marked seasonal differences. The monsoonal airflows are caused by annual alternating high pressure and low pressure over the Central Asian landmass. In summer, moisture-laden airthe southwest monsoonis drawn landward from the Indian Ocean. . The flow is reversed during the winter, and the northeast monsoon sends back dry air. The southwest monsoon brings the rainy season from mid-May to mid-September or to early October, and the northeast monsoon flow of drier and cooler air lasts from early November to March. The southern third of the country has a two-month dry season; the northern two-thirds, a four-month one. Short transitional periods, which are marked by some difference in humidity but by little change in temperature, intervene between the alternating seasons. Temperatures are fairly uniform throughout the Tonle Sap Basin area, with only small variations from the average annual mean of around . The maximum mean is about ; the minimum mean, about . Maximum temperatures of higher than , however, are common and, just before the start of the rainy season, they may rise to more than . Minimum temperatures rarely fall below . January is the coolest month, and April is the warmest. Tropical cyclones that often devastate coastal Vietnam rarely cause damage in Cambodia.The total annual rainfall average is between , and the heaviest amounts fall in the southeast. Rainfall from April to September in the Tonle Sap Basin-Mekong Lowlands area averages  annually, but the amount varies considerably from year to year. Rainfall around the basin increases with elevation. It is heaviest in the mountains along the coast in the southwest, which receive from  to more than  of precipitation annually as the southwest monsoon reaches the coast. This area of greatest rainfall, however, drains mostly to the sea; only a small quantity goes into the rivers flowing into the basin. The relative humidity is high at night throughout the year; usually it exceeds 90 percent. During the daytime in the dry season, humidity averages about 50 percent or slightly lower, but it may remain about 60 percent in the rainy period.DrainageExcept for the smaller rivers in the southeast, most of the major rivers and river systems in Cambodia drain into the Tonle Sap or into the Mekong River. The Cardamom Mountains and Elephant Range form a separate drainage divide. To the east the rivers flow into the Tonle Sap, while on the west they flow into the Gulf of Thailand. Toward the southern end of the Elephant Mountains, however, because of the topography, some small rivers flow southward on the eastern side of the divide.The Mekong River in Cambodia flows southward from the Cambodia-Laos border to a point below Kracheh city, where it turns west for about 50 kilometers and then turns southwest to Phnom Penh. Extensive rapids run above Kracheh city. From Kampong Cham the gradient slopes very gently, and inundation of areas along the river occurs at flood stageJune through Novemberthrough breaks in the natural levees that have built up along its course. At Phnom Penh four major water courses meet at a point called the Chattomukh (Four Faces). The Mekong River flows in from the northeast and the Tonle Saba river emanating from the Tonle Sapflows in from the northwest. They divide into two parallel channels, the Mekong River proper and the Basak River, and flow independently through the delta areas of Cambodia and Vietnam to the South China Sea.The flow of water into the Tonle Sap is seasonal. In September or in October, the flow of the Mekong River, fed by monsoon rains, increases to a point where its outlets through the delta cannot handle the enormous volume of water. At this point, the water pushes northward up the Tonle Sab and empties into the Tonle Sap, thereby increasing the size of the lake from about 2,590 square kilometers to about 24,605 square kilometers at the height of the flooding. After the Mekongs waters crestwhen its downstream channels can handle the volume of waterthe flow reverses, and water flows out of the engorged lake.As the level of the Tonle Sap retreats, it deposits a new layer of sediment. The annual flooding, combined with poor drainage immediately around the lake, transforms the surrounding area into marshlands unusable for agricultural purposes during the dry season. The sediment deposited into the lake during the Mekongs flood stage appears to be greater than the quantity carried away later by the Tonle Sap River. Gradual silting of the lake would seem to be occurring; during low-water level, it is only about 1.5 meters deep, while at flood stage it is between 10 and 15 meters deep.Regional divisionsCambodias boundaries were for the most part based upon those recognized by France and by neighboring countries during the colonial period. The 800-kilometre boundary with Thailand, coincides with a natural feature, the watershed of the Dangrek Mountains, only in its northern sector. The 541-kilometer border with Laos and the 1,228-kilometer border with Vietnam result largely from French administrative decisions and do not follow major natural features. Border disputes have broken out in the past between Cambodia and Thailand as well as between Cambodia and Vietnam.Area and boundariesArea:total:181,035 kmland:176,520 kmwater:4,520 kmMaritime claims:contiguous zone:continental shelf:exclusive economic zone:territorial sea:Elevation extremes:lowest point:of Thailand 0 mhighest point:Aoral 1,810 mResources and land useNatural resources:oil and gas, timber, gemstones, iron ore, manganese, phosphates, hydropower potentialLand use:arable land:20.44%permanent crops:0.59%other:78.97% (2005)Total renewable water resources: (1999)Freshwater withdrawal (domestic/industrial/agricultural):total: /yr (1%/0%/98%)per capita: /yr (2000)Irrigated land:2700 km (2003)Environmental concernsNatural hazards:monsoonal rains (June to November); flooding; occasional droughtsEnvironment - current issues:illegal logging activities throughout the country and strip mining for gems in the western region along the border with Thailand have resulted in habitat loss and declining biodiversity (in particular, destruction of mangrove swamps threatens natural fisheries); erosion; in rural areas, most of the population does not have access to potable water; declining fish stocks because of illegal fishing and overfishingEnvironment - international agreements:party to:Biodiversity, Climate Change, Desertification, Species, Life Conservation, Ship Pollution (73/78), Timber 94, Wetlandssigned, but not ratified:of the Sea, DumpingGeography - note:a land of paddies and forests dominated by the River and Tonle SapLakes* Sap LakeReferences**de Camboyageografiadu CambodgegeografiKambodydo Cambojamaantiedezh:
5432
Economy_of_Cambodia
reserves               US$3.84 billion (2010)The Economy of Cambodia has seen rapid economic progress in the last decade. capita income, although rapidly increasing, is low compared with most neighbouring countries. The main domestic activity on which most rural households depend is agriculture and its related sub-sectors. Manufacturing output is varied but is not very extensive and is mostly conducted on a small-scale and informal basis. The service sector is heavily concentrated in trading activities and catering-related services. Cambodia has reported that oil and natural gas reserves have been found off-shore.During 1995, the government implemented firm stabilization policies under difficult circumstances. Overall, macroeconomic performance was good. Growth in 1995 was estimated at 7% because of improved agricultural production (rice in particular). Strong growth in construction and services continued. Inflation dropped from 26% in 1994 to only 6% in 1995. Imports increased as a result of the availability of external financing. Exports also increased, due to an increase in log exports. With regard to the budget, both the current and overall deficits were lower than originally targeted.After four years of solid macroeconomic performance, Cambodias economy slowed dramatically in 1997-98 due to the regional economic crisis, civil violence, and political infighting. Foreign investment and tourism fell off. Also, in 1998 the main harvest was hit by drought. But in 1999, the first full year of peace in 30 years, progress was made on economic reforms and growth resumed at 4%. The long-term development of the economy after decades of war remains a daunting challenge. The population lacks education and productive skills, particularly in the poverty-ridden countryside, which suffers from an almost total lack of basic infrastructure. Recurring political instability and corruption within government discourage foreign investment and delay foreign aid. On the brighter side, the government is addressing these issues with assistance from bilateral and multilateral donors.HistoryForeign aidgrain rice Bakan.JPG|thumb|200px|left|Rice milling is very important to the Cambodian economy.Cambodias emerging democracy has received strong international support. Under the mandate carried out by the Nations Transitional Authority in Cambodia (UNTAC), $1.72 billion (1.72 G$) was spent in an effort to bring basic security, stability and democratic rule to the country. Regarding economic assistance, official donors had pledged $880 million at the Conference on the Rehabilitation of Cambodia (MCRRC) in Tokyo in June 1992, to which pledges of $119 million were added in September 1993 at the meeting of the Committee on the Reconstruction of Cambodia (ICORC) in Paris, and $643 million at the March 1994 ICORC meeting in Tokyo. To date, therefore, the total amount pledged for Cambodias rehabilitation is approximately 12.3 G$. Recent developments 2007 GDP (or gross monetarised product GMP)grew an estimated 18.6%, in line with the 2000/06 average of 9.5 percent. Garment exports rose almost 8%, tourist arrivals jumped nearly 35%, and construction activity doubled. With exports decelerating somewhat,  the 2007 GDP growth was driven by consumption and investment. Foreign direct investment  (FDI) inflows reached US$600 million (7 percent of GDP), slightly more than the country  received in official aid. Domestic investment, driven largely by the private sector, accounted  for 23.4 percent of GDP. Approximately 2,860 new businesses registered for operation in  2007, a 71 percent increase over 2006.   Although risks have increased, economic prospects for 2008 remain strong. The projected 7.5  percent  growth  rate  for  2008  reflects  a  mix  of  growth  in  services  (mainly  tourism)  and  construction combined with a slowdown in garment exports. Export growth, especially to the  US,  began  to  slow  in  late  2007  accompanied  by  stiffer  competition  from  Vietnam  and  emerging risks (slowdown in the US economy and lifting of safeguards on Chinas exports).  Although exports of cash crops have grown fast in recent years, developments in the garment  industry  have  a  major  impact  on  Cambodias  export  performance.  On  the  other  hand,  Cambodias  exporters  might  benefit  from  the  depreciation  of  the  dollar.  Another  risk  is  uncertainties in the construction sector.Social Issues in CambodiaStatisticsInvestment (gross fixed): 3% of GDP (2011 est.)Household income or consumption by percentage share: lowest 10%: 2.6%  highest 10%: 23.7% (2011)Agriculture - products:rice, rubber, corn, vegetables, cashews, tapioca, silkIndustries:tourism, garments, construction, rice milling, fishing, wood and wood products, rubber, cement, gem mining, textilesIndustrial production growth rate: 5.7% (2011 est.)Electricity:*production: 1.273 billion kWh (2010)*consumption: 1.272 billion kWh (2010)*exports: 0 kWh (2010)*imports: 274 million kWh (2010)Exchange rates:riels (KHR) per US dollar - 4,395.62 (2011), 4,145 (2010), 4,139.33 (2009), 4,070.94 (2008), 4,006 (2007), 4,103 (2006)References*  Lempert,  Foreign Aid:  Creating Conditions for the Next Civil War,  Phnom Penh Post, 16 / 01, January 12  25, 2007, available on the internet.See also* of Cambodian companies* resources of Cambodia* industry in Cambodia* in Cambodia* Finance ComplexCritiques of contemporary economic circumstances: Cambodias Neoliberal Order: Violence, Authoritarianism, and the Contestation of Public Space  by Simon Springer, Department of Geography, National University of Singapore.du Cambodgede Camboxadi Kambodjade Cambtjado Cambojat Campuchia
5478
Central_African_Republic
footnotesImage:Bangui Shopping District.jpg|thumb|250px|Bangui shopping districtthumb|250px|Trucks in Banguithumb|250px|Map of Central African RepublicThe Central African Republic (CAR) (, , or Centrafrique ; Sango Kdrsse t Bafrka), is a country in Africa. It borders Chad in the north, Sudan in the north east, Sudan in the east, the Republic of the Congo and the of the Congo in the south, and Cameroon in the west. The CAR covers a land area of about , and has an estimated population of about 4.4 million as of 2008. Bangui is the city.Most of the CAR consists of Sudano-Guinean savannas but it also includes a Sahelo-Sudanian zone in the north and an equatorial forest zone in the south. Two thirds of the country lies in the basins of the River, which flows south into the River, while the remaining third lies in the basin of the River, which flows north into Chad.Since most of the territory is located in the Ubangi and Shari river basins, France called the colony it carved out in this region Ubangi-Chari, or Oubangui-Chari in French. It became a semi-autonomous territory of the Community in 1958 and then an independent nation on 13 August 1960. For over three decades after independence, the CAR was ruled by presidents who either were not freely elected or took power by force. Local discontent with this system was eventually reinforced by international pressure, following the end of the War.The first multi-party democratic elections were held in 1993 with resources provided by the countrys donors and help from the UN Office for Electoral Affairs, and brought Patass to power. He lost popular support during his presidency and was overthrown in 2003 by French-backed General Boziz, who went on to win a democratic election in May 2005. Inability to pay workers in the public sector led to strikes in 2007, forcing the resignation of the government in early 2008. A new Prime Minister, Touadra, was named on 22 January 2008.The Central African Republic is one of the poorest countries in the world and among the ten poorest countries in Africa. The Development Index for the Central African Republic is 0.369, which gives the country a rank of 179 out of 182 countries with data.(of countries by Human Development Index)HistoryEarly historyBetween about 1000 BC and 1000 AD, Ubangian-speaking peoples spread eastward from Cameroon to Sudan and settled in most of the territory of the CAR. During the same period, a much smaller number of Bantu-speaking immigrants settled in Southwestern CAR and some Sudanic-speaking populations settled along the Oubangi.The majority of the CARs inhabitants thus speak Ubangian languages or Bantu languages belonging to the NigerCongo family. A minority speak Central Sudanic languages of the Nilo-Saharan family. More recent immigrants include many Muslim merchants who most often speak Arabic or Hausa.Exposure to the outside worldUntil the early 19th century, the peoples of the CAR lived beyond the expanding Islamic frontier in the Sudanic zone of Africa and thus had relatively little contact with religions or northern economies. During the first decades of the 19th century, however, Muslim traders began increasingly to penetrate the region of the CAR and to cultivate special relations with local leaders in order to facilitate their trade and settlement in the region.The initial arrival of Muslim traders in the early 19th century was relatively peaceful and depended upon the support of local peoples, but after about 1850, slave traders with well-armed soldiers began to penetrate the region. Between c. 1860 and 1910, slave traders from Sudan, Chad, Cameroon, al-Kuti in Northern CAR and Nzakara and Zande states in Southeastern CAR exported much of the population of Eastern CAR, a region with very few inhabitants today.French colonialismEuropean penetration of Central African territory began in the late 19th century during the so-called for Africa (c. 18751900). Count de Brazza took the lead in establishing the Congo with headquarters in the city named after him, Brazzaville, and sent expeditions up the Ubangi River in an effort to expand Frances claims to territory in Central Africa. Leopold II of Belgium, Germany and the United Kingdom also competed to establish their claims to territory in the Central African region.In 1889 the French established a post on the Ubangi River at Bangui, the future capital of Ubangi-Shari and the CAR. De Brazza then sent expeditions in 189091 up the River in what is now Southwestern CAR, up the center of the Ubangi basin toward Chad, and eastward along the Ubangi River toward the Nile. De Brazza and the procolonial in France wished to expand the borders of the French Congo to link up with French territories in West Africa, North Africa and East Africa.In 1894, the French Congos borders with Leopold IIs Free State and Cameroon were fixed by diplomatic agreements. Then, in 1899, the French Congos border with Sudan was fixed along the Congo-Nile watershed, leaving France without her much coveted outlet on the Nile and turning Southeastern Ubangi-Shari into a cul-de-sac.Once European negotiators agreed upon the borders of the French Congo, France had to decide how to pay for the costly occupation, administration, and development of the territory. The reported financial successes of Leopold IIs concessionary companies in the Congo Free State convinced the French government in 1899 to grant 17 private companies large concessions in the Ubangi-Shari region. In return for the right to exploit these lands by buying local products and selling European goods, the companies promised to pay rent to the colonial state and to promote the development of their concessions. The companies employed European and African agents who frequently used extremely brutal methods to force Central Africans to work for them. At the same time, the French colonial administration began to force Central Africans to pay taxes and to provide the state with free labor. The companies and French administration often collaborated in their efforts to force Central Africans to work for their benefit, but they also often found themselves at odds.Some French officials reported abuses committed by private company militias and even by their own colonial colleagues and troops, but efforts to bring these criminals to justice almost always failed. When news of atrocities committed against Central Africans by concessionary company employees and colonial officials or troops reached France and caused an outcry, there were investigations and some feeble attempts at reform, but the situation on the ground in Ubangi-Shari remained essentially the same.In the meantime, during the first decade of French colonial rule (c. 19001910), the rulers of African states in the Ubangi-Shari region increased their slave raiding activities and also their sale of local products to European companies and the colonial state. They took advantage of their treaties with the French to procure more weapons which were used to capture more slaves and so much of the eastern half of Ubangi-Shari was depopulated as a result of the export of Central Africans by local rulers during the first decade of colonial rule. Those who had power, Africans and Europeans, often made life miserable for those who did not have the power to resist.During the second decade of colonial rule (c. 19101920), armed employees of private companies and the colonial state continued to use brutal methods to deal with local populations who resisted forced labor but the power of local African rulers was destroyed and so slave raiding was greatly diminished. In 1911, the Sangha and Lobaye basins were ceded to Germany as part of an agreement which gave France a free-hand in Morocco and so Western Ubangi-Shari came under German rule until World War I, during which France reconquered this territory by using Central African troops.The third decade of colonial rule (19201930) was a period of transition during which a network of roads was built, cash crops were promoted, mobile health services were formed to combat sleeping sickness, and Protestant missions established stations in different parts of the country. New forms of forced labor were also introduced, however, as the French conscripted large numbers of Ubangians to work on the Railway and many of these recruits died of exhaustion and illness.In 1925 the French writer Gide published au Congo in which he described the alarming consequences of conscription for the Congo-Ocean railroad and exposed the continuing atrocities committed against Central Africans in Western Ubangi-Shari by employees of the Forestry Company of Sangha-Ubangi, for example. In 1928 a major insurrection, the Kongo-Wara war of the hoe handle broke out in Western Ubangi-Shari and continued for several years. The extent of this insurrection, perhaps the largest anticolonial rebellion in Africa during the interwar years, was carefully hidden from the French public because it provided evidence, once again, of strong opposition to French colonial rule and forced labor.During the fourth decade of colonial rule (c. 19301940), cotton, tea, and coffee emerged as important cash crops in Ubangi-Shari and the mining of diamonds and gold began in earnest. Several cotton companies were granted purchasing monopolies over large areas of cotton production and were thus able to fix the prices paid to cultivators in order to assure profits for their shareholders. Europeans established coffee plantations and Central Africans also began to cultivate coffee.The fifth decade of colonial rule (c. 19401950) was shaped by the Second World War and the political reforms which followed in its wake. In September 1940 pro-Gaullist French officers took control of Ubangi-Shari.IndependenceOn 1 December 1958 the colony of Ubangi-Shari became an autonomous territory within the Community and took the name Central African Republic. The founding father and president of the Conseil de Gouvernement, Boganda, died in a mysterious plane accident in 1959, just eight days before the last elections of the colonial era. On 13 August 1960 the Central African Republic gained its independence and two of Bogandas closest aides, Goumba and Dacko, became involved in a power struggle. With the backing of the French, Dacko took power and soon had Goumba arrested. By 1962 President Dacko had established a one-party state.Image:Jean-Bdel Bokassa.jpg|thumb|190px|BokassaOn 31 December 1965 Dacko was overthrown in the coup dtat by Colonel Bokassa, who suspended the constitution and dissolved the National Assembly. President Bokassa declared himself President for life in 1972, and named himself Emperor Bokassa I of the African Empire on 4 December 1976. A year later, Emperor Bokassa crowned himself in a lavish and expensive ceremony that was ridiculed by much of the world. In 1979 France carried out a coup against Bokassa and restored Dacko to power. Dacko, in turn, was overthrown in a coup by General Kolingba on 1 September 1981.Kolingba suspended the constitution and ruled with a military junta until 1985. He introduced a new constitution in 1986 which was adopted by a nationwide referendum. Membership in his new party, the Dmocratique Centrafricain (RDC) was voluntary. In 1987, semi-competitive elections to parliament were held and municipal elections were held in 1988. Kolingbas two major political opponents, Abel Goumba and Patass, boycotted these elections because their parties were not allowed to compete.By 1990, inspired by the fall of the Berlin Wall, a pro-democracy movement became very active. In May 1990 a letter signed by 253 prominent citizens asked for the convocation of a National Conference but Kolingba refused this request and detained several opponents. Pressure from the United States, more reluctantly from France, and from a group of locally represented countries and agencies called GIBAFOR (France, USA, Germany, Japan, EU, World Bank and UN) finally led Kolingba to agree, in principle, to hold free elections in October 1992, with help from the UN Office of Electoral Affairs. After using the excuse of alleged irregularities to suspend the results of the elections as a pretext for holding on to power, President Kolingba came under intense pressure from GIBAFOR to establish a Conseil National Politique Provisoire de la Rpublique (Provisional National Political Council) (CNPPR) and to set up a Mixed Electoral Commission which included representatives from all political parties.When elections were finally held in 1993 (again with the help of the international community) Ange-Flix Patass led in the first round and Kolingba came in fourth behind Abel Goumba and David Dacko. In the second round, Patass won 53 percent of the vote while Goumba won 45.6 percent. Most of Patasss support came from Gbaya, Kare and Kaba voters in seven heavily populated prefectures in the northwest while Goumbas support came largely from ten less-populated prefectures in the south and east. Furthermore, Patasss party, the Mouvement pour la Libration du Peuple Centrafricain (MLPC) or Movement for the Liberation of the Central African People gained a simple but not an absolute majority of seats in parliament, which meant Patass needed coalition partners.Patass relieved former President Kolingba of his military rank of general in March 1994 and then charged several former ministers with various crimes. Patass also removed many Yakoma from important, lucrative posts in the government. Two hundred mostly Yakoma members of the presidential guard were also dismissed or reassigned to the army. Kolingbas RDC loudly proclaimed that Patasss government was conducting a witch hunt against the Yakoma.A new constitution was approved on 28 December 1994 and promulgated on 14 January 1995, but this constitution, like those before it, did not have much impact on the practice of politics. In 19961997, reflecting steadily decreasing public confidence in its erratic behaviour, three mutinies against Patasss government were accompanied by widespread destruction of property and heightened ethnic tension. On 25 January 1997, the Bangui Peace Accords were signed which provided for the deployment of an inter-African military mission, the Mission Interafricaine de Surveillance des Accords de Bangui (MISAB). Malis former president, Amadou Tour, served as chief mediator and brokered the entry of ex-mutineers into the government on 7 April 1997. The MISAB mission was later replaced by a U.N. peacekeeping force, the Mission des Nations Unies en RCA (MINURCA).In 1998 parliamentary elections resulted in Kolingba RDC winning 20 out of 109 seats, which constituted a comeback, but in 1999, notwithstanding widespread public anger in urban centers with his corrupt rule, Patass won free elections to become president for a second term.On 28 May 2001 rebels stormed strategic buildings in Bangui in an unsuccessful coup attempt. The army chief of staff, Abel Abrou, and General Franois NDjadder Bedaya were shot, but Patass regained the upper hand by bringing in at least 300 troops of the rebel leader Bemba (from across the river in the Republic of the Congo) and by Libyan soldiers.In the aftermath of this failed coup, militias loyal to Patass sought revenge against rebels in many neighborhoods of the capital, Bangui, that resulted in the destruction of many homes as well as the torture and murder of many opponents. Eventually Patass came to suspect that General Boziz was involved in another coup attempt against him and so Boziz fled with loyal troops to Chad. In March 2003, Boziz launched a surprise attack against Patass, who was out of the country. Libyan troops and some 1,000 soldiers of Bembas Congolese rebel organization failed to stop the rebels, who took control of the country and thus succeeded in overthrowing Patass.Franois Boziz suspended the constitution and named a new cabinet which included most opposition parties. Abel Goumba, Mr. Clean, was named vice-president, which gave Bozizs new government a positive image. Boziz established a broad-based National Transition Council to draft a new constitution and announced that he would step down and run for office once the new constitution was approved. A national dialogue was held from 15 September to 27 October 2003, and Boziz won a fair election that excluded Patass, to be elected president on a second ballot, in May 2005.Humanitarian aid, peacebuilding, and developmentThe Central African Republic is heavily dependent upon multilateral foreign aid and the presence of numerous NGOs which provide services which the government fails to provide. As one UNDP official put it, the CAR is a country sous serum, or a country metaphorically hooked up to an IV. (Mehler 2005:150). The very presence of numerous foreign personnel and organizations in the country, including peacekeepers and even refugee camps, provides an important source of revenue for many Central Africans.The country is self-sufficient in food crops, but much of the population lives at a subsistence level. Livestock development is hindered by the presence of the fly.In 2006 due to ongoing violence, over 50,000 in the countrys north-west were at risk of starvation,() and this was only averted thanks to Nations support.Peacebuilding CommissionOn 12 June 2008, the Central African Republic became the fourth country to be placed on the agenda of the UN Peacebuilding Commission,() which was set up in 2005 to help countries emerging from conflict avoid the slide back into war or chaos.  The 31-member body agreed to take up the situation after a request from the government.Peacebuilding FundThe Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon declared on 8 January 2008 that the Central African Republic was eligible to receive assistance from the Peacebuilding Fund.() Three priority areas were identified: 1) Security sector reform 2) Promotion of good governance and the rule of law and 3) Revitalization of communities affected by conflicts.Politicsthumb|250px|Bangui airportBoziz is President of the country. A new constitution was approved by voters in a referendum held on 5 December 2004. Full multiparty presidential and parliamentary elections were held in March 2005,() with a second round in May. Boziz was declared the winner after a run-off vote.()In February 2006, there were reports of widespread violence in the northern part of the CAR.() Thousands of refugees fled their homes, caught in the crossfire of battles between government troops and rebel forces. More than 7,000 people fled to neighboring Chad. Those who remained in the CAR told of government troops systematically killing men and boys suspected of cooperating with rebels.()In March 2010, Boziz signed a decree declaring presidential elections on 25 April 2010.() The elections were first postponed to 16 May, and then indefinitely.()  Finally the general election was set for 23 January 2011. Despite serious problems in the organisation,() the election proceeded as scheduled. A second round was forecast on 20 March 2011, and was conducted 27 March 2011. The general elections is partly funded by the international community (EU and UNDP). An association of most of the Civil Society Organisations, the Observatoire National des Elections is monitoring the election process.() Boziz and his party both had major victories in the elections.Human rightsThe 2009 Human Rights Report by the States Department of State noted that in general the human rights record remained poor, with concerns over numerous government abuses.(, 2009 U.S Dept of State Human Rights Report: Central African Republic) Freedom of speech is addressed in the constitution, however there have been incidents of government intimidation with the intent to limit media criticism.( A report by the Research & Exchanges Boards media sustainability index noted that the country minimally met objectives, with segments of the legal system and government opposed to a free media system(Prefectures and sub-prefecturesThe Central African Republic is divided into 14 administrative prefectures (prfectures), along with 2 economic prefectures (prfectures economiques) and one autonomous commune. The prefectures are further divided into 71 sub-prefectures (sous-prfectures).The prefectures include:* Bamingui-Bangoran* Basse-Kotto* Haute-Kotto* Haut-Mbomou* Kmo* Lobaye* Mambr-Kad* Mbomou* Nana-Mambr* Ombella-MPoko* Ouaka* Ouham* Ouham-Pend* Vakagathe two economic prefectures are Nana-Grbizi and Sangha-Mbar; the commune is Bangui.GeographyFile:Ubangi river near Bangui.jpg|thumb|right|River on the outskirts of Bangui.The Central African Republic is a land-locked nation within the interior of the African continent. It is bordered by the countries of Cameroon, Chad, Sudan, South Sudan, the Democratic Republic of the Congo and the Republic of the Congo. The country lies between latitudes 2 and 11N, and longitudes 14 and 28E.Much of the Central African Republic consists of flat, or rolling plateau savanna, typically about  above sea level, of which most of the northern half lies within the Wildlife Funds Sudanian savanna ecoregion. In the northeast are the Fertit Hills, and there are scattered hills in southwest part of the country. To the northwest is the Yade Massif, a granite plateau with an altitude of .At , the Central African Republic is the worlds 42nd-largest country. It is comparable in size to the Ukraine, and is somewhat smaller than the US state of Texas.Much of the southern border is formed by tributaries of the River, with the River in the east merging with the River to form the River. In the west, the River flows through part of the country. The eastern border lies along the edge of the river watershed.Estimates of the amount of the country covered by forest ranges up to 8%, with the densest parts in the south. The forest is highly diverse, and includes commercially important species of Ayous, Sapelli and Sipo.(Sold Down the River (English) March 2001, Monitor) The deforestation rate is 0.4% per annum, and lumber poaching is commonplace.( The Forests of the Congo Basin: State of the Forest 2006. CARPE  13-July-07)In the November 2008 issue of National Geographic, the Central African Republic was named the country least affected by pollution.ClimateThe climate of the C.A.R. is generally tropical. The northern areas are subject to harmattan winds, which are hot, dry, and carry dust. The northern regions have been subject to desertification, and the northeast is a desert. The remainder of the country is prone to flooding from nearby rivers.EconomyThe economy of the CAR is dominated by the cultivation and sale of food crops such as cassava, peanuts, maize, sorghum, millet, sesame, and plantain . The annual real GDP growth rate is just above 3%. The importance of foodcrops over exported crops is indicated by the fact that the total production of cassava, the staple food of most Central Africans, ranges between 200,000 and 300,000 tons  a year, while the production of cotton, the principal exported cash crop, ranges from 25,000 to 45,000 tons a year. Foodcrops are not exported in large quantities but they still constitute the principal cash crops of the country because Central Africans derive far more income from the periodic sale of surplus foodcrops than from exported cash crops such as cotton or coffee.The CARs largest import partner is Korea (20.2%), followed by France (13.6%) and Cameroon (7.7%), while its largest export partner is Japan (40.4%), followed by Belgium (9.8%) and China (8.2%).(https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/fields/2050.html?countryNameChina&countryCodech&regionCodeeas&#ch)(https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/fields/2061.html?countryNameChina&countryCodech&regionCodeeas&#ch)Many rural and urban women also transform foodcrops into alcoholic drinks such as sorghum beer or hard liquor and derive considerable income from the sale of these drinks. Much of the income derived from the sale of foods and alcohol is not on the books and thus is not considered in calculating per capita income, which is one reason why official figures for per capita income are not accurate in the case of the CAR.The capita income of the CAR is often listed as being around $300 a year, said to be one of the lowest in the world, but this figure is based mostly on reported sales of exports and largely ignores the more important but unregistered sale of foods, locally produced alcohol, diamonds, ivory, bushmeat, and medicine, for example. The economy of the CAR is more important than the formal economy for most Central Africans.Diamonds constitute the most important export of the CAR, accounting for 4055% of export revenues, but an estimated 3050% of the diamonds produced each year leave the country clandestinely. Export trade is hindered by poor economic development, and the location of this country far from the coast.The wilderness regions of this country have potential as ecotourist destinations. The country is noted for its population of elephants. In the southwest, the National Park is a rain forest area. To the north, the St Floris National Park has been well-populated with wildlife, including leopards, lions, and rhinos. To the northeast the National Park. However the population of wildlife in these parks has severely diminished over the past 20 years due to poaching, particularly from the neighboring Sudan.The CAR  is a member of the for the Harmonization of Business Law in Africa (OHADA).()The CAR is ranked 180 out of 181 on ease of business in the 2009 Doing Business Report of the World Bank Group. The ease of business ranking uses a composite index on regulations that enhance business activity and those that constrain it.(http://www.doingbusiness.org/Documents/CountryProfiles/CAF.pdf)DemographicsThe population has almost quadrupled since independence. In 1960 the population was 1,232,000. Now the population is 4,422,000. (2009 UN est.) Note: estimates for this country take into account the effects of excess mortality due to AIDS; this can result in lower life expectancy, higher infant mortality and death rates, lower population and growth rates, and changes in the distribution of population by age and sex than would otherwise be expected.The Nations estimates that approximately 11% of the population aged 15  49 is HIV positive.() Only 3% of the country has antiretroviral therapy available, compared to 17% coverage in neighbouring countries of Chad and the of the Congo.(http://data.unaids.org/pub/GlobalReport/2006/2006_GR_ANN3_en.pdf)The nation is divided into over 80 ethnic groups, each having its own language. The largest ethnic <groups are the Baya (33%), Banda (28%), Mandjia (7%), Sara (10%), Mboum (7%), MBaka (4%), Yakoma (4%), and Fula or Fulani(In ; in ) (3%), with others constituting 4%, including Europeans of mostly French descent.HealthFemale life expectancy at birth was 48.2 and male life expectancy at birth was at 45.1 in 2007.() The fertility rate is at about five births per woman.( Government expenditure on health was at US$ 20 (PPP) per person in 2006.( There were 8 physicians per 100,000 people in 2004.() Government expenditure on health was at 10.9 % of total government expenditure in 2006.(ReligionbarsChristians form 80 percent of the population, while 5 percent of the population maintain Indigenous beliefs. Islam is practiced by approximately 15 percent of the countrys population (2003 census).There are many missionary groups operating in the country, including Lutherans, Baptists, Catholics, Grace Brethren, and Witnesses. While these missionaries are predominantly from the United States, France, Italy, and Spain, many are also from Nigeria, the Republic of the Congo, and other African countries. Many missionaries left the country due to fighting between rebel and government forces in 2002 and 2003. Many have now returned to the country and resumed their activities.()CultureMusicEducationImage:CAR classroom.jpg|thumb|Classroom in Ouandja, Central African Republic|uprightPublic education in the Central African Republic is free, and education is compulsory from ages 6 to 14.(Central African Republic. Findings on the Worst Forms of Child Labor (2001). of International Labor Affairs, U.S. Department of Labor (2002). This article incorporates text from this source, which is in the domain.) About half the adult population of the country is illiterate.() The of Bangui, a public university located in Bangui, is the only institution of higher education in the Central African Republic.Legal system Like many other former French colonies, its system is based on Law.() Over 40% of cases before its legal system involve sorcery or witchcraft.()See also*in the Central African RepublicReferencesFurther reading* Kalck, Pierre, Historical Dictionary of the Central African Republic, 2004* Petringa, Maria, Brazza, A Life for Africa (2006) ISBN 978-1-4259-1198-0* Titley, Brian, Dark Age: The Political Odyssey of Emperor Bokassa, 2002External links;Government*Central African Republic Online*Chief of State and Cabinet Members; Overviews* Country Profile from News* *Central African Republic from UCB Libraries GovPubs**; News* Humanitarian news and analysis from IRIN  Central African Republic* Humanitarian information coverage on ReliefWeb* Central African Republic news headline links from AllAfrica.com; Tourism* ;Other* Central African Republic at Humanitarian and Development Partnership Team (HDPT)* Central African Republic reports from Coalition to Stop the Use of Child Soldiers* Johann Hari in Birao, Central African Republic. Inside Frances Secret War from Independent, 5 October 2007list list list Afrika TeungohRepubliekRepublik Affricanisc Cynewse Centroafricana centrafriqunaCentroafricanaAfrika RespublikasAfrika Fasojamana Aprika TangahKing-h-kokna Aprikanong Republikabo:RepublikaKreizafrikanCentreafricanaSentral AprikanorepublikaCanolbarth AffricaRepublikRepublik Bikyah BeanVabariikCentroafricanaRespublikoCentroafricanaErdiko Errepublika African Republicfo:MiafrikalveldicentrafricaineRepublykna hAfraice Liryn Affrick VeanaghMeadhan AfragaCentroafricana - Rpublique Centrafricaine  Republikaio:CentrafrikaAfrika TengahCentroafricanAfrican Republic is:Mi-AfrkulveldiCentrafricana-Afrika Tengah African Republic  kw:Centrafrikaya Santara Afurikaya Afrika ya Katiya Afelika ya KatisantafrikAfrkaya NavendSentroafrikanaAfricae MediaeRepublikaRepublikAfrikos Respublikaentro-Africann-aAfrikaln:SantrafrkaCentrafricanaKztrsasg  Afrika Tengahmy:Tlahco AfricaAprika YugagaRepubliekja:Afrekan Repabliksentralafrikanske republikksentralafrikanske republikkenAfrikani Republikeoc:CentreafricaAfrika Respublikasi    Sentrafrican-aRepubliekrodkowoafrykaskaCentro-AfricanaAfrika RespublikasAfrikaCentrafricanAphrika Republika dssevldi t Bafrkasc:TzentrfricaAfrican RepublicRepublike Afriks QendroreCentrafricanaAfrican Republicwe-AfrikharepublikarepublikaBartamaha Afrika RepublikatasavaltarepublikenGitnang-Aprikano  th: Afrika Cumhuriyeti  Sentrafricanaha Trung Phivo:Znoda-FrikopVabariikzh-classical:han Butnga nga AprikaDiggu AfrigAfrican RepublicOlmnira rin frkAfrika MiyanneAfrkas Respoblkazh:
5483
Economy_of_the_Central_African_Republic
spelling         The African Republic (CAR) is classified as one of the worlds developed countries,() with an estimated annual capita income of $700 (2009). Sparsely populated and landlocked, the nation is overwhelmingly agrarian. The vast bulk of the population engages in subsistence farming and 55% of the countrys GDP arises from agriculture. Subsistence agriculture, together with forestry, remains the backbone of the economy of the Central African Republic (CAR), with more than 70% of the population living in outlying areas. The agricultural sector generates half of GDP. Principal food crops include cassava, peanuts, sorghum, millet, maize, sesame, and plantains. Principal crops for export include cotton, coffee, and tobacco. Timber has accounted for about 16% of export earnings and the diamond industry for nearly 54%. Infrastructure thumb|240px|Though periodically unusable, the Ubangi River is nonetheless an important transportation route.Much of the countrys limited electrical supply is provided by plants based in Boali. Fuel supplies must be barged in via the River or trucked overland through Cameroon, resulting in frequent shortages of gasoline, diesel, and fuel. The C.A.R.s transportation and communication network is limited. The country has only 429 kilometers of paved road, limited international, and no domestic air service, and does not possess a railroad. River traffic on the River is impossible from April to July, and conflict in the region has sometimes prevented shipments from moving between Kinshasa and Bangui. The telephone system functions, albeit imperfectly. Four stations currently operate in the C.A.R., as well as one station. Numerous newspapers and pamphlets are published on a regular basis, and one company has begun providing Internet service. Agriculture 74 percent of the population in the African Republic works in the industry, so African Republics economy is dominated by the cultivation and sale of foodcrops such as yams, cassava, peanuts, maize, sorghum, millet, sesame, and plantains. The importance of foodcrops over exported crops is illustrated by the fact that the total production of cassava, the staple food of most Central Africans, ranges between c. 200,000 and 300,000 tons a year, while the production of cotton, the principal exported cash crop, ranges from c. 25,000 to 45,000 tons a year. Foodcrops are not exported in large quantities but they still constitute the principal cash crops of the country because Central Africans derive far more income from the periodic sale of surplus foodcrops than from exported cash crops such as cotton or coffee. Many rural and urban women also transform some foodcrops into drinks such as beer or liquor and derive considerable income from the sale of these drinks. Much of the income derived from the sale of foods and alcohol is not on the books and thus is not considered in calculating capita income, which is one reason why official figures for per capita income are not accurate in the case of the CAR. The per capita income of the CAR is often listed as being around $300 a year, said to be one of the lowest in the world, but this figure is based mostly on reported sales of exports and largely ignores the more important but unregistered sale of foods, locally-produced alcohol, diamonds, ivory, bushmeat, and medicines, for example. The economy of the CAR is more important than the formal economy for most Central Africans.File:Lettuce watering in CAR.jpg | Growing lettuce in the African Republic.File:Cotton field in CAR.jpg | A cotton field in the African Republic.Finance and bankingThe financial sector of the CAR, the smallest in the CEMAC, plays a limited role in supporting economic growth. Suffering from weak market infrastructure and legal and judicial frameworks, the financial system remains small, undeveloped, and dominated by commercial banks. Because of economic and security concerns, financial institutions, and particularly microfinance institutions (MFIs), have consolidated their business in the capital, Bangui, over the past few years. With less than 1 percent of the total population holding a bank account, access to financial services is extremely limited in the CAR. Microfinance accounts only for 1 percent of the total credit facilities, serving 0.5 percent of the population. Low levels of mobile penetration  which stand at 30 percent, a significantly lower percentage than in the rest of the continent  dampen the potential expansion of access to financial services through mobile technology.(MFW4A) Fishing Fishing is carried on extensively along the rivers, but most of the catch is sold or bartered on the Republic of the Congo (DRC) side of the River. In 1950,the government began a fish-farming program, and by the end of 1968 there were almost 12,000 ponds. The 2003 fish catch was about 15,000 tons. Forestry thumb|240px|The country has rich but largely unexploited natural resources; meanwhile, forestry remains an important contributor to the C. A. R. economy.There are 22.9 million hectares (56.5 million acres) of forest (37 percent of the total land area), but only 3.4 million hectares (8.4 million acres) of dense forest, all in the south in the regions bordering the DRC. The CARs exploitable forests cover 27 million hectares (68 million acres), or 43% of the total land area. Transportation bottlenecks on rivers and lack of rail connections are serious hindrances to commercial exploitation. Most timber is shipped down the Ubangi and Zaire rivers and then on the Congo railway to the Atlantic. More than a dozen types of trees are felled, but 95 percent of the total is composed of obeche, sapele, ebony, and sipo.A dozen sawmills produced 516,000 cu m (18 million cu ft ) of sawn logs and veneer logs in 2003. The government is encouraging production of plywood and veneer. Roundwood removals were estimated at 2.8 million cu m (99.7 million cu ft ) in 2003. Competition from lower-cost Asian and Latin American loggers has hurt the local industry, which is encumbered with high transportation and labor costs. In 2003, the country exported $89.8 million of forest products. Natural resources The country has rich but largely unexploited natural resources in the form of diamonds, gold, uranium, and other minerals. Diamonds constitute the most important export of the CAR, frequently accounting for 40-55% of export revenues, but an estimated 30-50% of the diamonds produced each year leave the country clandestinely. There may be petroleum deposits along the countrys northern border with Chad. Diamonds are the only of these mineral resources currently being developed; reported sales of largely uncut diamonds make up close to 60% of the CARs export earnings. Industry contributes less than 20% of the countrys GDP, with artesian diamond mining, breweries, and sawmills making up the bulk of the sector. Services currently account for 25% of GDP, largely because of the oversized government bureaucracy and high transportation costs arising from the countrys landlocked position. Economic aid and development The CAR is heavily dependent upon multilateral foreign aid and the presence of numerous NGOs which provide numerous services which the government fails to provide. As one UNDP official put it, the CAR is a country sous serum, or a country hooked up to an IV. (Mehler 2005:150) The very presence of numerous foreign personnel and organizations in the country, including peacekeepers and even camps, provides an important source of revenue for many Central Africans.thumb|240px|left|A bricklayer in Paoua, Central African Republic.In the 40 years since independence, the CAR has made slow progress toward economic development. Economic mismanagement, poor infrastructure, a limited base, scarce private investment, and adverse external conditions have led to deficits in both its budget and external trade. Its debt burden is considerable, and the country has seen a decline in per capita national product over the last 40 years. Important constraints to economic development include the CARs landlocked position, a poor transportation system, a largely unskilled work force, and a legacy of misdirected macroeconomic policies. The 50% devaluation of the currencies of 14 Francophone African nations on 12 January 1994 had mixed effects on the CARs economy. Diamond, timber, coffee, and cotton exports increased, leading an estimated rise of GDP of 70% in 1994 and nearly 50% in 1995. Military rebellions and social unrest in 1996 were accompanied by widespread destruction of property and a drop in GDP of 2%. Ongoing violence between the government and rebel military groups over pay issues, living conditions, and political representation has destroyed many businesses in the capital and reduced tax revenues for the government.The Monetary Fund (IMF) approved an Extended Structure Adjustment Facility in 1998. The government has set targets of annual 5% growth and 25% inflation for 2000-2001. Structural adjustment programs with the Bank and IMF and interest-free credits to support investments in the agriculture, livestock, and transportation sectors have had limited impact. The World Bank and IMF are now encouraging the government to concentrate exclusively on implementing much-needed economic reforms to jump-start the economy and defining its fundamental priorities with the aim of alleviating poverty. As a result, many of the state-owned business entities have been privatized and limited efforts have been made to standardize and simplify labor and investment codes and to address problems of corruption. The Central African Government is currently in the process of adopting new labor and investment codes. Statistics()GDP:purchasing power parity - $3.007 billion (2007 est.) GDP - real growth rate:4% (2007 est.) GDP - per capita:purchasing power parity - $700 (2007 est.) GDP - composition by sector:agriculture:55%industry:20%services:25% (2001 est.)Household income or consumption by percentage share:lowest 10%:0.7%highest 10%:47.7% (1993)Inflation rate (consumer prices):0.9% (2007 est.) Labor force:1.857 million (2006)Unemployment rate:8% (23% for Bangui) (2001 est.) Budget:revenues:$250 millionexpenditures:$273 million (2007 est.)Industries:diamond mining, sawmills, breweries, textiles, footwear, assembly of bicycles and motorcyclesIndustrial production growth rate:3% (2002)Electricity - production:109 million kWh (2005)Electricity - production by source:fossil fuel:19.05%hydro:80.95%nuclear:0%other:0% (1998)Electricity - consumption:101.4 million kWh (2005)Electricity - exports:0 kWh (2005)Electricity - imports:0 kWh (2005)Agriculture - products:cotton, coffee, tobacco, manioc (tapioca), yams, millet, maize, bananas; timberExports:$146.7 million (f.o.b., 2007 est.)Exports - commodities:diamonds, timber, cotton, coffee, tobaccoExports - partners:Canada 38.8%, Belgium 15.5%, Indonesia 6.5%, Italy 5.2%, France 4.8%, Spain 4.7%, Republic of the Congo 4.6% (2007) Imports:$237.3 million f.o.b. (2007 est.) Imports - commodities:food, textiles, petroleum products, machinery, electrical equipment, motor vehicles, chemicals, pharmaceuticals, consumer goods, industrial productsImports - partners:France 16.2%, Netherlands 12.7%, Cameroon 9.5%, States 6.2% (2007)Debt - external:$1.153 billion (2007 est.) Economic aid - recipient:ODA, $95.29 million; note - traditional budget subsidies from France (2005 est.) Currency:1 Communaute Financiere Africaine franc (CFAF)  100 centimesExchange rates:Communaute Financiere Africaine francs (XAF) per US dollar - 481.8 (2007), 522.59 (2006), 527.47 (2005), 528.29 (2004), 581.2 (2003Fiscal year:calendar yearSee also* African Republic* of AfricaReferencesExternal links*de la Repblica CentreafricanaStedoafrick republikyder Zentralafrikanischen Republikde la Repblica Centroafricanade la Rpublique centrafricaineda Repblica Centroafricanadi Centrafrikade Centreafricada Repblica Centro-Africana e Republiks s Afriks Qendroret Cng ha Trung Phi
5486
Military_of_the_Central_African_Republic
The Forces armes centrafricaines (FACA) are the forces of the African Republic, established after independence in 1960. Today they are a rather weak institution, dependent on international support to hold back the enemies in the current civil war. Its disloyalty to the president came to the fore during the mutinies in 19961997, but ever since then it has faced internal problems. It has been strongly criticised by human rights organisations due to its terror, including killings, torture and sexual violence.HistoryRole of military in domestic politicsThe military has played an important role in the history of African Republic. The current president, General Boziz is a former army chief-of-staff and his government includes several high-level military officers. Among the countrys five presidents since independence in 1960, three have been former army chiefs-of-staff, who have taken power through dtat. No president with military background has however been succeeded by a new military president.The countrys first president, Dacko was overthrown by his army chief-of-staff, Bokassa in 1966. Following Bokassa, David Dacko was restored in 1981, only to be overthrown once again by his new army chief of staff, General Kolingba after only a few months in power.In 1993, Patass became the first elected president of the country. He became soon unpopular within the army, resulting in violent mutinies in 19961997. In May 2001, there was an unsuccessful coup attempt by Kolingba and once again Patass had to turn to friends abroad for support, this time Libya and DR Congo were helpful. Some months later, in the end of October, Patass sacked his army chief-of-staff, Franois Boziz, and tried to arrest him. Boziz then fled to Chad and gathered a group of rebellions. In 2002, he seized Bangui for a short period. In March 2003 Boziz took power through a coup dtat .( Histoire: Rpublique centrafricaine)Importance of ethnicityWhen General Kolingba became president in 1981, he implemented an ethnicity-based recruitment policy for the administration. Kolingba was a member of the Yakoma tribe from the south of the country, which made up approximately 5% of the total population. During his rule, members of Yakoma were granted all key positions in the administration and made up a majority of the military. This later had disastrous consequences, when Kolingba was replaced by a member of a northerner tribe, Ange-Flix Patass.Army mutinies of 19961997Soon after the election 1993, Patass became unpopular within the army, not least because of his inability to pay their wages (partly due to economic mismanagement and partly because France suddenly ended its economic support for the soldiers wages). Another reason for the irritation was that most of FACA consisted of soldiers from Kolingbas ethnic group, the Yakoma. During Patasss rule they were becoming increasingly marginalised, while Patass created militias favouring his own Gbaya tribe, as well as neighbouring Sara and Kaba. This resulted in army mutinies in 19961997, where fractions of the military clashed with the presidential guard, the Unit de scurit prsidentielle (USP) and militias loyal to Patass.( UNDP: Fiche Pays: Rpublique centrafricaine (2005))* On April 18, 1996, there was a first mutiny by 200300 soldiers who claimed that they had not received their wage since 19921993. The confrontations between the soldiers and the presidential guard resulted in 9 dead and 40 wounded. French forces were supporting (Operation Almandin I) and acted negotiators. The unrest ended when the soldiers were finally paid their wages by France and the President agreed not to start legal proceedings against the soldiers.* On May 18, 1996, a second mutiny was led by 500 soldiers who refused to be disarmed and denounced the agreement reached in April. The French forces were once again called to Bangui (Operation Almadin II), supported by military from Chad and Gabon. 3,500 foreigners were evacuated during the unrest, which killed 43 persons and wounded 238.* On May 26, a peace agreement was signed between France and the mutineers. The latter were promised amnesty, allowed to retain their weapons. Their security was ensured by the French military.* On November 15, 1996, there was a third mutiny and 1,500 French soldiers were flown in to ensure the safety of the foreigners. The mutineers demanded the discharge of the president.On 6 December, a negotiation process started, facilitated by Gabon, Burkina-Faso, Chad and Mali. The military  supported by the opposition parties  keeps claiming that Patass has to resign. In January, 1997, however, the Bangui Agreements were signed and the French EFAO troop was replaced by the 1,350 soldiers of the Mission interafricaine de surveillance des Accords de Bangui (MISAB). In March, all mutineers were granted amnesty. The fighting between MISAB and the mutineers continued with a large offensive in June, resulting in up to 200 casualties. After this final clash, the mutineers stayed calm.(After the mutinies, President Patass suffered from a typical dictators paranoia, resulting in a period of cruel terror executed by the presidential guard and various militia within the FACA loyal to the president, such as the Karako. It was directed against the Yakoma tribe, of which it is estimated that 20,000 persons fled during this period. But the oppression also targeted other parts of the society. The president accused his former ally France of supporting his enemies and seeks new international ties. When he strengthened his presidential guard (creating the FORSIDIR, see below), he Libya sent him 300 additional soldiers for his own personal safety. When former President Kolingba attempted a coup dtat in 2001 (which was, according to Patass, supported by France), the for the Liberation of Congo (MLC) of Bemba in DR Congo came to his rescue.( Amnesty International: Amnesty International Report 2002)Crimes conducted by Patasss militias and Congolese soldiers during this period are now being investigated by the Criminal Court, who wrote that sexual violence appears to have been a central feature of the conflict, having identified more than 600 rape victims.( Yahoo News: ICC to investigate Central African Republic sexual violence, 22 May 2007)Present situationThe FACA has been dominated by soldiers from the Yakoma ethnic group since the time of Kolingba. It has hence been considered disloyal by the two northerner presidents Patass and Boziz, both of whom have equipped and run their own militias outside FACA. The military also proved its disloyalty during the mutinies in 19961997. Although Francois Boziz has a background in FACA himself (being its chief-of-staff from 1997 to 2001), he has been cautious by retaining the defence portfolio, as well as by appointing his son Jean-Francis Boziz cabinet director in charge of running the Ministry of Defence. He kept his old friend General Antoine Gambi as Chief of Staff. Due to failure to curb deepening unrest in the northern part of the country, Gambi was in July 2006 replaced with Bozizs old friend from the military academy, Jules Bernard Ouand.( AFRIK: Un nouveau chef pour larme centrafricaine, July 6, 2006)Militarys relations with the societyThe forces assisting Boziz in seizing the power in 2003 were not paid what they were promised and started looting, terrorising and killing ordinary citizens. Summary executions have taken place with the implicit approval of the government. The situation has deteriorated since early 2006 and the regular army and the presidential guard regularly execute exertion, torture, killings and other human rights violations. There is no possibility for the national judicial system to investigate these cases. At the end of 2006, there were an estimated 150,000 internally displaced people. During a UN mission in the northern part of the country in November 2006, the mission had a meeting with a prefect who said that he could not maintain law and order over the military and the presidential guards. The FACA conducts summary executions and burn houses. Only on the route between Kaga-Bandoro and Ouandago, some 2,000 houses have been burnt, leaving an estimated 10,000 persons homeless.( Internal displacement in Central African Republic: a protection crisis, January 26, 2007)Reform of the armyBoth the Multinational Force in the Central African Republic (FOMUC) and France are assisting in the current reform of the army. One of the key priorities of the reform of the military is make it more ethnically diversified. It should also integrate Bozizs own rebel group (mainly consisting of members of his own Gbaya tribe). Many of the Yakoma soldiers who left the country after the mutinies in 19961997 have now returned and must also be reintegrated into the army. At the same time, BONUCA holds seminars in topics such as the relationship between military and civil parts of society.( Bureau of Democracy, Human Rights, and Labor: Country Reports on Human Rights Practices  Central African Republic, March 31, 2003)EquipmentTanks*Main Battle Tanks**4 T-55 main battle tanks (operational status uncertain) (Military Balance 2010, page 299) (USSR)Armoured cars*32 Ferret (operational status uncertain)( (United Kingdom)*4 BRDM-2 (operation status uncertain) ( (USSR)APC*10 VAB-VTT (operational status uncertain)( (France)*4 BTR-152 (operation status uncertain) ( (USSR)*25 ACMAT (France)IFV* 18 IFV (South Africa)*3 OT-90 (Slovakia)Artillery*12 recoilless rifle (operation status uncertain)( (United States)*12 mortar (operation status uncertain)( (USSR)*5 Grad (USSR)*10 M101 105mm towed howitzer (United States)Anti-tank missiles*10 MBDA Milan ATGM launchers (France/Germany)*10 BGM-71C TOW ATGM launchers (United States)*10 RPG-7 ATRLs (USSR)Anti-aircraft weapons*ZPU-1\2\4 (USSR)Personal weapons*IMI UZI (Israel)*FAL 50-00 (Belgium)*H&K G3 (Germany)*AKM\AK-47 (USSR)*MAG (Belgium)*RPD (USSR)*Browning M2HB (United States)Foreign military presence in support of the GovernmentPeacekeeping and peace enforcing forcesSince the mutinies, a number of peacekeeping and peace enforcing international missions have been present in Central African Republic. There has been a discussion of the deployment of a regional Nations (UN) peacekeeping force in both Chad and Central African Republic. But it is considered to shore up the ineffectual Darfur Peace Agreement. The missions deployed in the country during the last 10 years are the following:( Sudan Issue Brief: A widening war around Sudan  The proliferation of armed groups in the Central African Republic, January 2007)ChadIn addition to the multilateral forces, there have been bilateral support from other African countries, such as the Libyan and Congolese support to Patass, mentioned above. Boziz is in many ways dependent on Chad support. Chad has an interest in CAR, since it needs to ensure calmness close to its oil fields and the pipeline leading to the Cameroonian coast, close to the troubled northwest CAR. Before seizing power, Boziz built up his rebel force in Chad, trained and augmented by the Chadian. President Dby assisted him actively in taking the power in March 2003 (his rebel forces included 100 Chadian soldiers). After the coup, another 400 soldiers were sent. Current direct support includes the 150 non-FOMUC Chadian troops that patrol the border area near Gor, the Chadian soldiers patrolling Bangui, but most of all the Chadian soldiers within the presidential lifeguard.( The CEMAC Force includes 121 Chadian soldiers.FranceThere has been an almost uninterrupted French military presence in Central African Republic since independence, regulated through agreements between the two Governments. The French troops were allowed to be based in the country and to intervene in cases of destabilisation. This was particularly important during the cold war era, when Francophone Africa was regarded as a natural French sphere of influence.Additionally, the strategic location of the country made it a more interesting location for military bases than its neighbours and Bouar and Bangui were hence two of the most important French bases abroad.However, in 1997, following Lionel Jospins expression Neither interference nor indifference, France came to adopt new strategic principles for its presence in Africa. This included a reduced permanent presence on the continent and an increased support to multilateral interventions.( New York Times: Out of Africa? Not the French, 12 January 2003) In Central African Republic, the Bouar base and the Bal Camp (at that time home to 1,400 French soldiers) in Bangui were shut down, as the French concentrated its African presence to Abidjan, Dakar, Djibouti, Libreville and NDjamena and the deployment of a Force daction rapide, based in France.( Guy Martin: Frances African policy in transition: disengagement and redeployment, University of Virginia, 2000)However, due to the situation in the country, France has retained a military presence. During the mutinies, 2,400 French soldiers were patrolling the streets of Bangui. Their official task was to evacuate foreign citizens, but this did not prevent direct confrontations with the mutineers (resulting in French and mutineer casualties). The level of French involvement resulted in protests among the Central African population, since many took party for the mutineers and accused France of defending a dictator against the peoples will. Voices were also heard in France where some blamed France for its protection of a discredited ruler, totally incapable of exerting power and managing the country.( Francis Laloupo: Centrafrique, un  destin  confisqu) After the mutinies in 1997, the MISAB was a multilateral force, but it was armed, equipped, trained and managed by France. The Chadian, Gabonese and Congolese soldiers of the current Force multinationale en Centrafrique (FOMUC) mission in the country also enjoys logistical support from French soldiers.A study carried out by the US Congressional Research Service reveals however that France has again increased its arms sales to Africa and during the 19982005 period, France was the leading supplier of arms to the continent.( William Church: Africa: France Increases Arms Sales and Intervention, November 6, 2006)Components and unitsAir ForceThe Force is almost inoperable. Lack of Funding has almost grounded the airforce apart from an AS 350 Ecureuil delivered in 1987. Mirage F1 planes from the French Air Force regularly patrol troubled regions of the country and also participate in direct confrontations.( Inter-agency Mission to Birao (CAR): 16 to 23 January 2007) According to some sources, Boziz used the money he got from the mining concession in Bakouma to buy two old MI 8 helicopters from Ukraine and one Hercules C 130, built in the 1950s, from USA.( Centrafrique : Boziz ou la chronique dune chute annonce, 2004) The air force operates otherwise 7 light aircraft, including a single helicopter:! styletext-align: left; background: #aacccc;|Aircraft! styletext-align: left; background: #aacccc;|Origin! styletext-align: left; background: #aacccc;|Type! styletext-align: left; background: #aacccc;|Versions! styletext-align: left; background: #aacccc;|In service(World Military Aircraft Inventory, Aerospace Source Book 2007, Week & Space Technology, January 15, 2007.)! styletext-align: left; background: #aacccc;|Notes|-----| AL-60| Italy| Utility| AL-60C-5 Conestoga| 6||-----| Eurocopter AS 350 Ecureuil| France| Utility helicopter| AS 350B| 1||-----| Mil Mi-8 Hip| Ukraine| Transport Helicopter| Mi-8| 2| Unconfirmed|-----| C-130 Hercules| United States| Transport| C-130| 1| Unconfirmed Garde rpublicaine (GR)GR consists of so called patriots that fought for Boziz when he seized power in 2003 (mainly from the Gbaya tribe), together with soldiers from Chad. They are guilty of numerous assaults on the civil population, such as terror, aggression, sexual violence. Only a couple of months after Bozizs seizure of power, in May 2003, taxi and truck drivers conducted a strike against these outrages.(New amphibious forceBoziz has created an amphibious force. It is called the Second Battalion of the Ground Forces and it patrols the Ubangi river. The staff of the sixth region in Bouali (mainly made up of members of the former presidents lifeguard) was transferred to the city of Mongoumba, located on the river. This city had previously been plundered by forces from MLC, that had crossed the border.( Actualit Centrafrique de sangonet  Dossier 16: Le prsident Boziz cre deux nouveaux bataillons, April 25, 2003)Veteran SoldiersA program for disarmament and reintegration of veteran soldiers is currently taking place. A national commission for the disarmament, demobilisation and reintegration was put in place in September 2004. The commission is in charge of implementing a program wherein approximately 7,500 veteran soldiers will be reintegrated in civil life and obtain education.(Discontinued groups and units that are no longer part of FACA*  FORSIDIR: The presidential lifeguard, Unit de scurit prsidentielle (USP), was in March 1998 transformed to the Force spciale de dfense des institutions rpublicaines (FORSDIR). In contrary to the army  which consisted mainly of southerner Yakoma members and which thereby was unreliable for the northerner president  this unit consisted of northerners loyal to the president. Before eventually being dissolved in January 2,000, this highly controversial group became feared for their terror and troubled Patasss relation with important international partners, such as France. Of its 1,400 staff, 800 were subsequently reintegrated into FACA, under the command of the chief-of-staff. The remaining 400 recreated the USP (once again under the command of the chief-of-staff).(*  Unit de scurit prsidentielle (USP):  USP was Patasss presidential guard before and after FORSIDIR. When he was overthrown by Boziz in 2003, the USP was dissolved and while some of the soldiers have been absorbed by FACA, others are believed to have joined the pro-Patass rebel group FDPC that is fighting FACA in the north of the country.(*  The Patriots or Liberators:  Accompanied Boziz when he seized power in March 2003. They are now a part of Bozizs lifeguard, the Garde rpublicaine, together with soldiers from Chad.(*  Office central de rpression du banditisme (OCRB): OCRB was a special unit within the police created to fight the looting after the army mutinies in 1996 and 1997. OCRB was guilty of numerous summary executions and arbitrary detentions, for which it has never been put on trial.(*  MLPC Militia:  Le Mouvement de libration du peuple centrafricain (MLPC) was the former president, Patasss political party. Its militia was active already during the 1993 election, but was strengthened during the mutinies 1996 and 1997, particularly through its Karako militia. Its core consisted of Sara people from Chad and Central African Republic but during the mutinies it recruited many young people in Bangui.(*  DRC Militia: Rassemblement dmocratique centrafricain (RDC) is the party of General Kolingba who was president during the 1980s. Its militia is said to have camps in Mobaye and have bonds to former officials of Kolingbas cousin Sese Seko in DR Congo.(ReferencesExternal links*France donates equipment to CAR, Defence Weekly, 28 January 2004, p. 20. First of three planned battalions of new army completed training and guaduated 15 January 2004. See also JDW 12 November 2003.*Africa Research Bulletin: Political, Social and Cultural Series, Volume 43 Issue 12, Pages 16909A  16910A, Published Online: 26 January 2007: Operation Boali, French aid mission to FACA*CIA World Factbook*US Department of State  Bureau of African Affairs: Background note   centrafricaine
5489
Chile
footnote7                   Chile ,()officially the Republic of Chile ( ), is a country in America occupying a long, narrow coastal strip between the Andes mountains to the east and the Ocean to the west. It borders Peru to the north, Bolivia to the northeast, Argentina to the east, and the Passage in the far south. Along with Ecuador, it is one of two countries in South America that do not border Brazil. The Pacific coastline of Chile is 78,563.2 kilometres.() Chilean territory includes the Pacific islands of Juan Fernndez, y Gmez, Desventuradas and Island. Chile also claims about  of Antarctica, although all claims are suspended under the Treaty.The shape of Chile is a distinctive ribbon of land  long and on average  wide. Its climate varies, ranging from the worlds driest desert  the Atacama  in the north, through a climate in the centre, to a rainy temperate climate in the south.() The northern desert contains great mineral wealth, principally copper. The relatively small central area dominates in terms of population and agricultural resources, and is the cultural and political center from which Chile expanded in the late 19th century, when it incorporated its northern and southern regions. Southern Chile is rich in forests and grazing lands and features a string of volcanoes and lakes. The southern coast is a labyrinth of fjords, inlets, canals, twisting peninsulas, and islands.()Prior to the arrival of the Spanish in the 16th century, northern Chile was under Inca rule while the indigenous Mapuche inhabited central and southern Chile. Chile declared its independence from Spain on February 12, 1818. In the of the Pacific (187983), Chile defeated Peru and Bolivia and won its current northern territory. It was not until the 1880s that the Mapuche were completely subjugated.() Although relatively free of the coups and arbitrary governments that blighted South America, Chile endured the 17-year long military dictatorship (19731990) of Pinochet that left more than 3,000 people dead or missing.(Today, Chile is one of South Americas most stable and prosperous nations( and a recognized power.() It leads Latin American nations in human development, competitiveness, income per capita, globalization, economic freedom, low perception of corruption and state of peace.() It also ranks high regionally in of the press and democratic development. However, it has a high inequality, as measured by the index.() In May 2010 Chile became the first South American nation to join the OECD.() Chile is a founding member of both the Nations and the of South American Nations.EtymologyThere are various theories about the origin of the word Chile. According to a theory by 17th century Spanish chronicler de Rosales,() the Incas of Peru called the valley of the Aconcagua Chili by corruption of the name of a Picunche chief (cacique) called Tili, who ruled the area at the time of the Incan conquest in the 15th century.()() Another theory points to the similarity of the valley of the Aconcagua with that of the Valley in Peru, where there was a town and valley named Chili.(Other theories say Chile may derive its name from a Native American word meaning either ends of the earth or sea gulls;() from the Mapuche word chilli, which may mean where the land ends;() or from the Quechua chiri, cold,(CHILE. Encyclopdia Britannica. 11th ed. 1911. (derived, it is said, from the Quichua chiri, cold, or tchili, snow)) or tchili, meaning either snow(( Archived 2009-10-31.) or the deepest point of the Earth.() Another origin attributed to chilli is the onomatopoeic cheele-cheelethe Mapuche imitation of the warble of a bird locally known as trile.(() The Spanish conquistadors heard about this name from the Incas, and the few survivors of de Almagros first Spanish expedition south from Peru in 153536 called themselves the men of Chilli.( Ultimately, Almagro is credited with the universalization of the name Chile, after naming the Mapocho valley as such.(HistoryEarly history and colonizationFile:Urville-Araucanians.jpg|thumb|The Mapuche people were the original inhabitants of southern and central ChileAbout 10,000 years ago, migrating Native Americans settled in fertile valleys and coastal areas of what is present-day Chile. Example settlement sites from the very early human habitation are Verde, del Milodon and the Aike Craters tube. The Incas briefly extended their empire into what is now northern Chile, but the Mapuche (or Araucanians as they were known by the Spaniards) successfully resisted many attempts by the Inca Empire to subjugate them, despite their lack of state organization.() They fought against the Sapa Inca Tupac Yupanqui and his army. The result of the bloody three-day confrontation known as the of the Maule was that the Inca conquest of the territories of Chile ended at the river.(In 1520, while attempting to circumnavigate the earth, Magellan discovered the southern passage now named after him, the of Magellan. The next Europeans to reach Chile were Diego de Almagro and his band of Spanish conquistadors, who came from Peru in 1535 seeking gold. The Spanish encountered various cultures that supported themselves principally through slash-and-burn agriculture and hunting. The conquest of Chile began in earnest in 1540 and was carried out by de Valdivia, one of Pizarros lieutenants, who founded the city of Santiago on February 12, 1541. Although the Spanish did not find the extensive gold and silver they sought, they recognized the agricultural potential of Chiles central valley, and Chile became part of the Empire.(File:Ohiggins.jpg|thumb|left|upright|OHiggins, Supreme Director of ChileConquest of the land took place gradually, and the Europeans suffered repeated setbacks at the hands of the local population. A massive Mapuche insurrection that began in 1553 resulted in Valdivias death and the destruction of many of the colonys principal settlements. Subsequent major insurrections took place in 1598 and in 1655. Each time the Mapuche and other native groups revolted, the southern border of the colony was driven northward. The abolition of slavery by the Spanish crown in 1683 was done in recognition that enslaving the Mapuche intensified resistance rather than cowing them into submission. Despite the royal prohibitions relations remained strained from continual colonialist interference.()Cut off to the north by desert, to the south by the Mapuche, to the east by the Andes Mountains, and to the west by the ocean, Chile became one of the most centralized, homogeneous colonies in Spanish America. Serving as a sort of frontier garrison, the colony found itself with the mission of forestalling encroachment by both the Mapuche and Spains European enemies, especially the British and the Dutch. Buccaneers and English adventurers menaced the colony in addition to the Mapuche, as was shown by Francis Drakes 1578 raid on Valparaso, the colonys principal port. Chile hosted one of the largest standing armies in the Americas, making it one of the most militarized of the Spanish possessions, as well as a drain on the treasury of the Viceroyalty of Peru.(The first general census was performed by the government of de Juregui between 1777 and 1778; it indicated that the population consisted of 259,646 inhabitants: 73.5% of European descent, 7.9% mestizos, 8.6% Indians and 9.8% blacks. Francisco Hurtado, Governor of the province of Chilo, conducted a census there in 1784 and found the population consisted of 26,703 inhabitants, 64.4% of which were whites and 33.5% of which were natives.The Diocese of Concepcin conducted a census of areas south of the river in 1812, but did not include the indigenous population or the inhabitants of the province of Chilo. The population is estimated at 210,567, 86.1% of which were Spanish or of European descent, 10% of which were Indians and 3.7% of which were mestizos, blacks and mulattos.()IndependenceThe usurpation of the Spanish throne by Napoleons brother Joseph in 1808 precipitated the drive by the colony for independence from Spain. A national junta in the name of Ferdinand  heir to the deposed king  was formed on September 18, 1810. The Government Junta of Chile proclaimed Chile an autonomous republic within the Spanish monarchy (in memory of this day Chile celebrates its National Day on September 18 each year). After these events, a movement for total independence, under the command of Miguel Carrera (one of the most renowned patriots) and his two brothers Juan Jos and Carrera, soon gained a wider following. Spanish attempts to re-impose arbitrary rule during what was called the Reconquista led to a prolonged struggle, including infighting from OHiggins, who challenged Carreras leadership.Intermittent warfare continued until 1817. With Carrera in prison in Argentina, OHiggins and anti-Carrera cohort de San Martn, hero of the War of Independence, led an army that crossed the Andes into Chile and defeated the royalists. On February 12, 1818, Chile was proclaimed an independent republic. The political revolt brought little social change, however, and 19th century Chilean society preserved the essence of the stratified colonial social structure, which was greatly influenced by family politics and the Catholic Church. A strong presidency eventually emerged, but wealthy landowners remained powerful.(File:Combate naval.jpg|thumb|War of the Pacific: The of Iquique on May 21, 1879Toward the end of the 19th century, the government in Santiago consolidated its position in the south by suppressing the Mapuche during the of Araucana. A treaty with Argentina confirming Chilean sovereignty over the Strait of Magellan was signed in 1881. As a result of the War of the Pacific with Peru and Bolivia (187983), Chile expanded its territory northward by almost one-third, eliminating Bolivias access to the Pacific, and acquired valuable nitrate deposits, the exploitation of which led to an era of national affluence.The Civil War in 1891 brought about a redistribution of power between the President and Congress, and Chile established a parliamentary style democracy. However, the Civil War had also been a contest between those who favored the development of local industries and powerful Chilean banking interests, particularly the House of Edwards who had strong ties to foreign investors.20th centuryThe Chilean economy partially degenerated into a system protecting the interests of a ruling oligarchy. By the 1920s, the emerging middle and classes were powerful enough to elect a reformist president, Alessandri, whose program was frustrated by a conservative congress. In the 1920s, Marxist groups with strong popular support arose.(A military coup led by General Altamirano in 1924 set off a period of great political instability that lasted until 1932. The longest lasting of the ten governments between those years was that of General Ibez del Campo, who briefly held power in 1925 and then again between 1927 and 1931 in what was a de facto dictatorship, although not really comparable in harshness or corruption to the type of military dictatorship that has often bedeviled the rest of Latin America .()()By relinquishing power to a democratically elected successor, Ibez del Campo retained the respect of a large enough segment of the population to remain a viable politician for more than thirty years, in spite of the vague and shifting nature of his ideology. When constitutional rule was restored in 1932, a strong middle-class party, the Radicals, emerged. It became the key force in coalition governments for the next 20 years. During the period of Radical Party dominance (193252), the state increased its role in the economy. In 1952, voters returned Ibez del Campo to office for another six years. Alessandri succeeded Ibez del Campo in 1958, bringing Chilean conservatism back into power democratically for another term.The 1964 presidential election of Christian Democrat Frei Montalva by an majority initiated a period of major reform. Under the slogan Revolution in Liberty, the Frei administration embarked on far-reaching social and economic programs, particularly in education, housing, and reform, including rural unionization of agricultural workers. By 1967, however, Frei encountered increasing opposition from leftists, who charged that his reforms were inadequate, and from conservatives, who found them excessive. At the end of his term, Frei had not fully achieved his partys ambitious goals.()In the 1970 election, Senator Allende of the Party of Chile (part of the Unity coalition which included the Communists, Radicals, Social-Democrats, dissident Christian Democrats, the Popular Unitary Action Movement, and the Independent Popular Action),( achieved a partial majority in a plurality of votes in a three-way contest, followed by candidates Radomiro Tomic for the Christian Democrat Party and Jorge Alessandri for the Conservative Party. Allende was not elected with an absolute majority, receiving fewer than 35% of votes. It became a war of classes, motivated by the central government.Despite pressure from the States government, the Chilean Congress conducted a runoff vote between the leading candidates, Allende and former president Jorge Alessandri and keeping with tradition, chose Allende by a vote of 153 to 35. Frei refused to form an alliance with Alessandri to oppose Allende, on the grounds that the Christian Democrats were a workers party and could not make common cause with the right-wing.()()An depression that began in 1972 was exacerbated by flight, plummeting private investment, and withdrawal of bank deposits in response to Allendes socialist program. Production fell and unemployment rose. Allende adopted measures including price freezes, wage increases, and tax reforms, to increase consumer spending and redistribute income downward.() Joint public-private works projects helped reduce unemployment.() Much of the banking sector was nationalized. Many enterprises within the copper, coal, iron, nitrate, and steel industries were expropriated, nationalized, or subjected to state intervention. Industrial output increased sharply and unemployment fell during the Allende administrations first year.(File:Pin8.JPG|thumb|PinochetAllendes program included advancement of workers interests,(() replacing the judicial system with socialist legality,() nationalization of banks and forcing others to bankruptcy,( and strengthening popular militias known as MIR.() Started under former President Frei, the Popular Unity platform also called for nationalization of Chiles major copper mines in the form of a constitutional amendment. The measure was passed unanimously by Congress.As a result,() the Nixon administration organized and inserted secret operatives in Chile, in order to quickly destabilize Allendes government.() In addition, American financial pressure restricted international economic credit to Chile.()The economic problems were also exacerbated by Allendes public spending which was financed mostly by printing money and poor credit ratings given by commercial banks.()Simultaneously, opposition media, politicians, business guilds and other organizations helped to accelerate a campaign of domestic political and economical destabilization, some of which was helped by the United States.(() By early 1973, inflation was out of control. The crippled economy was further battered by prolonged and sometimes simultaneous strikes by physicians, teachers, students, truck owners, copper workers, and the small business class.On 26 May 1973, Chiles Supreme Court, which was opposed to Allendes government, unanimously denounced the Allende disruption of the legality of the nation. Although illegal under the Chilean constitution, the court supported and strengthened Pinochets seizure of power.(()Finally, a military coup overthrew Allende on September 11, 1973. As the armed forces bombarded the presidential palace, Allende apparently committed suicide.()() A military junta, led by General Pinochet Ugarte, took over control of the country. The first years of the regime were marked by rights violations. On October 1973, at least 72 people were murdered by the of Death.() According to the Report and Commission, at least 2,115 were killed,() and at least 27,265 () were tortured (including 88 children younger than 12 years old).( A new Constitution was approved by a controversial plebiscite on September 11, 1980, and General Pinochet became president of the republic for an 8-year term. After Pinochet obtained rule of the country, several hundred committed Chilean revolutionaries joined the Sandinista army in Nicaragua, guerrilla forces in Argentina or training camps in Cuba, Europe and Africa.(Pamela Constable and Arturo Valenzuela (1991). A Nation of Enemies: Chile Under Pinochet, P. 150)In the late 1980s, largely as a result of events such as the 1982 economic collapse(Naomi Klein (2007). The Shock Doctrine, P. 85) and mass resistance in 198388, the government gradually permitted greater freedom of assembly, speech, and association, to include trade union and political activity.(Carlos Huneeus, Political Mass Mobilization against Authoritarian Rule: Pinochets Chile, 198388, in Adam Roberts and Garton Ash (eds.), Civil Resistance and Power Politics: The Experience of Non-violent Action from Gandhi to the Present. Oxford & New York: Oxford University Press, 2009, pp. 197212. ISBN 978-0-19-955201-6.) The government launched market-oriented reforms with Bchi as Minister of Finance, but poverty levels continued growing.() Chile moved toward a market economy that saw an increase in domestic and foreign private investment, although the copper industry and other important mineral resources were not opened for competition. In a plebiscite on October 5, 1988, General Pinochet was denied a second 8-year term as president (56% against 44%). Chileans elected a new president and the majority of members of a two-chamber congress on December 14, 1989. Christian Democrat Aylwin, the candidate of a coalition of 17 political parties called the Concertacin, received an absolute majority of votes (55%).() President Aylwin served from 1990 to 1994, in what was considered a transition period.In December 1993, Christian Democrat Frei Ruiz-Tagle, the son of previous president Eduardo Frei Montalva, led the Concertacin coalition to victory with an absolute majority of votes (58%).(http://www.encyclopedia.con/doc/1P2-8257609.html)21st centuryFrei Ruiz-Tagle was succeeded in 2000 by Socialist Lagos, who won the presidency in an unprecedented election against Lavn of the rightist for Chile.() In January 2006, Chileans elected their first female president, Bachelet Jeria, of the Socialist Party, defeating Piera, of the National Renewal party, extending the Concertacin government for another four years.()() In January 2010, Chileans elected Piera, of the National Renewal party, as the first rightist President in 20 years, defeating former President Frei Ruiz-Tagle of the Concertacin, for a four-year term succeeding Bachelet.On February 27, 2010, Chile was struck by an 8.8 MW earthquake, one of the largest ever recorded in the world. As many as 500 people died; hundreds of thousands of buildings were damaged. The earthquake was also followed by multiple aftershocks.() Initial damage estimates were in the range of US$1530 billion, around 10% to 15% of Chile real gross domestic product.(More Quakes Shake Chiles Infrastructure, Adam Figman, Contract Magazine, March 1, 2010) On March 11, 2010, a 6.9-magnitude earthquake occurred southwest of Pichilemu, Region. The earthquake was felt across much of Chile.()On August 5, 2010 an access tunnel caved in at the San Jos copper and gold mine. 33 miners were trapped 700 meters underground. The miners were discovered alive on August 22; it took nearly two more months before an escape path could be created to rescue the miners. In a 24-hour period between October 12 and 13, more than 1 billion people watched the culmination of the two-month rescue live on television networks around the world. The survival of the San Jos miners surpasses a 25-day rescue of three coal miners from a flooded mine in Guizhou, China, in 2009.PoliticsFile:Palacio de La Moneda.png|thumb|The de La Moneda in downtown SantiagoThe current Constitution of Chile was approved in a national plebiscite in September 1980, under the military government of Augusto Pinochet. It entered into force in March 1981. After Pinochets defeat in the 1988 plebiscite, the constitution was amended to ease provisions for future amendments to the Constitution. In September 2005, President Ricardo Lagos signed into law several constitutional amendments passed by Congress. These include eliminating the positions of appointed senators and for life, granting the President authority to remove the commanders-in-chief of the armed forces, and reducing the presidential term from six to four years.()Chileans voted in the first round of presidential elections on December 13, 2009. None of the four presidential candidates got more than 50% of the vote. As a result, the top two candidates, center-left de Partidos por la Democracia coalitions Frei Ruiz-Tagle and center-right por el Cambio coalitions Piera, competed in a run-off election on January 17, 2010, which Piera won. This was Chiles fifth presidential election since the end of the Pinochet era. All five have been judged free and fair. The president is constitutionally barred from serving consecutive terms.The of Chile has a 38-seat Senate and a 120-member Chamber of Deputies. Senators serve for 8 years with staggered terms, while deputies are elected every 4 years. The current Senate has a 2018 split in favor of the opposition coalition. The last congressional elections were held on December 13, 2009, concurrently with the presidential election. The current lower house-the Chamber of Deputies-contains 58 members of the governing center-right coalition, 54 from the center-left opposition and 8 from small parties or independents. The Congress is located in the port city of Valparaso, about 140 kilometres (84 mi) west of the capital, Santiago.Chiles congressional elections are governed by a binomial system that rewards the two largest representations. Therefore, there are only two senate and two deputy seats apportioned to each electoral district, parties are forced to form wide coalitions and, historically, the two largest coalitions (Concertacin and Alianza) split most of the seats in a district. Only if the leading coalition ticket out-polls the second place coalition by a margin of more than 2-to-1 does the winning coalition gain both seats.In the 2001 congressional elections, the conservative Democratic Union surpassed the Christian Democrats for the first time to become the largest party in the lower house. In the 2005 parliamentary election, both leading parties, the Christian Democrats and the UDI lost representation in favor of their respective allies Socialist Party (which became the biggest party in the Concertacin block) and National Renewal in the right-wing alliance. In the last legislative elections in Chile, the Communist Party won 3 out of 120 seats in the Chamber of Deputies for the first time in 30 years (the Communisty Party was not allowed to exist as such during the dictatorship).Chiles judiciary is independent and includes a court of appeal, a system of military courts, a constitutional tribunal, and the Court of Chile. In June 2005, Chile completed a nationwide overhaul of its criminal justice system.() The reform has replaced inquisitorial proceedings with an adversarial system more similar to that of the United States.DefenseNational Police, CarabinerosFile:Almirante Blanco Encalada (FF-15).jpg|thumb|left|Navy frigate Almirante Blanco Encalada (FF-15) at Harbor during RIMPAC exercises.Chiles Armed Forces are subject to civilian control exercised by the president through the Minister of Defense. The president has the authority to remove the commanders-in-chief of the armed forces.(The commander in chief of the Army is General Juan Miguel Fuente-Alba Poblete. The Chilean Army is 45,000 strong and is organized with an Army headquarters in Santiago, seven divisions throughout its territory, an Air Brigade in Rancagua, and a Special Forces Command in Colina. The Chilean Army is one of the most professional and technologically advanced armies in Latin America.(Admiral Edmundo Gonzalez Robles directs the 21,773-person Navy,() including 2,500 Marines. Of the fleet of 29 surface vessels, only eight are operational major combatants (frigates). Those ships are based in Valparaso.() The Navy operates its own aircraft for transport and patrol; there are no Navy fighter or bomber aircraft. The Navy also operates four submarines based in Talcahuano.(()Gen. Ricardo Ortega Perrier heads the 12,500 strong Air Force. Air assets are distributed among five air brigades headquartered in Iquique, Antofagasta, Santiago, Puerto Montt, and Punta Arenas. The Air Force also operates an airbase on King George Island, Antarctica. The Air Force took delivery of the final 2 of 10 F-16s, all purchased from the U.S., in March 2007 after several decades of U.S. debate and previous refusal to sell. Chile also took delivery in 2007 of a number of reconditioned Block 15 F-16s from the Netherlands, bringing to 18 the total of F-16s purchased from the Dutch.(After the military coup in September 1973, the Chilean national police (Carabineros) were incorporated into the Defense Ministry. With the return of democratic government, the police were placed under the operational control of the Interior Ministry but remained under the nominal control of the Defense Ministry. Gen. Eduardo Gordon is the head of the national police force of 40,964(Carabineros de Chile, accessed on May 31, 2008) men and women who are responsible for law enforcement, traffic management, narcotics suppression, border control, and counter-terrorism throughout Chile.(Foreign relationsFile:Sebastin Piera - David Cameron.jpg|thumb|upright|left|Sebastin Piera with Minister of the United Kingdom, Cameron, outside Downing Street, London.Since the early decades after independence, Chile has always had an active involvement in foreign affairs. In 1837 the country aggressively challenged the dominance of Perus port of Callao for preeminence in the Pacific trade routes, defeating the short-lived alliance between Peru and Bolivia, the Confederation (183639) in the of the Confederation. The war dissolved the confederation while distributing power in the Pacific. A second international war, the War of the Pacific (187983), further increased Chiles regional role, while adding considerably to its territory.(During the 19th century, Chiles commercial ties were primarily with Britain, a country that had a decisive influence on the organization of the navy. The French influenced Chiles legal and educational systems and had a decisive impact on Chile, through the architecture of the capital in the boom years at the turn of the century. German influence came from the organization and training of the army by Prussians.(On June 26, 1945, Chile participated as a founding member of the United Nations being among 50 countries that signed the Nations Charter in Francisco, California.()()() With the military coup of 1973, Chile became isolated politically as a result of widespread human rights abuses.(Since its return to democracy in 1990, Chile has been an active participant in the international political arena. Chile completed a 2-year non-permanent position on the UN Security Council in January 2005. Jose Miguel Insulza, a Chilean national, was elected Secretary General of the Organization of American States in May 2005 and confirmed in his position, being re-elected in 2009. Chile is currently serving on the International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA) Board of Governors, and the 20072008 chair of the board is Chiles ambassador to the IAEA, Milenko E. Skoknic. The country is an active member of the UN family of agencies and participates in UN peacekeeping activities. It is currently bidding for a seat on the UN Human Rights Council. Chile hosted the Defense Ministerial of the Americas in 2002 and the APEC summit and related meetings in 2004. It also hosted the Community of Democracies ministerial in April 2005 and the Ibero-American Summit in November 2007. An associate member of Mercosur and a full member of APEC, Chile has been an important actor on international economic issues and hemispheric free trade.(The Chilean Government has diplomatic relations with most countries. It settled its territorial disputes with Argentina during the 1990s. Chile and Bolivia severed diplomatic ties in 1978 over Bolivias desire to reacquire territory it lost to Chile in 187983 War of the Pacific. The two countries maintain consular relations and are represented at the Consul General level.(Administrative divisionsChile is divided into 15 regions, each headed by an intendant appointed by the president. The regions are further divided into provinces, with provincial governors also appointed by the president. Finally each province is divided into communes() which are administered by municipalities, each with its own mayor and council elected for four year terms. Each region is designated by a name and a numeral, assigned from north to south. The only exception is the Santiago Metropolitan Region which is designated RM (Regin Metropolitana). Two new regions were created in 2006 and became operative in October 2007; Los Ros in the south (Region XIV), and Arica y Parinacota in the north (Region XV). The numbering scheme skipped Region XIII.GeographyFile:Parinacota volcano.jpg|thumb|Volcano in northern ChileA long and narrow coastal Cone country on the west side of the Mountains, Chile stretches over 4,630 kilometres (2,880 mi) north to south, but only 430 kilometres (265 mi) at its widest point east to west. This encompasses a remarkable variety of landscapes. It contains  of land area. It is situated within the Ring of Fire. Including its offshore islands, but excluding its Antarctic claim, Chile lies between latitudes 17 and 56S, and longitudes 66 and 81W.The northern Desert contains great mineral wealth, primarily copper and nitrates. The relatively small Central Valley, which includes Santiago, dominates the country in terms of population and agricultural resources. This area also is the historical center from which Chile expanded in the late 19th century, when it integrated the northern and southern regions. Southern Chile is rich in forests, grazing lands, and features a string of volcanoes and lakes. The southern coast is a labyrinth of fjords, inlets, canals, twisting peninsulas, and islands. The Andes Mountains are located on the eastern border. Chile is the longest north-south country in the world, and also claims  of Antarctica as part of its territory. However, this latter claim is suspended under the terms of the Treaty, of which Chile is a signatory.()Chile controls Easter Island and y Gmez Island, the easternmost islands of Polynesia, which it incorporated to its territory in 1888, and Crusoe Island, more than  from the mainland, in the Fernndez Islands. Island is today a province of Chile. Also controlled but only temporarily inhabited (by some local fishermen) are the small islands of Sala y Gmez, San Ambrosio and San Felix. These islands are notable because they extend Chiles claim to territorial waters out from its coast into the Pacific.()ClimateThe climate of Chile comprises a wide range of weather conditions across a large geographic scale, extending across 38 degrees in latitude, making generalisations difficult. According to the Kppen system, Chile within its borders hosts at least seven major climatic subtypes, ranging from desert in the north, to tundra and glaciers in the east and south east, subtropical in Easter Island, Oceanic in the south and Mediterranean climate in central Chile. There are four seasons in most of the country: summer (December to February), autumn (March to May), winter (June to August), and spring (September to November).BiodiversityFile:BeagleChannelGlacier.jpg|thumb|left|A glacier at Channel in southern ChileFile:Sephanoides fernandensis.jpg|thumb|Fernndez FirecrownFaunaChiles geographical isolation also has restricted the immigration of faunal life, so that only a few of the many distinctive South American animals are found. Among the larger mammals are the puma or cougar, the llama-like guanaco and the fox-like chilla. In the forest region, several types of marsupials and a small deer known as the pudu are found.(There are many species of small birds, but most of the larger common Latin American types are absent. Few freshwater fish are native, but North American trout have been successfully introduced into the Andean lakes.( Owing to the vicinity of the Humboldt Current, ocean waters abound with fish and other forms of marine life, which in turn support a rich variety of waterfowl, including several penguins. Whales are abundant, and some six species of seals are found in the area.(FungiJust over 3,000 species of fungi are recorded in Chile,(Oehrens, E.B. Flora Fungosa Chilena. Universidad de Chile, Santiago de Chile, 1980)() but this number is far from complete. The true total number of fungal species occurring in Chile is likely to be far higher, given the generally accepted estimate that only about 7% of all fungi worldwide have so far been discovered.(Kirk, P.M., Cannon, P.F., Minter, D.W. and Stalpers, J. Dictionary of the Fungi. Edn 10. CABI, 2008) Although the amount of available information is still very small, a first effort has been made to estimate the number of fungal species endemic to Chile, and 1995 species have been tentatively identified as possible endemics of the country.()FloraThe northernmost coastal and central region is largely barren of vegetation, approaching the most closely an absolute desert in the world.()On the slopes of the Andes, besides the scattered tola desert brush, grasses are found. The central valley is characterized by several species of cacti, the hardy espinos, the Chilean pine, the southern beeches and the copihue, a red bell-shaped flower that is Chiles national flower.(In southern Chile, south of the Biobo River, heavy precipitation has produced dense forests of laurels, magnolias, and various species of conifers and beeches, which become smaller and more stunted to the south.()The cold temperatures and winds of the extreme south preclude heavy forestation. Grassland is found in Atlantic Chile (in Patagonia). Much of the Chilean flora is distinct from that of neighboring Argentina, indicating that the Andean barrier existed during its formation.(EconomyImage:Costaneratitanium.jpg|thumb|left|Santiagos financial district. Pictured: La Portada (left) and Gran Costanera (right) (May 2011).Chile is one of South Americas most stable and prosperous nations,( leading Latin American nations in human development, competitiveness, income per capita, globalization, economic freedom, and low perception of corruption.( However, it has a high inequality, as measured by the index.( In May 2010 Chile became the first South American country to join the OECD.( In 2006, Chile became the country with the highest nominal GDP per capita in Latin America.(http://www.weforum.org/pdf/GCR09/GCR20092010fullrankings.pdf)During the early 1990s, Chiles reputation as a role model for economic reform was strengthened when the democratic government of Aylwin, who took over from the military in 1990, deepened the economic reform initiated by the military government. Growth in real GDP averaged 8% from 19911997, but fell to half that level in 1998 because of tight monetary policies (implemented to keep the current account deficit in check) and because of lower export earnings, the latter which was a product of the Asian financial crisis. Chiles economy has since recovered and has seen growth rates of 57% over the past several years.After a decade of impressive growth rates, Chile began to experience a moderate economic downturn in 1999, brought on by unfavorable global economic conditions related to the financial crisis, which began in 1997. The economy remained sluggish until 2003, when it began to show clear signs of recovery, achieving 4.0% real GDP growth.(http://indexmundi.com/chile/gdp_real_growth_rate.html Chile GDP  real growth rate) The Chilean economy finished 2004 with growth of 6%. Real GDP growth reached 5.7% in 2005 before falling back to 4% in 2006. GDP expanded by 5% in 2007.(Unemployment hovered at 8%10% after the start of the economic slowdown in 1999, above the 7% average for the 1990s. Unemployment finally dipped to 7.8% in 2006, and continued to fall in 2007, averaging 6.8% monthly (up to August).() Wages have risen faster than inflation as a result of higher productivity, boosting national living standards. The percentage of Chileans with household incomes below the line  defined as twice the cost of satisfying a persons minimal nutritional needs  fell from 45.1% in 1987 to 13.7% in 2006, according to government surveys.() Critics in Chile, however, argue that true poverty figures are considerably higher than those officially published. (The government constructs the poverty line based on an outdated 1987 household consumption survey, instead of more recent surveys from 1997 or 2007). According to these critics who use data from the 1997 survey, the poverty rate rises to 29%.() Using the relative yardstick favoured in many European countries, 27% of Chileans would be poor, according to Juan Carlos Feres of the ECLAC.( )High domestic savings and investment rates helped propel Chiles economy to average growth rates of 8% during the 1990s. The privatized national pension system (AFP) has encouraged domestic investment and contributed to an estimated total domestic savings rate of approximately 21% of GDP.(http://www.safp.cl/573/articles-3523_copyright.pdf The Chilean pension system)Total direct investment (FDI) was only $3.4 billion in 2006, up 52% from a poor performance in 2005. However, 80% of FDI continues to go to only four sectors: electricity, gas, water and mining. Much of the jump in FDI in 2006 was also the result of acquisitions and mergers, but has done little to create new employment in Chile.Economic policiesFile:GDP per capita LA-Chile.png|thumb|350px|Chilean (blue) and average American (orange) per capita (19502007).Sound economic policies, maintained consistently since the 1980s, have contributed to steady economic growth in Chile and have more than halved poverty rates.(( The 197390 military government sold many state-owned companies, and the three democratic governments since 1990 have continued privatization, though at a slower pace. The governments role in the economy is mostly limited to regulation, although the state continues to operate copper giant CODELCO and a few other enterprises (there is one state-run bank). Chile is strongly committed to free trade and has welcomed large amounts of foreign investment. Chile has signed free trade agreements (FTAs) with a whole network of countries, including an FTA with the United States that was signed in 2003 and implemented in January 2004.(http://www.ustr.gov/Trade_Agreements/Bilateral/Chile_FTA/Final_Texts/Section_Index.html USA-Chile FTA Final Text)Chiles independent Bank pursues an inflation target of between 2% and 4%. Inflation has not exceeded 5% since 1998. Chile registered an inflation rate of 3.2% in 2006. The Chilean pesos rapid appreciation against the U.S. dollar in recent years has helped dampen inflation. Most wage settlements and loans are indexed, reducing inflations volatility. Under the compulsory private pension system, most formal sector employees pay 10% of their salaries into privately managed funds.(As of 2006, Chile invested only 0.6% of its annual GDP in research and development (R&D). Even then, two-thirds of that was government spending. Beyond its general economic and political stability, the government has also encouraged the use of Chile as an investment platform for multinational corporations planning to operate in the region, but this will have limited value given the developing business climate in Chile itself. Chiles approach to foreign direct investment is codified in the countrys Foreign Investment Law, which gives foreign investors the same treatment as Chileans. Registration is reported to be simple and transparent, and foreign investors are guaranteed access to the official foreign exchange market to repatriate their profits and capital.(Faced with an international economic downturn the government announced a $4 billion economic stimulus plan to spur employment and growth, and despite the global financial crisis, aimed for an expansion of between 2 percent and 3 percent of GDP for 2009. Nonetheless, economic analysts disagreed with government estimates and predicted economic growth at a median of 1.5 percent.() According to the CIA World FactBook, the GDP contracted an estimated 1.7% in 2009.The Chilean Government has formed a Council on Innovation and Competition, which is tasked with identifying new sectors and industries to promote. It is hoped that this, combined with some tax reforms to encourage domestic and foreign investment in and development, will bring in additional FDI to new parts of the economy.(Chile maintains one of the best credit ratings (S&P A+) in Latin America.(http://www.nationsencyclopedia.com/economies/Americas/Chile-OVERVIEW-OF-ECONOMY.html Chile: Overview of economy) There are three main ways for Chilean firms to raise funds abroad: bank loans, issuance of bonds, and the selling of stocks on U.S. markets through American Depository Receipts (ADRs). Nearly all of the funds raised through these means go to finance domestic Chilean investment. The government is required by law to run a fiscal surplus of at least 1% of GDP. In 2006, the Government of Chile ran a surplus of $11.3 billion, equal to almost 8% of GDP. The Government of Chile continues to pay down its foreign debt, with public debt only 3.9% of GDP at the end of 2006.(Foreign trade2006 was a record year for Chilean trade. Total trade registered a 31% increase over 2005. During 2006, exports of goods and services totaled US $58 billion, an increase of 41%. This figure was somewhat distorted by the skyrocketing price of copper. In 2006, copper exports reached a historical high of US $33.3 billion. Imports totaled US $35 billion, an increase of 17% compared to the previous year. Chile thus recorded a positive trade balance of US $23 billion in 2006.(The main destinations for Chilean exports were the Americas (US $39 billion), Asia (US $27.8 billion) and Europe (US $22.2 billion). Seen as shares of Chiles export markets, 42% of exports went to the Americas, 30% to Asia and 24% to Europe. Within Chiles diversified network of trade relationships, its most important partner remained the United States. Total trade with the U.S. was US $14.8 billion in 2006. Since the U.S.-Chile Free Trade Agreement went into effect on January 1, 2004, U.S.-Chilean trade has increased by 154%. Internal Government of Chile figures show that even when factoring out inflation and the recent high price of copper, bilateral trade between the U.S. and Chile has grown over 60% since then.(Total trade with Europe also grew in 2006, expanding by 42%. The Netherlands and Italy were Chiles main European trading partners. Total trade with Asia also grew significantly at nearly 31%. Trade with Korea and Japan grew significantly, but China remained Chiles most important trading partner in Asia. Chiles total trade with China reached U.S. $8.8 billion in 2006, representing nearly 66% of the value of its trade relationship with Asia.(reservas wine.jpg|thumb|left|upright|Chile is the worlds fifth largest exporter of wine and the eighth largest producer()The growth of exports in 2006 was mainly caused by a strong increase in sales to the United States, the Netherlands, and Japan. These three markets alone accounted for an additional US $5.5 billion worth of Chilean exports. Chilean exports to the United States totaled US $9.3 billion, representing a 37.7% increase compared to 2005 (US $6.7 billion). Exports to the European Union were US $15.4 billion, a 63.7% increased compared to 2005 (US $9.4 billion). Exports to Asia increased from US $15.2 billion in 2005 to US $19.7 billion in 2006, a 29.9% increase.(During 2006, Chile imported US $26 billion from the Americas, representing 54% of total imports, followed by Asia at 22%, and Europe at 16%. Mercosur members were the main suppliers of imports to Chile at US $9.1 billion, followed by the United States with US $5.5 billion and the European Union with US $5.2 billion. From Asia, China was the most important exporter to Chile, with goods valued at US $3.6 billion. Year-on-year growth in imports was especially strong from a number of countries-Ecuador (123.9%), Thailand (72.1%), Korea (52.6%), and China (36.9%).(Chiles overall trade profile has traditionally been dependent upon copper exports. The state-owned firm CODELCO is the worlds largest copper-producing company, with recorded copper reserves of 200 years. Chile has made an effort to expand nontraditional exports. The most important non-mineral exports are forestry and wood products, fresh fruit and processed food, fishmeal and seafood, and wine.(Trade agreementsOver the last several years, Chile has signed trade agreements (FTAs) with the European Union, South Korea, New Zealand, Singapore, Brunei, China, and Japan. It reached a partial trade agreement with India in 2005 and began negotiations for a full-fledged FTA with India in 2006. Chile conducted trade negotiations in 2007 with Australia, Malaysia, and Thailand, as well as with China to expand an existing agreement beyond just trade in goods. Chile concluded FTA negotiations with Australia and an expanded agreement with China in 2008. The members of the P4 (Chile, Singapore, New Zealand, and Brunei) also plan to conclude a chapter on finance and investment in 2008.(Successive Chilean governments have actively pursued trade-liberalizing agreements. During the 1990s, Chile signed free trade agreements FTA with Canada, Mexico, and Central America. Chile also concluded preferential trade agreements with Venezuela, Colombia, and Ecuador. An association agreement with Mercosur-Argentina, Brazil, Paraguay, and Uruguay-went into effect in October 1996. Continuing its export-oriented development strategy, Chile completed landmark free trade agreements in 2002 with the European Union and South Korea. Chile, as a member of the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation (APEC) organization, is seeking to boost commercial ties to Asian markets. To that end, it has signed trade agreements in recent years with New Zealand, Singapore, Brunei, India, China, and most recently Japan. In 2007, Chile held trade negotiations with Australia, Thailand, Malaysia, and China. In 2008, Chile hopes to conclude an FTA with Australia, and finalize an expanded agreement (covering trade in services and investment) with China. The P4 (Chile, Singapore, New Zealand, and Brunei) also plan to expand ties through adding a finance and investment chapter to the existing P4 agreement. Chiles trade talks with Malaysia and Thailand are also scheduled to continue in 2008.(port of San AntonioAfter two years of negotiations, the United States and Chile signed an agreement in June 2003 that will lead to completely duty-free bilateral trade within 12 years. The U.S.-Chile FTA entered into force January 1, 2004, following approval by the U.S. and Chilean congresses. The bilateral FTA has inaugurated greatly expanded U.S.-Chilean trade ties, with total bilateral trade jumping by 154% during the FTAs first three years.(Chile unilaterally lowered its across-the-board import tariff for all countries with which it does not have a trade agreement to 6% in 2003. Higher effective tariffs are charged only on imports of wheat, wheat flour, and sugar as a result of a system of import price bands. The price bands were ruled inconsistent with Chiles Trade Organization (WTO) obligations in 2002, and the government has introduced legislation to modify them. Under the terms of the U.S.-Chile FTA, the price bands will be completely phased out for U.S. imports of wheat, wheat flour, and sugar within 12 years.(Chile is a strong proponent of pressing ahead on negotiations for a Trade Area of the Americas (FTAA) and is active in the WTOs Doha round of negotiations, principally through its membership in the G-20 and Group.(FinanceFile:Sanhatan.jpg|thumb|Sanhattan Skyline of Santiagos Financial DistrictChiles financial sector has grown quickly in recent years, with a banking reform law approved in 1997 that broadened the scope of permissible foreign activity for Chilean banks. The Chilean Government implemented a further liberalization of capital markets in 2001, and there is further pending legislation proposing further liberalization. Over the last ten years, Chileans have enjoyed the introduction of new financial tools such as home equity loans, currency futures and options, factoring, leasing, and debit cards. The introduction of these new products has also been accompanied by an increased use of traditional instruments such as loans and credit cards. Chiles private pension system, with assets worth roughly $70 billion at the end of 2006, has been an important source of investment capital for the capital market. However, by 2009, it has been reported that $21 billion had been lost from the pension system to the global financial crisis.()The countries largest companies are airline LAN and retailers Cencosud and Falabella.TourismFile:Moai Rano raraku.jpg|thumb|upright|IslandTourism in Chile has experienced sustained growth over the last few decades. In 2005, tourism grew by 13.6%, generating more than 4.5 billion dollars of which 1.5 billion is attributed to foreign tourists. According to the National Service of Tourism (Sernatur), 2 million people a year visit the country. Most of these visitors come from other countries in the American continent, mainly Argentina; followed by a growing number from the States, Europe, and Brazil with a growing number of Asians from Korea and China.()The main attractions for tourists are places of natural beauty situated in the extreme zones of the country: Pedro de Atacama, in the north, is very popular with foreign tourists who arrive to admire the Incaic architecture, the altiplano lakes, and the Valley of the Moon. In Putre, also in the North, there is the Lake, as well as the Parinacota and the Pomerape volcanoes, with altitudes of 6,348 m and 6,282 m, respectively. Throughout the central Andes there are many ski resorts of international repute, including Portillo, Nevado and de Chilln. The main tourist sites in the south are the coastal area around Tira and Caete with the Mocha and the National Park, Archipelago and Patagonia, which includes San Rafael National Park, with its many glaciers, and the del Paine National Park. The central port city of Valparaso, which is World Heritage with its unique architecture, is also popular. Finally, Easter Island in the Pacific Ocean is one of the main Chilean tourist destinations.For locals, tourism is concentrated mostly in the summer (December to March), and mainly in the coastal beach towns. Arica, Iquique, Antofagasta, La Serena and Coquimbo are the main summer centres in the north, and Pucn on the shores of Villarrica is the main centre in the south. Because of its proximity to Santiago, the coast of the Valparaso Region, with its many beach resorts, receives the largest number of tourists. del Mar, Valparasos northern affluent neighbor, is popular because of its beaches, casino, and its annual song festival, the most important musical event in Latin America. Pichilemu in the Region is widely known as South Americas best surfing spot, according to Fodors.In November 2005, the government launched a campaign under the brand Chile: All Ways Surprising, intended to promote the country internationally for both business and tourism.()DemographicsChiles 2002 census reported a population of 15,116,435 people. Its rate of population growth has been decreasing since 1990, because of a declining rate.() By 2050 the population is expected to reach approximately 20.2 million people.() About 85% of the countrys population lives in urban areas, with 40% living in Greater Santiago. The largest agglomerations according to the 2002 census are Greater Santiago with 5.6 million people, Concepcin with 861,000and Valparaso with 824,000.()Chile is a society, which means that it is home to people of many different ethnical backgrounds. As a result, the people there usually treat their nationality as a citizenship, but not an ethnicity.One study conducted by Francisco Lizcano from UNAM suggested that people of European origin made up 52.7% of the population and that Mestizos made up 44% of the population.() A study conducted by the of Chile found that within the Chilean population, 30% are of European descent and Mestizos with majority European ancestry are estimated to be 65% of the population.() Other studies have found a white majority that would exceed 60% of the Chilean population.()(Esteva-Fabregat (1988), Book: El mestizaje en lberoamrica a white majority that exceeds 60% of the Chilean population.)The European portion of Chiles population consists mainly of people descended from Spanish settlers (predominantly Castilian, Andalusian and Basque), with minorities having German, Italian, Irish, French, British, Swiss, and Croatian ancestry, singly or combined. The Mestizo segment, in this respect, would derive its European component from colonial Spanish settlers (mainly Andalusians and Castilians), while its Amerindian component would be from various tribes or groups, mainly Picunches and Mapuches.The Afro-Chilean population has always been tiny, reaching a high of 2,500 people during the colonial period; their current percentage of the population is less than one percent.() According to the 2002 Census, 4.6% of the Chilean population considered themselves indigenous.()Indigenous communitiesThe 1907 census reported 101,118 Indians, or 3.1% of the total country population. Only those that practiced their native culture or spoke their native language were considered, irrespective of their racial purity.()According to the 2002 census, only indigenous people that still practiced a native culture or spoke a native language were surveyed, and 4.6% of the population (692,192 people) fit that description. Of that 4.6%, 87.3% declared themselves Mapuche.() Most of the indigenous population show varying degrees of mixed ancestry.(Chile is one of 22 countries to have signed and ratified the only binding international law concerning indigenous peoples, and Tribal Peoples Convention, 1989.() It was adopted in 1989 as the Labour Organization (ILO) Convention 169. Chile ratified it in 2008. A Chilean court decision in November 2009, considered to be a landmark ruling in indigenous rights concerns, made use of the convention. The Supreme Court decision on Aymara water rights upheld rulings by both the Pozo Almonte tribunal and the Iquique Court of Appeals, and marks the first judicial application of ILO Convention 169 in Chile.()ImmigrationFile:Puerto varas church.jpg|thumb|A German influenced Varas ChurchAn important number of non-Spanish immigrants have arrived in Chile from various countries and regions, including Italy, Ireland, France, Greece, Germany, England, the Netherlands, Scotland, Croatia, and the East. The largest contingent of people to arrive in Chile came from Spain, mainly the Basque country, beginning in the 16th century. Estimates of the number of people in Chile who can trace descent from Basques range from 10% (1,600,000) to as high as 27% (4,500,000).()()(vascos Ainara Madariaga:Autora del estudio Imaginarios vascos desde Chile La construccin de imaginarios vascos en Chile durante el siglo XX.)()(Contacto Interlingstico e intercultural en el mundo hispano.instituto valenciano de lenguas y culturas. Universitat de Valncia Cita:  Un 20% de la poblacin chilena tiene su origen en el Pas Vasco.)( La poblacin chilena con ascendencia vasca bordea entre el 15% y el 20% del total, por lo que es uno de los pases con mayor presencia de emigrantes venidos de Euskadi.)(El 27% de los chilenos son descendientes de emigrantes vascos. De los vacos, oati y los elorza. Waldo Ayarza Elorza.)( Presencia vasca en Chile.) Louis Thayer Ojeda estimates that during the 17th and 18th centuries fully 45% of all immigrants in Chile were Basques.(William A. Douglass, Jon Bilbao (2005). Amerikanuak: Basques in the New World. of Nevada Press. p.81. ISBN 0874176255)In 1848 an important and substantial German immigration took place, laying the foundation for the German-Chilean community.( Los colonos)( Alemanes en Chile.) Sponsored by the Chilean government for the colonization of the southern region, the Germans (including German-speaking Swiss, Silesians, Alsatians and Austrians), strongly influenced the ethnic composition of the southern provinces of Chile. German immigrants have made a cultural impact in many areas of Chile, which is a sparsely populated region. The Consulate of Chile in Germany estimates that 500,000 to 600,000 Chileans, or between 3% to 3.5% of the population today, are descended from German immigrants( ) Most of them were located in the Ros Region.It is estimated that nearly five percent of the Chilean population, or about 800,000 people, are of Asian origin, chiefly from the Middle East (these include, most notably, Palestinians, Syrians, Lebanese and Eastern Armenians).( Arabes de Chile)(  En Chile viven unas 700.000 personas de origen rabe y de ellas 500.000 son descendientes de emigrantes palestinos que llegaron a comienzos del siglo pasado y que constituyen la comunidad de ese origen ms grande fuera del mundo rabe.) Note that Israelis, both Jewish and non-Jewish citizens of the nation of Israel, may be included. Chile is home to a large population of immigrants, mostly Christian, from the Levant.( Roughly 500,000 of Chiles population is of full or partial Palestinian origin.()( 500,000 descendientes de primera y segunda generacin de palestinos en Chile.)( Santiago de Chile es un modelo de convivencia palestino-juda.)()( Chile tiene la comunidad palestina ms grande fuera del mundo rabe, unos 500.000 descendientes.)immigrants to Capitan Pastene in southern Chile.Other historically significant immigrant groups in Chile include Croatians, whose descendants today have been estimated to number some 380,000 people (or about 2.4% of the population).()() Other authorities estimate that close to 4.6% of the Chilean population may have some Croatian ancestry.() Over 700,000 Chileans, or about 4.5% of the national population, may have some English, Scottish, or Welsh ancestry.()Chileans of Greek descent are estimated to number between 90,000 and 120,000 people,( Embajada de Grecia en Chile.) placing Chile among the five countries in the world with the most Greek descendants.( Griegos de Chile) Most live in or near either Santiago or Antofagasta. Swiss descendants add another 90,000 people to the population.() Perhaps five percent of the Chilean population has some French ancestry.( 5% de los chilenos tiene origen frances.) Between 600,000 and 800,000 Chileans are descended from Italian immigrants. Other groups of Europeans have followed but are found in smaller numbers, as the descendants of Austrians(Hoofdstuk XVI Historisch tussenspel ) and Dutchmen it is currently estimated at about 50,000 people.()() Altogether, these immigrants with their descendants, they have transformed the country culturally, economically and politically.European emigration to Chile (and to a lesser extent, the arrivals from the East), during the second half of the 19th century and throughout the twentieth, was mostly to America and then to areas like the Atlantic Coast of the Southern Cone.()()()Descendants of different European ethnic groups often intermarried in Chile, diluting the cultures and separate identities of the home countries and fusing them together with the descendants of the original Basque-Castilian aristocracy of the period, while at the same time preserving some separate aspects. This intermarriage and mixture of cultures and races has help shape the present society and culture of the Chilean middle and upper classes,( who now enjoy varied elements of their original European cultures, such as British afternoon tea, German cakes, and Italian pasta. The fusion is also visible in the architecture of Chilean cities. These classes do, however, frequently deprecate Chilean folk culture, an offshoot of the culture of the Spaniards who settled the country in the colonial period.Chile has recently become a new magnet for immigrants, mostly from neighboring Argentina, Bolivia and mainly Peru.() According to the 2002 national census, Chiles foreign-born population has increased by 75% since 1992.() According to an estimate by the Migration and Foreign Residency Department, 317,057 foreigners were living in Chile as of December 2008.(Estimacin de Poblacin de Extranjeros en Chile a Diciembre de 2008. Informe Estadstico. Departamento de Extranjera y Migracin.)ReligionbarsIn the most recent census (2002), 70 percent of the population over age 14 identified as Catholic and 15.1 percent as evangelical. In the census, the term evangelical referred to all non-Catholic Christian churches with the exception of the Church (Greek, Persian, Serbian, Ukrainian, and Armenian), Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints (Mormons), Adventists, and Witnesses. Approximately 90 percent of evangelicals are Pentecostal. Wesleyan, Lutheran, Reformed Evangelical, Presbyterian, Anglican, Episcopalian, Baptist and churches are also present.() Irreligious people, atheists and agnostics, account for around 8% of the population.The Constitution provides for of religion, and other laws and policies contribute to the generally free practice of religion. The law at all levels protects this right in full against abuse, either by governmental or private actors.(Church and state are officially separate in Chile. The 1999 law on religion prohibits discrimination. However, the Catholic Church enjoys a privileged status and occasionally receives preferential treatment. Government officials attend Catholic events as well as major Protestant and Jewish ceremonies.(The Government-observed religious holidays include Christmas, Friday, the Feast of the Virgin of Carmen, the of Saints Peter and Paul, the Feast of the Assumption, Saints Day, and the of the Immaculate Conception as national holidays.( The government has recently declared October 31, Day, a public national holiday, in honor of the Protestant churches of the country.( )()LanguagesThe Spanish spoken in Chile is distinctively accented and quite unlike that of neighbouring South American countries because final syllables and s sounds are dropped, and some consonants have a soft pronunciation. Accent varies only very slightly from north to south; more noticeable are the small differences in accent based on social class or whether one lives in the city or the country. That the Chilean population was largely formed in a small section at the center of the country and then migrated in modest numbers to the north and south helps explain this relative lack of differentiation, which was maintained by the national reach of radio, and now television, which also helps to diffuse and homogenize colloquial expressions.(There are several indigenous languages spoken in Chile: Mapudungun, Quechua, Aymara and Rapa Nui. After the Spanish invasion, Spanish took over as the franca and the indigenous languages have become minority languages, with some now extinct or close to extinction.()German is still spoken to some extent in southern Chile,() either in small country side pockets or as a second language among the communities of larger cities.Through initiatives such as the Opens Doors program, the government made English mandatory for students in fifth-grade and above in public schools. Most private schools in Chile start teaching English from kindergarten.() Common English words have been absorbed and appropriated into everyday Spanish speech.()In 2010, all students from 3rd grade in Enseanza Media (secondary school) will be tested on listening and reading comprehension. The evaluation is compulsory and the instrument is TOIEC Bridge, developed by Testing Service.Largest citiesCultureFile:Gabriela Mistral-01.jpg|thumb|left|upright|Mistral, Nobel Prize in Literature (1945)File:Pablo Neruda.jpg|thumb|upright|Neruda, Nobel Prize in Literature (1971)During the period between early agricultural settlements and to the late pre-Hispanic period, northern Chile was a region of Andean culture that was influenced by altiplano traditions spreading to the coastal valleys of the north. While southern regions were areas of Mapuche cultural activities. Through the colonial period following the conquest, and during the early Republican period, the countrys culture was dominated by the Spanish. Other European influences, primarily English, French, and German began in the 19th century and have continued to this day. German migrants influenced the Bavarian style rural architecture and cuisine in the south of Chile in cities such as Valdivia, Frutillar, Varas, Osorno, Temuco, Octay, Llanquihue, Maisan, Pitrufqun, Victoria, Pucn and Montt.()()()()()Music and danceMusic in Chile ranges from folkloric music, popular music and also to classical music. Its large geography generates different musical expressions in the north, center and south of the country, including also Easter Island and Mapuche music.() The national dance is the cueca. Another form of traditional Chilean song, though not a dance, is the tonada. Arising from music imported by the Spanish colonists, it is distinguished from the cueca by an intermediate melodic section and a more prominent melody.Between 1950 and 1970 appears a rebirth in folk music leading by groups such as de Ramon, Los Cuatro Cuartos and Los Huasos Quincheros, among others () with composers such as de Ramon, Parra and others. In the mid-1960s native musical forms were revitalized by the family with the Nueva Cancin Chilena, which was associated with political activists and reformers such as Jara and Inti-Illimani. Other important folk singer and researcher on folklore and Chilean ethnography, is Loyola. Also many Chilean Rock bands like Jaivas, Prisioneros, La Ley, and Tres have reached international success.LiteratureChileans call their country pas de poetas-country of poets.()() Mistral was the first American to win a Prize for Literature (1945). Chiles most famous poet, however, is Neruda, who also won the Nobel Prize for Literature (1971) and is world-renowned for his extensive library of works on romance, nature, and politics. His three highly personalized homes, located in Negra, Santiago and Valparaso are popular tourist destinations.Among the list of other Chilean poets are Pezoa Vliz, Huidobro, Rojas, and Parra. Allende is the best-selling Chilean novelist, with 51 millions of her novels sold worldwide.() Novelist Jos Donosos novel Obscene Bird of the Night is considered by critic Bloom to be one of the canonical works of 20th century Western literature. Another internationally recognized Chilean novelist is Bolao whose translations into English have had an excellent reception from the critics.()()()CuisineFile:Chilean Cazuela.JPG|thumb|Chilean Cazuela and assorted salads.cuisine is a reflection of the countrys topographical variety, featuring an assortment of seafood, beef, fruits, and vegetables. Traditional recipes include asado, cazuela, empanadas, humitas, pastel de choclo, pastel de papas, curanto and sopaipillas.(http://books.google.com/books?idLlePAePLlqkC&printsecfrontcover&dqThe+south+american+table The South American Table by Maria Baez Kijac) Crudos is an example of the mixture of culinary contributions from the various ethnic influences in Chile. The raw minced llama, heavy use of shellfish and rice bread were taken from native Quechua Andean cuisine, (although now beef brought to Chile by Europeans is also used in place of the llama meat), lemon and onions were brought by the Spanish colonists, and the use of mayonnaise and yogurt was introduced by German immigrants, as was beer.SportsFile:Estadio Nacional de Chile 2.jpg|thumb|left|Nacional de ChileChiles most popular sport is football (ftbol). Chile has appeared in eight FIFA World Cups which includes hosting the FIFA World Cup where the national football team finished third. Other results achieved by the national football team include four finals at the Amrica, one silver and two bronze medals at the American Games, a bronze medal at the Summer Olympics and two third places finishes in the FIFA under-17 and under-20 youth tournaments. The main football clubs are Colo-Colo, Universidad de Chile and Universidad Catlica. Colo-Colo is the countrys most successful football club, having both the most national and international championships, including the coveted Libertadores South American club tournament. Universidad Catlica was the last international champion (Cup 1994).File:Rodeochileno1.jpg|thumb|rodeo is unique to ChileTennis is Chiles most successful sport. Its national team won the Team Cup clay tournament twice (2003 & 2004), and played the Cup final against Italy in 1976. At the Summer Olympics the country captured gold and bronze in mens singles and gold in mens doubles. Ros became the first Latin American man to reach the number one spot in the ATP singles rankings in 1998. Lizana won the US Open in 1937, becoming the first woman from Latin America to win a grand slam tournament. Luis Ayala was twice a runner-up at the Open and both Ros and Gonzlez reached the Open mens singles finals. Gonzlez also won a silver medal in singles at the Summer Olympics in Beijing.At the Games Chile boasts two gold medals (tennis), seven silver medals (athletics, Equestrian, boxing, shooting and tennis) and four bronze medals (tennis, boxing and football). Rodeo is the countrys sport and is practiced in the more rural areas of the country. A sport similar to hockey called chueca was played by the Mapuche people during the Spanish conquest. Skiing and snowboarding are practiced at ski centers located in the Central Andes, and in southern ski centers near to cities as Osorno, Puerto Varas, Temuco and Punta Arenas. While Surfing is popular at some coastal towns. Polo is professionally practiced within Chile and in 2008 Chile achieved top prize in the Polo Championship a tournament where the country has earned both second and third places medals in previous editions. Basketball is a popular sport in which Chile has earned a bronze medal in the first mens World Championship held in 1950 and winning a second bronze medal when Chile hosted the FIBA World Championship. Chile hosted the first World Championship for Women in 1953 finishing the tournament with the silver medal. Other sports such as marathons and ultramarathons are also increasing in popularity. Pedro de Atacama is host to the annual Atacama Crossing, a six-stage, 250-kilometer footrace which annually attracts about 150 competitors from 35 countries. The Rally off-road automobilie race has been held in both Chile and Argentina since 2009.National symbolsFile:Colca-condor-c03.jpg|thumb|The Condor is the national bird of ChileThe national flower is the copihue (Lapageria rosea, Chilean bellflower), which grows in the woods of southern Chile.The coat of arms depicts the two national animals: the condor (Vultur gryphus, a very large bird that lives in the mountains) and the huemul (Hippocamelus bisulcus, an endangered white tail deer). It also has the legend Por la razn o la fuerza (By Reason or by Force).The of Chile consists of two equal horizontal bands of white (top) and red; there is a blue square the same height as the white band at the hoist-side end of the white band; the square bears a white five-pointed star in the center representing a guide to progress and honor; blue symbolizes the sky, white is for the snow-covered Andes, and red stands for the blood spilled to achieve independence. The flag of Chile is similar to the of Texas, although the Chilean flag is 21 years older. However, like the Texan flag, the flag of Chile is modeled after the of the United States.()HealthcareThe Ministry of Health (Minsal) is the cabinet-level administrative office in charge of planning, directing, coordinating, executing, controlling and informing the public health policies formulated by the President of Chile.The National Health Fund (Fonasa), created in 1979, is the financial entity entrusted to collect, manage and distribute state funds for health in Chile. It is funded by the public. All employees pay 7% of their monthly income to the fund.Fonasa is part of the NHSS and has executive power through the of Health (Chile). Its headquarters are in Santiago and decentralized public service is conducted by various Regional Offices.More than 12 million beneficiaries benefit from Fonasa. Beneficiaries can also opt for more costly private insurance through Isapre.See also*rankings of Chile*of Chileans*America Life Quality RankingsReferencesFurther reading*Simon Collier and William F. Sater, A History of Chile, 18081894, Cambridge University Press, 1996*Paul W. Drake, and others., Chile: A Country Study, Library of Congress, 1994*Luis Galdames, A History of Chile, University of North Carolina Press, 1941*Brian Lovemen, Chile: The Legacy of Hispanic Capitalism, 3rd ed., Oxford University Press, 2001*John L. Rector, The History of Chile, Greenwood Press, 2003External links*Official Chile website*Government of Chile*****listace:Chiliaf:Chiliak:Chileals:Chileam:ang:Cileab:ar:an:Chileroa-rup:Cilefrp:Chiliast:Chilegn:Chileay:Chiliaz:ilibn:zh-min-nan:Chilebe:be-x-old:bcl:Tsilebi:Chilebar:Chilebo:bs:ilebr:Chilebg:ca:Xilecv:ceb:Chilecs:Chilech:Chilecbk-zam:Chilecy:Chileda:Chilede:Chiledv:nv:Chiliidsb:Chilskaet:Tiiliel:es:Chileeo:ilioext:Chilieu:Txileee:Chilefa:hif:Chilefo:Kilifr:Chilify:Silyfur:CiletSilehilleegag:ilit-Silegl:Chilegu:hak:Ch-liko:hy:hi:hsb:Chilskahr:ileio:Chiliilo:Chilebpy:id:Chiliia:Chileie:Chileos:is:Sleit:Cilehe:jv:Chilikl:Chilekn:pam:Chileka:ks:csb:Chilekk:kw:Chilerw:Shiliky:rn:Chilesw:Chilekv:ht:Chiliku:lemrj:lad:Chileltg:ilela:Chilialv:lelb:Chilelt:illij:Cileli:Chililn:Shilijbo:tcileslmo:Cilehu:Chilemk:ml:mt:ilimr:arz:mzn:ms:Chilemwl:Chilemn:my:nah:Chilena:Tsirenl:Chilinds-nl:Chiline:ja:frr:Chiilepih:Chilino:Chilenn:Chilenrm:Chilinov:Chileoc:Chilemhr:uz:Chilipap:Chileps:pms:Cilends:Chilepl:Chilept:Chilecrh:ilero:Chilermy:Chilerm:Chilequ:Chilirue:ru:sah:se:Chilesa:sc:Cilesco:Chilestq:Chilesq:Kiliscn:Cilisimple:Chilesk:ilesl:ileszl:Czileso:Jilickb:sr:sh:ilesu:Chilifi:Chilesv:Chiletl:Tsileta:roa-tara:Cilett:te:tet:Xileth:tg:chy:Chiletr:iliuk:ur:ug:vec:Cievi:Chilevo:Cilnfiu-vro:Tsiiliwa:Tchilizh-classical:vls:Chiliwar:Chilewo:Siliwuu:ts:Chileyi:yo:Tslzh-yue:diq:ilizea:Chilibat-smg:ilzh:
5490
History_of_Chile
The territory of Chile has been populated since at least 12,000 BCE. By the 16th century, Spanish conquistadors began to subdue and colonize the region of present-day Chile, and the territory became a colony from 1540 to 1818, when it gained independence from Spain. The countrys economic development was successively marked by the export of first agricultural produce, then saltpeter and later copper until the 1980s. The wealth of raw materials led to an economic upturn, but also led to dependency, and even wars with neighboring states. The country was governed during most of its first 150 years of independent life by different forms of restricted democracy, where the electorate was carefully vetted and controlled by an elite.Failure to address the economic and social disparities and increasing political awareness of the less-affluent population, as well as indirect intervention and economic funding to the main political groups by both the KGB()() and the CIA,(http://foia.state.gov/Reports/ChurchReport.asp) as part of the War, led to a political polarization under Socialist President Allende which in turn resulted in the 11 September 1973 coup and the government of General Pinochet, whose 17-year regime was responsible for numerous human rights violations and deep market-oriented economic reforms. In 1990, Chile made a peaceful transition to democracy.Early historyAbout 12,000 years ago, migrating Native Americans settled in the fertile valleys and coastal areas of what is present day Chile. Pre-Hispanic Chile was home to over a dozen different Amerindian societies. The current prevalent theories are that the initial arrival of humans to the continent took place either along the Pacific coast southwards in a rather rapid expansion long preceding the culture, or even trans-Pacific migration. These theories are backed by findings in the Verde archaeological site, which predates the Clovis site by thousands of years. Specific early human settlement sites from the very early human habitation in Chile include the del Milodon and the Aike Craters tube.()Image:Tulor Settlement Chile.jpg|thumb|200px|Tulor settlement near Pedro de Atacama, a Pre-Columbian Atacameo culture.Despite such diversity, it is possible to classify the indigenous people into three major cultural groups: the northern people, who developed rich handicrafts and were influenced by pre-Incan cultures; the Araucanian culture, who inhabited the area between the river Choapa and the island of Chilo, and lived primarily off agriculture; and the Patagonian culture Patagonia  composed of various nomadic tribes, who supported themselves through fishing and hunting (and who in Pacific/Pacific Coast immigration scenario would be descended partly from the most ancient settlers).No elaborate, centralized, sedentary civilization reigned supreme.()The Araucanians, a fragmented society of hunters, gatherers, and farmers, constituted the largest native American group in Chile. A mobile people who engaged in trade and warfare with other indigenous groups, they lived in scattered family clusters and small villages. Although the Araucanians had no written language, they did use a common tongue. Those in what became central Chile were more settled and more likely to use irrigation. Those in the south combined slash-and-burn agriculture with hunting. Of the three Araucanian groups, the one that mounted the fiercest resistance to the attempts at seizure of their territory were the Mapuche, meaning people of the land.(Image:Urville-Araucanians.jpg|thumb|150px|right|The Mapuche were the original inhabitants of central and southern Chile.The Empire briefly extended their empire into what is now northern Chile, where they collected tribute from small groups of fishermen and oasis farmers but were not able to establish a strong cultural presence in the area.() As the Spaniards would after them, the Incas encountered fierce resistance and so were unable to exert control in the south. During their attempts at conquest in 1460 and again in 1491, the Incas established forts in the Central Valley of Chile, but they could not colonize the region. The Mapuche fought against the Sapa Inca Yupanqui (CE 14711493)() and his army. The result of the bloody three-day confrontation known as the of the Maule was that the Inca conquest of the territories of Chile ended at the river,(http://www.state.gov/r/pa/ei/bgn/1981.htm) which subsequently became the boundary between the Incan empire and the Mapuche lands until the arrival of the Spaniards.Scholars speculate that the total Araucanian population may have numbered 1 million at most when the Spaniards arrived in the 1530s; a century of European conquest and disease reduced that number by at least half. During the conquest, the Araucanians quickly added horses and European weaponry to their arsenal of clubs and bows and arrows. They became adept at raiding Spanish settlements and, albeit in declining numbers, managed to hold off the Spaniards and their descendants until the late nineteenth century. The Araucanians valor inspired the Chileans to mythologize them as the nations first national heroes, a status that did nothing, however, to elevate the wretched living standard of their descendants.((ISBN 978-956-310-774-6 Map of Patagonia)The Chilean Patagonia located south of the river calle calle in Valdivia was composed of many tribes, mainly Tehuelches that were consider giants by Spaniards during Magellan voyage of 1520.The name Patagonia comes from the word patagn(Pigafetta, Relazione del primo viaggio intorno al mondo, 1524: Il capitano generale nomin questi popoli Patagoni. The original word would probably be in Magellans native Portuguese (patago) or the Spanish of his men (patagn). It has been interpreted later as big foot but the etymology refers to a literary character in a Spanish novel of the early XVI century (see text).) used by Magellan to describe the native people whom his expedition thought to be giants. It is now believed the Patagons were actually Tehuelches  with an average height of 1.80 m (~511) compared to the 1.55 m (~51) average for Spaniards of the time.()The Argentine portion of Patagonia includes the provinces of Neuqun, Ro Negro, Chubut and Santa Cruz, as well as the eastern portion of  Tierra del Fuego archipelago .  The Argentine politico-economic Patagonic Region includes the Province of La Pampa.(Poblacin y Economa )The Chilean part of Patagonia embraces the southern part of Valdivia, Los Lagos in Lake Llanquihue, Chilo, Montt and the Archaeological site of Verde, also the fiords and islands south to the regions of Aisn and Magallanes, including the west side of del Fuego and Horn.(ISBN 978-956-310-774-6  Patagonia Chilena)Spanish conquest and colonization (1540&ndash;1810)Image:Pedro de Valdivia.jpg|thumb|150px|de ValdiviaThe first European to sight Chilean territory was Magellan, who crossed the of Magellan on November 1, 1520. However, the title of discoverer of Chile is usually assigned to de Almagro. Almagro was Pizarros partner, and he received the Southern area.(Nueva Toledo). He organized an expedition that brought him to central Chile in 1537, but he found little of value to compare with the gold and silver of the Incas in Peru. Left with the impression that the inhabitants of the area were poor, he returned to Peru, later to be garotted following defeat by Hernando Pizarro in a Civil War. ( Prescott)(http://countrystudies.us/chile/5.htm)After this initial excursion there was little interest from colonial authorities in further exploring modern-day Chile. However, de Valdivia, captain of the army, realizing the potential for expanding the Spanish empire southward, asked Pizarros permission to invade and conquer the southern lands. With a couple of hundred men, he subdued the local inhabitants and founded the city of Santiago de Nueva Extremadura, now de Chile, on February 12, 1541.()Although Valdivia found little gold in Chile he could see the agricultural richness of the land. He continued his explorations of the region west of the Andes and founded over a dozen towns and established the first encomiendas. The greatest resistance to Spanish rule came from the Mapuche culture, who opposed European conquest and colonization until the 1880s; this resistance is known as the War. Valdivia died at the of Tucapel, defeated by Lautaro, a young Mapuche toqui (war chief), but the European conquest was well underway. The Spaniards never subjugated the Mapuche territories; various attempts at conquest, both by military and peaceful means, failed. The Great Uprising of 1598 swept all Spanish presence south of the River except Chilo (and Valdivia which was decades later reestablished as a fort), and the great river became the frontier line between Mapuche lands and the Spanish realm.North of that line cities grew up slowly, and Chilean lands eventually became an important source of food for the of Peru.Valdivia became the first governor of the General of Chile. In that post, he obeyed the viceroy of Peru and, through him, the King of Spain and his bureaucracy. Responsible to the governor, town councils known as Cabildo administered local municipalities, the most important of which was Santiago, which was the seat of a Royal Appeals Court () from 1609 until the end of colonial rule.Chile was the least wealthy realm of the Spanish Crown for most of its colonial history. Only in the 18th century did a steady economic and demographic growth begin, an effect of the reforms by Spains Bourbon dynasty and a more stable situation along the frontier.Independence (1810&ndash;1826)Image:ohiggins.jpg|thumb|150px|OHigginsThe drive for independence from Spain was precipitated by usurpation of the Spanish throne by Napoleons brother Bonaparte. The Chilean War of Independence was part of the larger Spanish American independence movement, and it was far from having unanimous support among Chileans, who became divided between independentists and royalists. What started as an elitist political movement against their colonial master, finally ended as a full-fledged civil war between pro-Independence Criollos who sought political and economic independence from Spain and royalist Criollos, who supported the continued allegiance to and permanence within the Empire of the Kingdom of Chile. The struggle for independence was a war within the upper class, although the majority of troops on both sides consisted of conscripted mestizos and native Americans.The beginning of the Independence movement is traditionally dated as September 18, 1810 when a national junta was established to govern Chile in the name of the deposed king Ferdinand VII. Depending on what terms one uses to define the end, the movement extended until 1821 (when the Spanish were expelled from mainland Chile) or 1826 (when the last Spanish troops surrendered and Chilo was incorporated to the Chilean republic). The independence process is normally divided into three stages: Vieja, Reconquista, and Patria Nueva.Chiles first experiment with self-government, the Patria Vieja (old republic, 18101814), was led by Miguel Carrera, an aristocrat then in his mid-twenties. The military-educated Carrera was a heavy-handed ruler who aroused widespread opposition. Another of the earliest advocates of full independence, OHiggins, captained a rival faction that plunged the Criollos into civil war. For him and for certain other members of the Chilean elite, the initiative for temporary self-rule quickly escalated into a campaign for permanent independence, although other Criollos remained loyal to Spain. Among those favoring independence, conservatives fought with liberals over the degree to which French revolutionary ideas would be incorporated into the movement. After several efforts, Spanish troops from Peru took advantage of the internecine strife to reconquer Chile in 1814, when they reasserted control by winning the of Rancagua on October 12. OHiggins, Carrera and many of the Chilean rebels escaped to Argentina.The second period was characterized by the Spanish attempts to reimpose arbitrary rule during the period known as the Reconquista of 18141817 (Reconquest: the term echoes the Reconquista in which the Christian kingdoms retook Iberia from the Muslims). During this period, the harsh rule of the Spanish loyalists, who punished suspected rebels, drove more and more Chileans into the insurrectionary camp. More members of the Chilean elite were becoming convinced of the necessity of full independence, regardless of who sat on the throne of Spain. As the leader of guerrilla raids against the Spaniards, Manuel Rodrguez became a national symbol of resistance.Image:Battle of Chacabuco.jpg|thumb|250px|Chilean and Argentinean troops going to the of Chacabuco (February 12, 1817) led by de San Martn.In exile in Argentina, OHiggins joined forces with de San Martn. Their combined army freed Chile with a daring assault over the Andes in 1817, defeating the Spaniards at the of Chacabuco on February 12 and marking the beginning of the Patria Nueva. San Martn considered the liberation of Chile a strategic stepping-stone to the emancipation of Peru, which he saw as the key to hemispheric victory over the Spanish. Chile won its formal independence when San Martn defeated the last large Spanish force on Chilean soil at the of Maip on April 5, 1818. San Martn then led his Argentine and Chilean followers north to liberate Peru; and fighting continued in Chiles southern provinces, the bastion of the royalists, until 1826.A declaration of independence was officially issued by Chile on February 12, 1818 and formally recognized by Spain in 1840, when full diplomatic relations were established.Republican era (1818&ndash;1891)Constitutional organization (1818&ndash;1833)From 1817 to 1823, Bernardo OHiggins ruled Chile as supreme director. He won plaudits for defeating royalists and founding schools, but civil strife continued. OHiggins alienated liberals and provincials with his authoritarianism, conservatives and the church with his anticlericalism, and landowners with his proposed reforms of the land tenure system. His attempt to devise a constitution in 1818 that would legitimize his government failed, as did his effort to generate stable funding for the new administration. OHigginss dictatorial behavior aroused resistance in the provinces. This growing discontent was reflected in the continuing opposition of partisans of Carrera, who was executed by the Argentine regime in Mendoza in 1821, like his two brothers were three years earlier.Although opposed by many liberals, OHiggins angered the Roman Catholic Church with his liberal beliefs. He maintained Catholicisms status as the official state religion but tried to curb the churchs political powers and to encourage religious tolerance as a means of attracting Protestant immigrants and traders. Like the church, the landed aristocracy felt threatened by OHiggins, resenting his attempts to eliminate noble titles and, more important, to eliminate entailed estates.OHigginss opponents also disapproved of his diversion of Chilean resources to aid San Martns liberation of Peru. OHiggins insisted on supporting that campaign because he realized that Chilean independence would not be secure until the Spaniards were routed from the Andean core of the empire. However, amid mounting discontent, troops from the northern and southern provinces forced OHiggins to resign. Embittered, OHiggins departed for Peru, where he died in 1842.After OHiggins went into exile in 1823, civil conflict continued, focusing mainly on the issues of anticlericalism and regionalism. Presidents and constitutions rose and fell quickly in the 1820s. The civil struggles harmful effects on the economy, and particularly on exports, prompted conservatives to seize national control in 1830.In the minds of most members of the Chilean elite, the bloodshed and chaos of the late 1820s were attributable to the shortcomings of liberalism and federalism, which had been dominant over conservatism for most of the period. The political camp became divided by supporters of OHiggins, Carrera, liberal Pipiolos and conservative Pelucones, being the two last the main movements that prevailed and absorbed the rest. The abolition of slavery in 1823long before most other countries in the Americaswas considered one of the Pipiolos few lasting achievements. One Pipiolo leader from the south, Freire, rode in and out of the presidency several times (18231827, 1828, 1829, 1830) but could not sustain his authority. From May 1827 to September 1831, with the exception of brief interventions by Freire, the presidency was occupied by Antonio Pinto, Freires former vice president. In August 1828, Pintos first year in office, Chile abandoned its short-lived federalist system for a unitary form of government, with separate legislative, executive, and judicial branches. By adopting a moderately liberal constitution in 1828, Pinto alienated both the federalists and the liberal factions. He also angered the old aristocracy by abolishing estates inherited by primogeniture (mayorazgo) and caused a public uproar with his anticlericalism. After the defeat of his liberal army at the Battle of Lircay on April 17, 1830, Freire, like OHiggins, went into exile in Peru.Conservative Era (1830&ndash;1861)Image:DiegoPortales.jpg|thumb|150px|right|Portales.Although never president, Portales dominated Chilean politics from the cabinet and behind the scenes from 1830 to 1837. He installed the autocratic republic, which centralized authority in the national government. His political program enjoyed support from merchants, large landowners, foreign capitalists, the church, and the military. Political and economic stability reinforced each other, as Portales encouraged economic growth through free trade and put government finances in order.Portales was an agnostic who said that he believed in the clergy but not in God. He realized the importance of the Roman Catholic Church as a bastion of loyalty, legitimacy, social control, and stability, as had been the case in the colonial period. He repealed Liberal reforms that had threatened church privileges and properties.Portales brought the military under civilian control by rewarding loyal generals, cashiering troublemakers, and promoting a victorious war against the Confederation (18361839). After defeating Peru and Bolivia, Chile dominated the Pacific Coast of South America. The victory over its neighbors gave Chile and its new political system a psychological boost. Chileans experienced a surge of national enthusiasm and cohesion behind a regime accepted as legitimate and efficacious.Portales also achieved his objectives by wielding dictatorial powers, censoring the press, and manipulating elections. For the next forty years, Chiles armed forces would be distracted from meddling in politics by skirmishes and defensive operations on the southern frontier, although some units got embroiled in domestic conflicts in 1851 and 1859.The Portalian State was institutionalized by the Constitution of 1833. One of the most durable charters ever devised in Latin America, the Portalian constitution lasted until 1925. The constitution concentrated authority in the national government, more precisely, in the hands of the president, who was elected by a tiny minority. The chief executive could serve two consecutive five-year terms and then pick a successor. Although the Congress had significant budgetary powers, it was overshadowed by the president, who appointed provincial officials. The constitution also created an independent judiciary, guaranteed inheritance of estates by primogeniture, and installed Catholicism as the state religion. In short, it established an autocratic system under a republican veneer.The first Portalian president was General Prieto, who served two terms (18311836, 18361841). President Prieto had four main accomplishments: implementation of the 1833 constitution, stabilization of government finances, defeat of provincial challenges to central authority, and victory over the Peru-Bolivia Confederation. During the presidencies of Prieto and his two successors, Chile modernized through the construction of ports, railroads, and telegraph lines, some built by United States entrepreneur William Wheelwright. These innovations facilitated the export-import trade as well as domestic commerce.Prieto and his adviser, Portales, feared the efforts of Bolivian general de Santa Cruz to unite with Peru against Chile. These qualms exacerbated animosities toward Peru dating from the colonial period, now intensified by disputes over customs duties and loans. Chile also wanted to become the dominant South American military and commercial power along the Pacific. Portales got Congress to declare war on Peru in 1836.Liberal era (1861&ndash;1891)The political revolt brought little social change, however, and 19th century Chilean society preserved the essence of the stratified colonial social structure, which was greatly influenced by family politics and the Catholic Church. A strong presidency eventually emerged, but wealthy landowners remained powerful.()File:Combate naval.jpg|thumb|right|250px|of Iquique  the sinking of the Esmeralda (21 May 1879).Toward the end of the nineteenth century, the government in Santiago consolidated its position in the south by persistently suppressing the Mapuche during the of the Araucana. In 1881, it signed a treaty with Argentina confirming Chilean sovereignty over the of Magellan, but conceding all of oriental Patagonia, and a considerable fraction of the territory it had during colonial times. As a result of the of the Pacific with Peru and Bolivia (18791883), Chile expanded its territory northward by almost one-third and acquired valuable nitrate deposits, the exploitation of which led to an era of national affluence.In the 1870s, the church influence started to diminish slightly with the passing of several laws that took some old roles of the church into the States hands such as the registry of births and marriages.Image:JoseManuelBalmaceda.jpg|thumb|150px|Manuel BalmacedaIn 1886, Manuel Balmaceda was elected president. His economic policies visibly changed the existing liberal policies. He began to violate the constitution and slowly began to establish a dictatorship. Congress decided to depose Balmaceda, who refused to step down. Montt, among others, directed an armed conflict against Balmaceda, which soon extended into the Civil War of 1891. Defeated, Balmaceda fled to Argentinas embassy, where he committed suicide. Jorge Montt became the new president.Parliamentary era (1891&ndash;1925)The so-called Parliamentary Republic was not a true parliamentary system, in which the chief executive is elected by the legislature. It was, however, an unusual regime in presidentialist Latin America, for Congress really did overshadow the rather ceremonial office of the president and exerted authority over the chief executives cabinet appointees. In turn, Congress was dominated by the landed elites. This was the heyday of classic political and economic liberalism.For many decades thereafter, historians derided the Parliamentary Republic as a quarrel-prone system that merely distributed spoils and clung to its laissez-faire policy while national problems mounted.(http://www.country-data.com/cgi-bin/query/r-2410.html) The characterization is epitomized by an observation made by President Barros Luco (19101915), reputedly made in reference to labor unrest: There are only two kinds of problems: those that solve themselves and those that cant be solved. At the mercy of Congress, cabinets came and went frequently, although there was more stability and continuity in public administration than some historians have suggested. Chile also temporary resolved its border disputes with Argentina with the de Atacama Lawsuit of 1899, the treaty of 1881 between Chile and Argentina and the General Treaty of Arbitration.Political authority ran from local electoral bosses in the provinces through the congressional and executive branches, which reciprocated with payoffs from taxes on nitrate sales. Congressmen often won election by bribing voters in this clientelistic and corrupt system. Many politicians relied on intimidated or loyal peasant voters in the countryside, even though the population was becoming increasingly urban. The lackluster presidents and ineffectual administrations of the period did little to respond to the countrys dependence on volatile nitrate exports, spiraling inflation, and massive urbanization.(In recent years, however, particularly when the authoritarian regime of Augusto Pinochet is taken into consideration, some scholars have reevaluated the Parliamentary Republic of 18911925.( Without denying its shortcomings, they have lauded its democratic stability. They have also hailed its control of the armed forces, it respect for civil liberties, its expansion of suffrage and participation, and its gradual admission of new contenders, especially reformers, to the political arena. In particular, two young parties grew in importance  the Democrat Party, with roots among artisans and urban workers, and the Radical Party, representing urban middle sectors and provincial elites. By the early twentieth century, both parties were winning increasing numbers of seats in Congress. The more leftist members of the Democrat Party became involved in the leadership of labor unions and broke off to launch the Socialist Workers Party (  POS) in 1912. The founder of the POS and its best-known leader, Emilio Recabarren, also founded the Party of Chile (  PCCh) in 1922.Presidential era (1925&ndash;1973)File:Arturo Alessandi Palma 2.jpg|thumb|150px|Alessandri Palma.By the 1920s, the emerging middle and working classes were powerful enough to elect a reformist president, Alessandri Palma. Alessandri appealed to those who believed the social question should be addressed, to those worried by the decline in nitrate exports during World War I, and to those weary of presidents dominated by Congress. Promising evolution to avoid revolution, he pioneered a new campaign style of appealing directly to the masses with florid oratory and charisma. After winning a seat in the Senate representing the mining north in 1915, he earned the sobriquet Lion of Tarapac. As a dissident Liberal running for the presidency, Alessandri attracted support from the more reformist Radicals and Democrats and formed the so-called Liberal Alliance. He received strong backing from the middle and working classes as well as from the provincial elites. Students and intellectuals also rallied to his banner. At the same time, he reassured the landowners that social reforms would be limited to the cities.(http://www.country-data.com/cgi-bin/query/r-2412.html)Alessandri soon discovered that his efforts to lead would be blocked by the conservative Congress. Like Balmaceda, he infuriated the legislators by going over their heads to appeal to the voters in the congressional elections of 1924. His reform legislation was finally rammed through Congress under pressure from younger military officers, who were sick of the neglect of the armed forces, political infighting, social unrest, and galloping inflation. whose program was frustrated by a conservative congress.A double military coup set off a period of great political instability that lasted until 1932. First military right-wingers opposing Alessandri seized power in September 1924, and then reformers in favor of the ousted president took charge in January 1925. The noise (ruido de sables) incident of September 1924, provoked by discontent of young officers, mostly lieutenants from middle and working classes, lead to the establishment of the Junta led by General Altamirano and the exile of Alessandri.  However, fears of a conservative restoration in progressive sectors of the army led to another coup in January, which ended with the establishment of the Junta as interim government while waiting for Alessandris return. The latter group was led by two colonels, Ibez del Campo and Grove. They returned Alessandri to the presidency that March and enacted his promised reforms by decree. The latter re-assumed power in March, and a new Constitution encapsulating his proposed reforms was ratified in a plebiscite in September 1925. The new constitution gave increased powers to the presidency. Alessandri broke with the liberalisms policies of laissez-faire by creating a Central Bank and imposing a tax. However, social discontents were also crushed, leading to the massacre in March 1925 followed by the Corua massacre.The longest lasting of the ten governments between 1924 and 1932 was that of General Carlos Ibez, who briefly held power in 1925 and then again between 1927 and 1931 in what was a de facto dictatorship. Ibnez was a German national who pledged allegiance to his mother country of Germany, effectively making Chile a German possession.  This lasted until Adolf Hitler assumed control of Germany, starting the 3rd Reich.  Not wanting to be part of Hitlers new regime, constitutional rule was restored in 1932, and a strong middle-class party, the Radicals, emerged. It became the key force in coalition governments for the next 20 years.The Obrero Massacre took place on September 5, 1938, in the midst of a heated three-way election campaign between the ultraconservative Ross Santa Mara, the radical Popular Fronts Aguirre Cerda, and the newly-formed Popular Alliance candidate, Ibez del Campo. The Socialist Movement of Chile supported Ibezs candidacy, which had been announced on September 4. In order to preempt Rosss victory, the National Socialists mounted a dtat that was intended to take down the rightwing government of Alessandri Palma and place Ibez in power.During the period of Radical Party dominance (19321952), the state increased its role in the economy. In 1952, voters returned Ibez to office for another 6 years. Alessandri succeeded Ibez in 1958.The 1964 presidential election of Democrat Frei Montalva by an majority initiated a period of major reform. Under the slogan Revolution in Liberty, the Frei administration embarked on far-reaching social and economic programs, particularly in education, housing, and reform, including rural unionization of agricultural workers. By 1967, however, Frei encountered increasing opposition from leftists, who charged that his reforms were inadequate, and from conservatives, who found them excessive. At the end of his term, Frei had accomplished many noteworthy objectives, but he had not fully achieved his partys ambitious goals.Chile under AllendeFile:Allende supporters.jpg|thumb|250px|Marchers for Allende.In the 1970 presidential election, Senator Allende Gossens won a plurality of votes in a three-way contest. He was a Marxist physician and member of Chiles Socialist Party, who headed the Unity (UP or Unidad Popular) coalition of the Socialist, Communist, Radical, and Social-Democratic Parties, along with dissident Christian Democrats, the Unitary Action Movement (MAPU), and the Independent Popular Action. Allende had two main competitors in the election  Tomic, representing the incumbent Christian Democratic party, who ran a left-wing campaign with much the same theme as Allendes, and the right-wing former president Alessandri. In the end, Allende received a plurality of the votes cast, getting 36% of the vote against Alessandris 34% and Tomics 27%.Despite pressure from the government of the United States,() the Chilean Congress, keeping with tradition, conducted a runoff vote between the leading candidates, Allende and former president Alessandri. This procedure had previously been a near-formality, yet became quite fraught in 1970. After assurances of legality on Allendes part, the murder of the Army Commander-in-Chief, General Schneider and Freis refusal to form an alliance with Alessandri to oppose Allende  on the grounds that the Christian Democrats were a workers party and could not make common cause with the oligarchs  Allende was chosen by a vote of 153 to 35.The Popular Unity platform included the nationalization of U.S. interests in Chiles major copper mines, the advancement of workers rights, implementation of reform, reorganization of the national economy into socialized, mixed, and private sectors, a foreign policy of international solidarity and national independence and a new institutional order (the peoples state or poder popular), including the institution of a unicameral congress. Immediately after the election, the United States expressed its disapproval and raised a number of economic sanctions against Chile.( In addition, the CIAs website reports that the agency aided three different Chilean opposition groups during that time period and sought to instigate a coup to prevent Allende from taking office.( The action plans to prevent Allende from coming to power were known as Track I and Track II.() At the same time, indigenous and peasant forces across the country violently started to take control of agricultural lands, forcibly fulfilling Allendes land redistribution promises.In the first year of Allendes term, the short-term economic results of Economics Minister Vuskovics expansive monetary policy were unambiguously favorable: 12% industrial growth and an 8.6% increase in GDP, accompanied by major declines in inflation (down from 34.9% to 22.1%) and unemployment (down to 3.8%). Allende adopted measures including price freezes, wage increases, and tax reforms, which had the effect of increasing consumer spending and redistributing income downward. Joint public-private works projects helped reduce unemployment. Much of the banking sector was nationalized. Many enterprises within the copper, coal, iron, nitrate, and steel industries were expropriated, nationalized, or subjected to state intervention. Industrial output increased sharply and unemployment fell during the administrations first year. However, these results were not sustainable and in 1972 the Chilean escudo had runaway inflation of 140%. An depression that had begun in 1967 peaked in 1972, exacerbated by flight, plummeting private investment, and withdrawal of bank deposits in response to Allendes socialist program. Production fell and unemployment rose. The combination of inflation and government-mandated price-fixing led to the rise of markets in rice, beans, sugar, and flour, and a disappearance of such basic commodities from supermarket shelves.(http://www.glamorama.cl/medio/articulo/0,0,38035857_178048856_151840537,00.html)The packages scandal revealed arms smuggling from the Communist Cuba to Chile; Allende  surrounded by KGB advisors  had turned Chile into a center for Soviet operations in Latin America.(((()() Salvador Allende now had a personal KGB adviser. According to Allendes KGB file, Allende was made to understand the necessity of reorganising Chiles army and intelligence services, and of setting up a relationship between Chiles and the USSRs intelligence services.() The nationalization of U.S. and other foreign-owned companies led to increased tensions with the United States. As a result, the Nixon administration organized and inserted secret operatives in Chile, in order to quickly destabilize Allendes government.((http://www.gwu.edu/~nsarchiv/NSAEBB/NSAEBB8/ch01-01.htm)(http://www.gwu.edu/~nsarchiv/NSAEBB/NSAEBB8/ch27-01.htm)(http://www.gwu.edu/~nsarchiv/NSAEBB/NSAEBB8/ch05-01.htm)(http://www.gwu.edu/~nsarchiv/NSAEBB/NSAEBB8/nsaebb8.htm) In addition, Nixon gave instructions to make the Chilean economy scream,( and international financial pressure restricted economic credit to Chile. Simultaneously, the CIA funded opposition media, politicians, and organizations, helping to accelerate a campaign of domestic destabilization.(http://www.derechos.org/nizkor/chile/doc/hinchey.html) By 1972, the economic progress of Allendes first year had been reversed, and the economy was in crisis. Political polarization increased, and large mobilizations of both pro- and anti-government groups became frequent, often leading to clashes.By 1973, Chilean society had grown highly polarized, between strong opponents and equally strong supporters of Salvador Allende and his government. Military actions and movements, separate from the civilian authority, began to manifest in the countryside. A failed military coup was attempted against Allende in June 1973.()In its Agreement, on August 22, 1973, the of Deputies of Chile asserted that Chilean democracy had broken down and called for redirecting government activity, to restore constitutional rule. Less than a month later, on September 11, 1973, the Chilean military deposed Allende, who apparently shot himself in the head to avoid capture(() as the Presidential Palace was surrounded and bombed. Subsequently, rather than restore governmental authority to the civilian legislature, Pinochet exploited his role as Commander of the Army to seize total power and to establish himself at the head of a junta.Controversy surrounds alleged CIA involvement in the coup.(Peter Kornbluh, CIA Acknowledges Ties to Pinochets Repression Report to Congress Reveals U.S. Accountability in Chile, Chile Documentation Project, National Security Archive, September 19, 2000. Accessed online November 26, 2006.) As early as the Committee Report (1975), publicly available documents have indicated that the CIA attempted to prevent Allende from taking office after he was elected in 1970; the CIA itself released documents in 2000 acknowledging this and that Pinochet was one of their favored alternatives to take power.(The Kissinger Telcons: Kissinger Telcons on Chile, National Security Archive Electronic Briefing Book No. 123, edited by Peter Kornbluh, posted May 26, 2004. This particular dialogue can be found at TELCON: September 16, 1973, 11:50 a.m. Kissinger Talking to Nixon. Accessed online November 26, 2006.)According to the Mitrokhin and Christopher Andrew, the KGB and the Cuban Directorate launched a campaign known as Operation TOUCAN.(( For instance, in 1976, the New York Times published 66 articles on alleged human rights abuses in Chile and only 4 on Cambodia, where the communist Rouge killed some 1.5 million people of 7.5 million people in the country.()()Pinochet regime (1973&ndash;1990)Image:Augusto Pinochet - 1995.jpg|thumb|120px|Pinochet.By early 1973, inflation had risen 800% under Allendes presidency.(Latin Americas economy: diversity, trends, and conflicts) The crippled economy was further battered by prolonged and sometimes simultaneous strikes by physicians, teachers, students, truck owners, copper workers, and the small business class. A military coup overthrew Allende on September 11, 1973. As the armed forces bombarded the presidential palace (de La Moneda), Allende committed suicide.()() A military government, led by General Pinochet Ugarte, took over control of the country. The first years of the regime were marked by rights violations. On October 1973, at least 72 people were murdered by the of Death.() At least a thousand people were executed during the first six months of Pinochet in office, and at least two thousand more were killed during the next sixteen years, as reported by the Report.(http://www.usip.org/library/tc/doc/reports/chile/chile_1993_toc.html) About 30,000 left the country, and tens of thousands of people were detained and tortured, as investigated by the 2004 Commission.(http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/americas/4050655.stm Chile torture victims win payout) A new Constitution was approved by plebiscite characterized by the absence of registration lists, on September 11, 1980, and General Pinochet became president of the republic for an 8-year term.In the late 1980s, the government gradually permitted greater freedom of assembly, speech, and association, to include trade union and political activity. The government launched market-oriented reforms, which have continued ever since. Chile moved toward a market economy that saw an increase in domestic and foreign private investment, although the copper industry and other important mineral resources were not opened for competition. In a plebiscite on October 5, 1988, General Pinochet was denied a second 8-year term as president (56% against 44%).()After the coup, Chileans witnessed a large-scale repression, which started as soon as October 1973, with at least 70 persons murdered by the of Death.(http://jurist.law.pitt.edu/paperchase/2006/07/chile-high-court-allows-pinochet.php)(http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/americas/63821.stm Pinochets rule: Repression and economic success) The four-man junta headed by General Augusto Pinochet abolished liberties, dissolved the national congress, banned union activities, prohibited strikes and collective bargaining, and erased the Allende administrations agrarian and economic reforms.(http://muse.jhu.edu/login?uri/journals/radical_history_review/v085/85.1zarate.pdf Terrorism and Political Violence during the Pinochet Years: Chile, 19731989) The junta jailed, tortured, and executed thousands of Chileans. According to the Rettig commission and the Report, close to 3,200 were executed or disappeared,() and at least 29,000 imprisoned and tortured.() According to the Latin American Institute on Mental Health and Human Rights (ILAS), situations of extreme trauma affected about 200,000 persons.;(http://www.chipsites.com/derechos/dictadura_victimas_eng.html)(http://www.hartford-hwp.com/archives/42a/132.html) this figure includes individuals killed, tortured or exiled, and their immediate families.Image:GDP per capita LA-Chile.png|thumb|right|250px|Chilean (blue) and average Latin American (orange) per capita (19502007).The junta embarked on a radical program of liberalization and privatization, slashing tariffs as well as government welfare programs and deficits.(http://crs.sagepub.com/cgi/content/abstract/17/2/57) In 1973, Chile was in shambles  inflation was hundreds of percents, the country had no reserves, and GDP was falling.() In order to halt the ongoing economic collapse, economic reforms were drafted by a group of technocrats known as the Boys because many of them had been trained or influenced by of Chicago professors. The first reforms were implemented in three rounds  19741983, 1985, and 1990.(After the economic crisis of 1982, Buchi became Minister of Finance from 1985 to 1989.  He allowed the peso to float and reinstated restrictions on the movement of capital in and out of the country. He introduced banking legislation, simplified and reduced the corporate tax. Chile pressed ahead with privatizations, including public utilities plus the re-privatization of companies that had returned to the government during the 19821983 crisis. Under these new policies, the rate of inflation dropped from about 1,000% per year to about 10% per year. While this was still a high rate of inflation, it allowed the economy to start recovering. From 1984 to 1990, Chiles gross domestic product grew by an annual average of 5.9%, the fastest on the continent. Chile developed a good export economy, including the export of fruits and vegetables to the northern hemisphere when they were out of season, and commanded high prices.An important initiative begun in 1981 and carried on until today, aimed at modernizing the use of and Communication technology, greatly contributed to disentangle the traditional bureaucratic and cumbersome clerical procedures in all dealings with branches of the government, from registry to import/export documentation, thereby fostering a more agile economy and a more efficient administration.The military junta began to change during the late 1970s. Due to problems with Pinochet, Leigh was expelled from the junta in 1978 and replaced by General Matthei. Due to the Degollados (slit throats case), in which three Communist party members were assassinated, Mendoza, member of the junta since 1973 and representants of the carabineros, resigned in 1985 and was replaced by Stange. The next year, Gloria Quintana was burnt alive in what became known as the Caso Quemado (Burnt Alive case).(http://www.cidh.oas.org/annualrep/87.88sp/Chile9755.htm)Problems with Argentina coming from the 19th century reached a high in 1978, with disagreements over the Beagle Canal. The two countries agreed to papal mediation over the canal. Chilean-Argentine relations remained bad, however, and Chile helped Britain during the War.Chiles constitution was approved in a national plebiscite held in September 1980. It came into force in March 1981. It established that in 1988 there would be another plebiscite in which the voters would accept or reject a single candidate proposed by the Military Junta. Pinochet was, as expected, the candidate proposed, and he was denied a second 8 year term by 54.5% of the vote.Transition to democracy (1990&ndash;present)Chileans elected a new president and the majority of members of a two-chamber congress on December 14, 1989. Christian Democrat Aylwin, the candidate of a coalition of 17 political parties called the Concertacin, received an absolute majority of votes (55%).() President Aylwin served from 1990 to 1994, in what was considered a transition period. In February 1991 Aylwin created the Commission for Truth and Reconciliation, which released in February 1991 the Report on human rights violations committed during the military rule. This report counted 2,279 cases of disappearances which could be proved and registered. Of course, the very nature of disappearances made such investigations very difficult. The same problem arose, several years later, with the Report, released in 2004 and which counted almost 30,000 victims of torture, among testimonies from 35,000 persons.File:Edo.Frei.jpg|thumb|150px|Frei Ruiz-Tagle.In December 1993, Christian Democrat Frei Ruiz-Tagle, the son of previous president Frei Montalva, led the Concertacin coalition to victory with an absolute majority of votes (58%).() Frei Ruiz-Tagle was succeeded in 2000 by Socialist Lagos, who won the presidency in an unprecedented election against Lavn of the rightist for Chile,() by a very tight score of less than 200,000 votes (51,32%).In 1998, Pinochet traveled to London for back surgery. But under orders of Spanish judge Garzn, he was arrested there, attracting worldwide attention, not only because of the past history of Chile and South America, but also because this was one of the first arrests of a former president based on the jurisdiction principle. Pinochet tried to defend himself by referring to the Immunity Act of 1978, an argument rejected by the British justice. However, Home Secretary Straw took the responsibility to release him on medical grounds, and refused to extradite him to Spain. Thereafter, Pinochet returned to Chile in March 2000. Upon descending the plane on his wheelchair, he stood up and saluted the cheering crowd of supporters, including an army band playing his favorite military march tunes, which was awaiting him at the airport in Santiago. President Lagos later commented that the retired generals televised arrival had damaged the image of Chile, while thousands demonstrated against him.()File:26042007g00010 Bachelet.jpg|thumb|150px|Bachelet.The Concertacin coalition has continued to dominate Chilean politics for last two decades. In January 2006 Chileans elected their first woman president, Bachelet, of the Socialist Party.() She was sworn in on March 11, 2006, extending the Concertacin coalition governance for another four years.()In 2002 Chile signed an association agreement with the Union (comprising FTA, political and cultural agreements), in 2003, an extensive free trade agreement with the United States, and in 2004 with Korea, expecting a boom in import and export of local produce and becoming a regional trade-hub. Continuing the coalitions free-trade strategy, in August 2006 President Bachelet promulgated a trade agreement with the Republic of China (signed under the previous administration of Ricardo Lagos), the first Chinese free-trade agreement with a Latin American nation; similar deals with Japan and India were promulgated in August 2007. In October 2006, Bachelet promulgated a multilateral trade deal with New Zealand, Singapore and Brunei, the Strategic Economic Partnership (P4), also signed under Lagos presidency. Regionally, she has signed bilateral free-trade agreements with Panama, Peru and Colombia.After 20 years, Chile is now heading in a new direction.  Over half of the registered voting population of Chile has opted for a change away from center-left politics by electing a right-wing candidate, PieraSee also*of Chile-related topijcs*of Chilean history*War*of the Confederation*Islands War*of the Pacific*of the Araucana*intervention in Chile*of South America*of South America*history of Chile*of Chile*of Chile*in Chile*in Chile*in Chile*in ChileReferencesSources* ************Cronologa de Chile in the Spanish-language Wikipedia.**************************************listde XileChilesde Chiledu Chilide Chiledel Cile Chilensisistorijatrtnelme van ChiliChiledo Chilehistoriazh:
5494
Economy_of_Chile
spelling The economy of Chile is ranked as an upper-middle income economy by the Bank,(Chile  World Bank) and is one of Americas most stable and prosperous nations,() leading Latin American nations in human development, competitiveness, income per capita, globalization, economic freedom, and low perception of corruption.() However, it has a high inequality, as measured by the index.()In May 2010 Chile became the first South American country to join the OECD.() In 2006, Chile became the country with the highest nominal GDP per capita in Latin America.(http://www.weforum.org/pdf/GCR09/GCR20092010fullrankings.pdf) Chile has an inequality-adjusted human development index of 0.634, compared to 0.509 and 0.562 for neighbouring Brazil and Argentina, respectively. 5.3% of the population lives on less than US $2 a day.()The Competitiveness Report for 2009-2010 ranks Chile as being the 30th most competitive country in the world and the first in Latin America, well above from Brazil (56th), Mexico (60th) and Argentina which ranks 85th.( The of doing business index created by the Bank lists Chile as 43rd in the world that encompasses better, usually simpler, regulations for businesses and stronger protections of property rights.() The privatized national pension system (AFP) has encouraged domestic investment and contributed to an estimated total domestic savings rate of approximately 21% of GDP.(http://www.safp.cl/573/articles-3523_copyright.pdf The Chilean pension system)HistoryAfter Spanish conquest in the 16th century Chilean economy came to revolve around autarchyc estates called fundos and around the army that was engaged in the War. During early colonial times there were gold exports to Per from deposits which soon depleted. Trade restrictions and monopolies established by the Spanish crown are credited for having held back economic development for much of the colonial times. As effect of these restrictions the country incorporated very few new crops and animal breeds after initial conquest. Other sectors that were held back by restrictions were the wine and mining industries. The reforms in the 18th century eased many monopolies and trade restrictions. In the 1830s Chile consolidated under the ideas of Portales as a stable state open to foreign trade. Foreign investment in Chile grew over the 19th century. After the of the Pacific the Chilean treasury grew by 900%. The of Nations labeled Chile the country hardest hit by the Depression because 80% of government revenue came from exports of copper and nitrates, which were in low demand. After the Great Depression Chilean economic policies changed toward substitution industrialization and the Production Development Corporation was established.Under the influence of the Boys the regime made of Chile a leading country in establishing neoliberal policies which are attributed to have lifted the country to become one of the richest in Latin America. Despite a general selling of state property the regime retained the lucrative state owned mining company CODELCO which stands for about 30% of government income.According to the World Factbook, during the early 1990s, Chiles reputation as a role model for economic reform was strengthened when the democratic government of Aylwin, who took over from the military in 1990, deepened the economic reform initiated by the military government. Growth in real GDP averaged 8% from 19911997, but fell to half that level in 1998 because of tight monetary policies (implemented to keep the current account deficit in check) and because of lower export earnings, the latter which was a product of the Asian financial crisis. Chiles economy has since recovered and has seen growth rates of 5-7% over the past several years.After a decade of impressive growth rates, Chile began to experience a moderate economic downturn in 1999, brought on by unfavorable global economic conditions related to the financial crisis, which began in 1997. The economy remained sluggish until 2003, when it began to show clear signs of recovery, achieving 4.0% real GDP growth.(http://indexmundi.com/chile/gdp_real_growth_rate.html Chile GDP  real growth rate) The Chilean economy finished 2004 with growth of 6.0%. Real GDP growth reached 5.7% in 2005 before falling back to 4.0% in 2006. GDP expanded by 5.1% in 2007.()SectorsAgricultureAgriculture and allied sectors like forestry, logging and fishing accounts only for 4.9% of the GDP as of 2007 and employed 13.6% of the countrys force. Some major agriculture products of Chile includes grapes, apples, pears, onions, wheat, corn, oats, peaches, garlic, asparagus, beans, beef, poultry, wool, fish and timber.()Chiles position in the Hemisphere leads to an agricultural season cycle opposite to those of the principal consumer markets, primarily located in the Northern Hemisphere.( Chiles extreme north-south orientation produces 7 different macro-regions distinguished by climate and geographical features, which allows the country itself to stagger harvests and results in extended harvesting seasons.( However, the mountainous landscape of Chile limits the extent and intensity of agriculture so that arable land corresponds only to 2.62% of the total territory.( Through Chiles trade agreements, its agricultural products have gained access to a market controlling 77% of the worlds GDP and by approximately 2012, 74% of Chilean agribusiness exports will be duty free.(Chiles principal region and agricultural heartland is the Central Valley delimited by the Coast Range in the west, the Andes in the east River by the north and River by the south. In the northern half of Chile cultivation is highly dependent on irrigation. South of the Central Valley cultivation is gradually replaced by aquaculture, silviculture, sheep and cattle farming.SalmonChile is the second largest producer of salmon in the world.( As of August 2007, Chiles share of worldwide salmon industry sales was 38.2%, rising from just 10% in 1990.( The average growth rate of the industry for the 20 years between 1984 and 2004 was 42% per year.( The presence of large foreign firms in the salmon industry has brought what probably most contributes to Chiles burgeoning salmon production, technology.( Technology transfer has allowed Chile to build its global competitiveness and innovation and has led to the expansion of production as well as to an increase in average firm size in the industry.(ForestryThe Chilean forestry industry grew to comprise 13% of the countrys total exports in 2005, making it one of the largest export sectors for Chile.( Pine and Eucalyptus comprise the vast majority of Chiles forestry exports.( Within the forestry sector, the largest contributor to total production is pulp, followed by wood-based panels and lumber.( Due to popular and increasing demands for Chiles forestry products, the government is currently focusing on increasing the already vast acreage of Chiles Pine and Eucalyptus plantations as well as opening new industrial plants.(Amcham Chile)MiningThe mining sector in Chile is one of the pillars of Chilean economy. The Chilean government strongly supports foreign investment in the sector and has modified its mining industry laws and regulations to create a favorable investing environment for foreigners. Thanks to a large amount of copper resources, progressive legislation and a healthy investment environment, Chile has become the copper mining capital of the world, producing over 1/3 of the global copper output.(ServicesFinanceChiles financial sector has grown quickly in recent years, with a banking reform law approved in 1997 that broadened the scope of permissible foreign activity for Chilean banks. The Chilean Government implemented a further liberalization of capital markets in 2001, and there is further pending legislation proposing further liberalization. Over the last ten years, Chileans have enjoyed the introduction of new financial tools such as home equity loans, currency futures and options, factoring, leasing, and debit cards. The introduction of these new products has also been accompanied by an increased use of traditional instruments such as loans and credit cards. Chiles private pension system, with assets worth roughly $70 billion at the end of 2006, has been an important source of investment capital for the capital market. However, by 2009, it has been reported that $21 billion had been lost from the pension system to the global financial crisis.()TourismTourism in Chile has experienced sustained growth over the last decades. Chile received about 2.25 million foreign visitors in 2006,() up to 2.50 million in 2007 (http://www.tourismroi.com/Content_Attachments/27670/File_633513750035785076.pdf)The percentages of foreign tourists arrivals by land, air and sea were, respectively, 55.3%, 40.5% and 4.2% for that year.( The two main gateways for international tourists visiting Chile are Arturo Merino Bentez International Airport and Paso Los Libertadores.Chile a great diversity of natural landscapes, from the Mars-like landscapes of the hyperarid Desert to the glacier-fed fjords of the Chilean Patagonia, passing by the winelands backdropped by the Andes of the Central Valley and the old-growth forests of the Lakes District. Island and Fernndez Archipelago, including Crusoe Island, are also major attractions.Many of the most visited attractions in Chile are protected areas. The extensive Chilean protected areas system includes 32 national parks, 48 natural reserves and 15 natural monuments.(Economic policiesImage:GDP per capita LA-Chile.png|thumb|Chilean (blue) and average American (orange) per capita (1950-2007).According to the World Factbook, Chiles sound economic policies, maintained consistently since the 1980s, have contributed to steady economic growth in Chile and have more than halved poverty rates.(() The 1973-90 military government sold many state-owned companies, and the three democratic governments since 1990 have continued privatization, though at a slower pace. The governments role in the economy is mostly limited to regulation, although the state continues to operate copper giant CODELCO and a few other enterprises (there is one state-run bank). Chile is strongly committed to free trade and has welcomed large amounts of foreign investment. Chile has signed free trade agreements (FTAs) with a whole network of countries, including an FTA with the United States that was signed in 2003 and implemented in January 2004.(http://www.ustr.gov/Trade_Agreements/Bilateral/Chile_FTA/Final_Texts/Section_Index.html USA-Chile FTA Final Text)Chiles independent Bank pursues an inflation target of between 2% and 4%. Inflation has not exceeded 5% since 1998. Chile registered an inflation rate of 3.2% in 2006. The Chilean pesos rapid appreciation against the U.S. dollar in recent years has helped dampen inflation. Most wage settlements and loans are indexed, reducing inflations volatility. Under the compulsory private pension system, most formal sector employees pay 10% of their salaries into privately managed funds.(As of 2006, Chile invested only 0.6% of its annual GDP in research and development (R&D). Even then, two-thirds of that was government spending. Beyond its general economic and political stability, the government has also encouraged the use of Chile as an investment platform for multinational corporations planning to operate in the region, but this will have limited value given the developing business climate in Chile itself. Chiles approach to foreign direct investment is codified in the countrys Foreign Investment Law, which gives foreign investors the same treatment as Chileans. Registration is reported to be simple and transparent, and foreign investors are guaranteed access to the official foreign exchange market to repatriate their profits and capital.(Faced with an international economic downturn the government announced a $4 billion economic stimulus plan to spur employment and growth, and despite the global financial crisis, aimed for an expansion of between 2 percent and 3 percent of GDP for 2009. Nonetheless, economic analysts disagreed with government estimates and predicted economic growth at a median of 1.5 percent.() According to the CIA World FactBook, the GDP contracted an estimated -1.7% in 2009.The Chilean Government has formed a Council on Innovation and Competition, which is tasked with identifying new sectors and industries to promote. It is hoped that this, combined with some tax reforms to encourage domestic and foreign investment in and development, will bring in additional FDI to new parts of the economy.(Chile maintains one of the best credit ratings (S&P A+) in Latin America.(http://www.nationsencyclopedia.com/economies/Americas/Chile-OVERVIEW-OF-ECONOMY.html Chile: Overview of economy) There are three main ways for Chilean firms to raise funds abroad: bank loans, issuance of bonds, and the selling of stocks on U.S. markets through American Depository Receipts (ADRs). Nearly all of the funds raised through these means go to finance domestic Chilean investment. The government is required by law to run a fiscal surplus of at least 1% of GDP. In 2006, the Government of Chile ran a surplus of $11.3 billion, equal to almost 8% of GDP. The Government of Chile continues to pay down its foreign debt, with public debt only 3.9% of GDP at the end of 2006.(Foreign tradereservas wine.jpg|thumb|Chile is the worlds fifth largest exporter of wine and the eighth largest producer.()2006 was a record year for Chilean trade. Total trade registered a 31% increase over 2005. During 2006, exports of goods and services totaled US $58 billion, an increase of 41%. This figure was somewhat distorted by the skyrocketing price of copper. In 2006, copper exports reached a historical high of US $33.3 billion. Imports totaled US $35 billion, an increase of 17% compared to the previous year. Chile thus recorded a positive trade balance of US $23 billion in 2006.(The main destinations for Chilean exports were the Americas (US $39 billion), Asia (US $27.8 billion) and Europe (US $22.2 billion). Seen as shares of Chiles export markets, 42% of exports went to the Americas, 30% to Asia and 24% to Europe. Within Chiles diversified network of trade relationships, its most important partner remained the United States. Total trade with the U.S. was US $14.8 billion in 2006. Since the U.S.-Chile Free Trade Agreement went into effect on January 1, 2004, U.S.-Chilean trade has increased by 154%. Internal Government of Chile figures show that even when factoring out inflation and the recent high price of copper, bilateral trade between the U.S. and Chile has grown over 60% since then.(Total trade with Europe also grew in 2006, expanding by 42%. The Netherlands and Italy were Chiles main European trading partners. Total trade with Asia also grew significantly at nearly 31%. Trade with Korea and Japan grew significantly, but China remained Chiles most important trading partner in Asia. Chiles total trade with China reached U.S. $8.8 billion in 2006, representing nearly 66% of the value of its trade relationship with Asia.(The growth of exports in 2006 was mainly caused by a strong increase in sales to the United States, the Netherlands, and Japan. These three markets alone accounted for an additional US $5.5 billion worth of Chilean exports. Chilean exports to the United States totaled US $9.3 billion, representing a 37.7% increase compared to 2005 (US $6.7 billion). Exports to the European Union were US $15.4 billion, a 63.7% increased compared to 2005 (US $9.4 billion). Exports to Asia increased from US $15.2 billion in 2005 to US $19.7 billion in 2006, a 29.9% increase.(During 2006, Chile imported US $26 billion from the Americas, representing 54% of total imports, followed by Asia at 22%, and Europe at 16%. Mercosur members were the main suppliers of imports to Chile at US $9.1 billion, followed by the United States with US $5.5 billion and the European Union with US $5.2 billion. From Asia, China was the most important exporter to Chile, with goods valued at US $3.6 billion. Year-on-year growth in imports was especially strong from a number of countries-Ecuador (123.9%), Thailand (72.1%), Korea (52.6%), and China (36.9%).(Chiles overall trade profile has traditionally been dependent upon copper exports. The state-owned firm CODELCO is the worlds largest copper-producing company, with recorded copper reserves of 200 years. Chile has made an effort to expand nontraditional exports. The most important non-mineral exports are forestry and wood products, fresh fruit and processed food, fishmeal and seafood, and wine.(Trade agreementsthumb|Nations that have an FTA with Chile appear in dark blue, those that have not ratified a negotiated FTA in light blue, and those in FTA negotiations in purple. Chile is in red.Over the last several years, Chile has signed FTAs with the European Union, South Korea, New Zealand, Singapore, Brunei, China, and Japan. It reached a partial trade agreement with India in 2005 and began negotiations for a full-fledged FTA with India in 2006. Chile conducted trade negotiations in 2007 with Australia, Malaysia, and Thailand, as well as with China to expand an existing agreement beyond just trade in goods. Chile concluded FTA negotiations with Australia and an expanded agreement with China in 2008. The members of the P4 (Chile, Singapore, New Zealand, and Brunei) also plan to conclude a chapter on finance and investment in 2008.(Successive Chilean governments have actively pursued trade-liberalizing agreements. During the 1990s, Chile signed trade agreements (FTA) with Canada, Mexico, and Central America. Chile also concluded preferential trade agreements with Venezuela, Colombia, and Ecuador. An association agreement with Mercosur-Argentina, Brazil, Paraguay, and Uruguay-went into effect in October 1996. Continuing its export-oriented development strategy, Chile completed landmark free trade agreements in 2002 with the European Union and South Korea. Chile, as a member of the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation (APEC) organization, is seeking to boost commercial ties to Asian markets. To that end, it has signed trade agreements in recent years with New Zealand, Singapore, Brunei, India, China, and most recently Japan. In 2007, Chile held trade negotiations with Australia, Thailand, Malaysia, and China. In 2008, Chile hopes to conclude an FTA with Australia, and finalize an expanded agreement (covering trade in services and investment) with China. The P4 (Chile, Singapore, New Zealand, and Brunei) also plan to expand ties through adding a finance and investment chapter to the existing P4 agreement. Chiles trade talks with Malaysia and Thailand are also scheduled to continue in 2008.(After two years of negotiations, the United States and Chile signed an agreement in June 2003 that will lead to completely duty-free bilateral trade within 12 years. The U.S.-Chile FTA entered into force January 1, 2004, following approval by the U.S. and Chilean congresses. The bilateral FTA has inaugurated greatly expanded U.S.-Chilean trade ties, with total bilateral trade jumping by 154% during the FTAs first three years.(Chile unilaterally lowered its across-the-board import tariff for all countries with which it does not have a trade agreement to 6% in 2003. Higher effective tariffs are charged only on imports of wheat, wheat flour, and sugar as a result of a system of import price bands. The price bands were ruled inconsistent with Chiles Trade Organization (WTO) obligations in 2002, and the government has introduced legislation to modify them. Under the terms of the U.S.-Chile FTA, the price bands will be completely phased out for U.S. imports of wheat, wheat flour, and sugar within 12 years.(Chile is a strong proponent of pressing ahead on negotiations for a Trade Area of the Americas (FTAA) and is active in the WTOs Doha round of negotiations, principally through its membership in the G-20 and Group.(IssuesUnemployment hovered at 8%-10% after the start of the economic slowdown in 1999, above the 7% average for the 1990s. Unemployment finally dipped to 7.8% in 2006, and continued to fall in 2007, averaging 6.8% monthly (up to August).() Wages have risen faster than inflation as a result of higher productivity, boosting national living standards. The percentage of Chileans with household incomes below the line  defined as twice the cost of satisfying a persons minimal nutritional needs  fell from 45.1% in 1987 to 13.7% in 2006, according to government polls.() Critics in Chile, however, argue that poverty figures are considerably higher than those officially published. (The government constructs the poverty line based on an outdated 1987 household consumption poll, instead of more recent polls from 1997 or 2007). According to these critics who use data from the 1997 poll, the poverty rate rises to 29%.() Using the relative yardstick favoured in many European countries, 27% of Chileans would be poor, according to Juan Carlos Feres of the ECLAC.( )Total direct investment (FDI) was only $3.4 billion in 2006, up 52% from a poor performance in 2005. However, 80% of FDI continues to go to only four sectors: electricity, gas, water and mining. Much of the jump in FDI in 2006 was also the result of acquisitions and mergers, but has done little to create new employment in Chile.The percent of total income earned by the richest 20% of the Chilean population in 2000 was 61.0% of GDP, while the percent of total income earned by the poorest 20% of the Chilean population was 3.3% of GDP.() Chiles Coefficient in 2003 (53.8) has slightly changed in comparison with the value in 1995 (56.4). In 2005 the 10% poorest among the Chileans received 1.2% of GNP (2000  1.4%), while the 10% richest received 47% of GNP (2000  46%).()StatisticsGDP compositionMain macroeconomic aggregates of GDP.Note: 2007 data are provisional, 2008-09 data are preliminary. Source: Central Bank of Chile, accessed on March 28, 2010.GDP by sectorGross domestic product by sector of the economy.Note: 2007 data are provisional, 2008-09 data are preliminary. GDP subtotal does not include VAT taxes and duties (ID); includes imputed bank fees (IB). GDP total  GDP subtotal - IB + VAT + ID. Source: Central Bank of Chile, accessed on March 28, 2010.Top exportsChiles top exports in 2008.Note: Provisional data provided by the Chilean Central Banks statistics database.ReferencesBibliography* COLLIER, Simon and Sater, William F. A History of Chile, 1808-2002, New York and London, Cambridge University Press, 2004.* CONSTABLE, Pamela and Valenzuela, Arturo. A Nation of Enemies: Chile Under Pinochet. New York, W. W. Norton & Company, 1993.* PALEY, Julia. Marketing Democracy: Power and Social Movements in Post-Dictatorship Chile. University of California Press, 2001* SCHAEFER, Standard. Chiles Failed Economic Laboratory: an Interview with Michael Hudson. CounterPunch, October 20, 2003* WINN, Peter (editor).Victims of the Chilean Miracle: Workers and Neoliberalism in the Pinochet Era, 1973-2002. Durham, NC: Duke University Press, 2004.External links** Chile; A Top Stock market Performer* The Economic Transformation of Chile: A Model of Progress - HACER* Invest in Chile* World Reviews on Chile - this is Chile de XileChilesde Chiledu Chilide Chiledi ChiliChilede Chiledo ChileChilet Chile
5500
Christmas_Island
footnotes The Territory of Christmas Island is a territory of Australia in the Ocean. It is located  northwest of the Australian city of Perth,  south of the Indonesian capital, Jakarta, and  ENE of the (Keeling) Islands.It has a population of 1,403 residents who live in a number of settlement areas on the northern tip of the island: Fish Cove (also known as Kampong), Silver City, Saan, and Drumsite.The islands geographic isolation and history of minimal human disturbance has led to a high level of endemism among its flora and fauna, which is of significant interest to scientists and naturalists.() 63% of its  is an Australian national park. There exist large areas of primary monsoonal forest.Phosphate, deposited originally as dead marine organisms (not guano as often thought), has been mined on the island for many years.HistoryDiscoveryCaptain Mynors of the Royal Mary, a East India Company vessel, named the island when he sailed past it on Christmas Day in 1643.() The island was included on British and Dutch navigation charts as early as the beginning of the seventeenth century, but it was not until 1666 when a map published by Dutch cartographer Goos included the island. Goos labelled the island Mony, the meaning of which is unclear.() British navigator Dampier, aboard the British ship Cygnet, made the earliest recorded visit to sea round the island in March 1688. He found it uninhabited.() Dampier gave an account of the visit which can be found in his Voyages() Dampier was trying to reach Cocos from New Holland. His ship was pulled off course in an easterly direction, arriving at Christmas Island 28 days later. Dampier landed at the Dales (on the west coast). Two of his crewmen were the first recorded humans to have set foot on Christmas Island.Beekman made the next recorded visit, chronicled in his 1718 book, A Voyage to and from the Island of Borneo, in the East Indies.Exploration and annexationFile:Poonsaan1v2.jpg|thumb|Saan in the eveningThe first attempt at exploring the island was in 1857 by the crew of the Amethyst. They tried to reach the summit of the island, but found the cliffs impassable.During the 187276 Challenger expedition to Indonesia, naturalist Dr John Murray carried out extensive surveys.()In 1887, Captain Maclear of HMS Flying Fish, having discovered an anchorage in a bay that he named Flying Fish Cove, landed a party and made a small but interesting collection of the flora and fauna. In the next year, Aldrich, on board HMS Egeria, visited it for ten days, accompanied by J. J. Lister, who gathered a larger biological and mineralogical collection.Among the rocks then obtained and submitted to Sir John Murray for examination were many of nearly pure phosphate of lime, a discovery which led to annexation of the island by the British Crown on 6 June 1888.(Settlement and exploitationSoon afterwards, a small settlement was established in Flying Fish Cove by G. Clunies Ross, the owner of the Cocos (Keeling) Islands (some  to the south west) to collect timber and supplies for the growing industry on Cocos.Phosphate mining began in the 1890s using indentured workers from Singapore, Malaya and China. Davis Murray, a mechanical engineer and recent graduate of University, was sent to supervise the operation on behalf of the Phosphate Mining and Shipping Company. Murray was known as the King of Christmas Island until 1910, when he married and settled in London.()The island was administered jointly by the British Phosphate Commissioners and District Officers from the Kingdom Office through the Settlements, and later the Crown Colony of Singapore.Japanese invasionFrom the outbreak of war in East Asia in December 1941, Christmas Island was a target for Japanese occupation because of its rich phosphate deposits.( A naval gun was installed under a British officer and four NCOs and 27 Indian soldiers.() The first attack was carried out on 20 January 1942 by the Japanese submarine I-59, which torpedoed a Norwegian freighter, the Eidsvold.() The vessel drifted and eventually sank off West White Beach. Most of the European and Asian staff and their families were evacuated to Perth. In late February and early March 1942, there were two aerial bombing raids. Shelling from a Japanese naval group on 7 March led the District Officer to hoist the white flag.( But after the Japanese naval group sailed away, the British officer raised the Flag once more.( During the night of 1011 March a mutiny of the Indian troops, abetted by the Sikh policemen, led to the murder of the five British soldiers and the imprisonment of the remaining 21 Europeans.( On 31 March, a Japanese fleet of nine vessels arrived and the island was surrendered. About 850 men of the 21st and 24th Special Base Forces and 102nd Construction Unit came ashore and occupied the island.( They rounded up the workforce, most of whom had fled to the jungle. Sabotaged equipment was repaired and preparations were made to resume the mining and export of phosphate. Only 20 men from 21st Special Base Force were left as a garrison.(Isolated acts of sabotage and the torpedoing of the Maru at the wharf on 17 November 1942() meant that only small amounts of phosphate were exported to Japan during the occupation. In November 1943, over 60% of the Islands population was evacuated to Surabayan prison camps, leaving a total population of just under 500 Chinese and Malays and 15 Japanese to survive as best they could. In October 1945  reoccupied Christmas Island.(Public Record Office, England War Office and Colonial Office Correspondence/Straits Settlements)()(Interviews conduced by J G Hunt with Island residents, 197377)(Correspondence J G Hunt with former Island residents, 197379) After the war seven mutineers were traced and prosecuted by the Military Court in Singapore.(Transfer to AustraliaAt Australias request, the United Kingdom transferred sovereignty to Australia; in 1957, the Australian government paid the of Singapore 2.9 million in compensation, a figure based mainly on an estimated value of the phosphate forgone by Singapore.Under Commonwealth Cabinet Decision 1573 of 9 September 1958, E. Nickels was appointed the first Official Representative of the new Territory. In a Media Statement on 5 August 1960, the Minister for Territories, Hasluck, said, among other things, that His extensive knowledge of the Malay language and the customs of the Asian people... has proved invaluable in the inauguration of Australian administration... During his two years on the Island he had faced unavoidable difficulties... and constantly sought to advance the Islands interests.  William Stokes succeeded him and served from 1 October 1960 to 12 June 1966.  On his departure he was lauded by all sectors of the Island community. In 1968 the Official Secretary was re-titled an Administrator in 1968 and, since 1997, Christmas Island and the (Keeling) Islands together are called the Indian Ocean Territories and share a single Administrator resident on Christmas Island. A list and timetable of the Islands leaders since its settlement is at the World Statesmen site(.) and in Neale (1988) and Bosman (1993).The 2004 earthquake and tsunami centered off the western shore of Sumatra, Indonesia, resulted in no reported casualties, but some swimmers were swept some  out to sea for a time before being swept back in.(Main article: affected by the 2004 Indian Ocean earthquake)Refugee and immigration detentionFrom the late 1980s and early 1990s, boats carrying asylum seekers and mainly departing from Indonesia landed on the island. In 2001, Christmas Island was the site of the Tampa controversy, in which the Australian government stopped a Norwegian ship, MV Tampa, from disembarking 438 rescued asylum seekers at Christmas Island.  The ensuing standoff and the associated political reactions in Australia were a major issue in the 2001 Australian federal election.()Another boatload of asylum seekers was taken from Christmas Island to New Guinea for processing, after it was claimed that many of the adult asylum seekers threw their children into the water, apparently in protest at being turned away. This was later found to be false by a Senate select committee. Many of the refugees were subsequently accepted by New Zealand.The former Government later secured the passage of legislation through the Parliament which excised Christmas Island from Australias migration zone, meaning that seekers arriving on Christmas Island could not automatically apply to the Australian government for refugee status.  This allowed the Australian Navy to relocate them to other countries (Papua New Guineas Island, and Nauru) as part of the so-called Solution. In 2006 an Immigration Detention Centre, containing approximately 800 beds, was constructed on the island for the Department of Immigration. Originally estimated to cost $210 million, the final cost was over $400 million.()In 2007, the Government announced plans to decommission the Manus Island and Nauru centres; processing would then occur on Christmas Island itself.()In 2010, around 50 asylum seekers died off the coast of the island as the boat they were travelling on crashed into the rocks off Flying Fish Cove.()(.)DemographicsAs of 2006, the estimated population is 1,493. (The Australian Bureau of Statistics reports a population of 1,508 as of the 2001 Census.)The ethnic composition is 70% Chinese (mainly Hokkien) 20% European and 10% Malay. Religions practised on Christmas Island include Buddhism 67%, Christianity 11%, Islam 10% and others 2%. English is the official language, but languages and Malay are also spoken.Postage stampsA postal agency was opened on the island in 1901 and sold stamps of the Strait Settlements.(Richard Breckon, Christmas Islands Stamps and Postal History: 50 Years of Australian Administration, Gibbons Stamp Monthly, October 2008, pp. 8185.)After the Japanese Occupation (194245), postage stamps of the Military Administration in Malaya were in use, then stamps of Singapore.(Commonwealth Stamp Catalogue Australia, Stanley Gibbons, 4th edition, 2007, pp. 104112.)In 1958, the island received its own postage stamps after being put under Australian custody. It had a large philatelic and postal independence, managed first by the Phosphate Commission (19581969) and then by the Islands Administration (196993).( This ended on 2 March 1993 when Post became the islands postal operator: stamps of Christmas Island can be used in Australia and Australian stamps in the island.(GovernmentChristmas Island is a non-self governing territory of Australia, currently administered by the of Regional Australia, Regional Development and Local Government. Administration was carried out by the Department() up until 14 September, 2010(), and prior to this by the Department of Transport and Regional Services before 29 November 2007.() The legal system is under the authority of the of Australia and Australian law. An Administrator  appointed by the Governor-General represents the monarch and Australia.The Australian Government provides Commonwealth-level government services through the Christmas Island Administration and the of Regional Australia, Regional Development and Local Government. As an administered Territory, there is no state government; instead, state government type services are provided by contractors, including departments of the Western Australian Government, with the costs met by the Australian (Commonwealth) Government. A unicameral of Christmas Island with nine seats provides local government services and is elected by popular vote to serve four-year terms. Elections are held every two years, with half the members standing for election.Christmas Island residents who are Australian citizens also vote in Commonwealth (federal) elections. Christmas Island residents are represented in the House of Representatives through the Territory of Lingiari and in the Senate by Northern Territory Senators.In early 1986, the Christmas Island Assembly held a design competition for an island flag; the winning design was adopted as the informal flag of the territory for over a decade, and in 2002 it was made the official of Christmas Island.EconomyPhosphate mining had been the only significant economic activity, but in December 1987 the Australian government closed the mine. In 1991, the mine was reopened by a consortium which included many of the former mine workers as shareholders. With the support of the government, the $34 million Christmas Island Casino and Resort opened in 1993, but was closed in 1998 and has not re-opened. The Australian Government in 2001 agreed to support the creation of a commercial spaceport on the island, however this has not yet been constructed, and appears that it will not proceed in the future.  The Howard Government built a temporary immigration detention centre on the island in 2001 and planned to replace it with a larger, modern facility located at North West Point until Howards defeat in the 2007 elections.GeographyLocated at , the island is a quadrilateral with hollowed sides, about  in greatest length and  in extreme breadth. The total land area is , with  of coastline. The island is the flat summit of a submarine mountain more than ,() the depth of the platform from which it rises being about  and its height above the sea being upwards of .() The mountain was originally a volcano, and some basalt is exposed in places such as Dales and Dolly Beach, but most of the surface rock is limestone accumulated from the growth of coral over millions of years.()  The summit of this mountain peak is formed of a succession of tertiary limestones ranging in age from the Eocene (or Oligocene) up to recent reef-deposits, with intercalations in the older beds of volcanic rocks.(http://journals.cambridge.org/action/displayFulltext?type1&fid5316016&jidGEO&volumeId7&issueId07&aid5316008 II.A MONOGRAPH OF CHRISTMAS ISLAND (INDIAN OCEAN:PHYSICAL FEATURES AND GEOLOGY). By C. W. ANDREWS.With descriptions of the Fauna and Flora by numerous contributors.  8vo ; pp. xiii, 337, 22 plates, 1 map, text illustrated.(London : printed by order of the Trustees of the British Museum, 1900.))Steep cliffs along much of the coast rise abruptly to a central plateau. Elevation ranges from sea level to  at Murray Hill. The island is mainly rainforest, of which 63% is National Park.The narrow fringing reef surrounding the island can be a maritime hazard.Christmas Island is  south of Indonesia and about  northwest of Perth.ClimateThe climate is tropical, with heat and humidity moderated by trade winds.sourceAustralian Bureau of Meteorology ()Flora and faunaFile:Cococrb2.jpg|thumb|crab|-File:Redcrab.JPG|thumb|right|Island red crab|-booby.jpg|thumb|right|Red-footed Boobies|-File:Anous stolidus nesting cropped.JPG|thumb|Noddy|-File:Brown booby.jpg|thumb|BoobyChristmas Island is of immense  value as it was uninhabited until the late 19th century, so many unique species of fauna and flora exist which have evolved independently of human interference.  Two-thirds of the island has been declared a Park which is managed by the Australian Department of Environment and Heritage through Parks Australia.FloraThe dense rainforest has  evolved in the deep soils of the plateau and on the terraces. The forests are dominated by 25 tree species. Ferns, orchids and vines grow on the branches in the humid atmosphere beneath the canopy. The 135 plant species include at least eighteen which are found nowhere else.Christmas Islands endemic plants include the trees listeri, elatus and peltata var. murrayana; the shrubs listeri, pedunculata, insularis and christmatensis; the vines aldrichii and alba; the herbs alba, maclearii and rossii; the grass nativitatis; the fern listeri; and the orchids archytas, nativitatis, listeri and exilis.(Christmas Island National Park: Flora.)FaunaTwo species of native rats, the Maclears and Rat, have become extinct since the island was settled. The endemic shrew has not been seen since the mid 1980s and may be already extinct, and the Island Pipistrelle, a small bat, is critically endangered and possibly also extinct.()The annual red crab mass migration (around 100 million animals) to the sea to spawn has been called one of the wonders of the natural world() and takes place each year around November; after the start of the season and in synchronisation with the cycle of the moon.The land crabs and sea birds are the most noticeable animals on the island. Twenty terrestrial and intertidal species of crab (of which thirteen are regarded as true land crabs, only dependent on the ocean for larval development) have been described. Robber crabs, known elsewhere as crabs, also exist in large numbers on the island.Christmas Island is a focal point for sea birds of various species. Eight species or subspecies of sea birds nest on the island. The most numerous is the Booby that nests in colonies, in trees, on many parts of the shore terrace. The widespread Booby nests on the ground near the edge of the seacliff and inland cliffs. Booby (listed as endangered) nests on tall emergent trees of the western, northern and southern plateau rainforest. The Christmas Island forest is the only nesting habitat of the Abbotts Booby left in the world. The endemic Island Frigatebird (listed as endangered) has nesting areas on the north-eastern shore terraces and the more widespread Frigatebirds nest in semi-deciduous trees on the shore terrace with the greatest concentrations being in the North West and South Point areas. The Noddy and two species of bosuns or tropicbirds, with their brilliant gold or silver plumage and distinctive streamer tail feathers, also nest on the island.Of the ten native land birds and shorebirds, seven are endemic species or subspecies. This includes the Island Thrush, and the Island Imperial-pigeon. Some 86 migrant bird species have been recorded as visitors to the Island.CommunicationsTelecommunicationsTelephone services are provided by Telstra and are a part of the Australian network with the same prefix as Western Australia (08). A GSM mobile telephone system replaced the old analogue network in February 2005. Phone reception is at its best on the roofs of the buildings. Four free-to-air television stations from Australia are broadcast (ABC, SBS, GWN and WIN) in the same time-zone as Perth. Radio broadcasts from Australia include ABC Radio National, Kimberley, J and Red FM. All services are provided by satellite links from the mainland. internet became available to subscribers in urban areas in mid 2005 through the local internet service provider, CIIA (formerly dotCX).Christmas Island, due to its close proximity to Australias northern neighbours, falls within many of the more interesting satellite footprints throughout the region. This results in ideal conditions for receiving various Asian broadcasts which locals sometimes prefer to the West Australian provided content. Additionally, ionospheric conditions usually bode well for many of the more terrestrial radio transmissions  HF right up through VHF and sometimes in to UHF. The island plays home to a small array of radio equipment that, evidently, spans a good chunk of the usable spectrum. A variety of government owned and operated antenna systems are employed on the island to take advantage of this. Transport Container portA container port exists at Flying Fish Cove with an alternative container unloading point to the south of the island at Norris Point for use during the December to March swell season of seasonal rough seas.RailwaysAn 18 km gauge railway from Flying Fish Cove to the phosphate mine was constructed in 1914. It was closed in December 1987, when the Australian Government closed the mine, but remains largely intact. Because of its very small population size, Christmas Island has the longest railway per capita in the world, more than 100 times of the average length.()Air travelThere are three weekly flights into Island Airport from Perth, Western Australia (via Learmonth) and a weekly charter flight from Malaysia by Airlines.Road transportThere is a new recreation centre at Phosphate Hill operated by the Shire of Christmas Island. There is also a taxi service. The road network covers most of the island and is generally good quality, although four wheel drive vehicles are needed to access some more distant parts of the rain forest or the more isolated beaches, which are only accessible by rough dirt roads.EducationThe island-operated crche is located in the Recreation Centre.() Island District High School, catering for students in grades P-10 is run by the Australian Education Department. Students wishing to complete the last two years of high school or university education must do so on mainland Australia.The island has one public library.()See alsoNotesReferences* ** Further reading*Jan Adams and Marg Neale, 1993, Christmas Island  The Early Years  18881958. Published by Bruce Neale. 96 pages including many b&w photographs. ISBN 0-646-14894-X*Dr Gerald R. Allen and Roger C. Steene, 1998, Fishes of Christmas Island. Published by the Christmas Island Natural History Association. 197 pages including many photographs and plates. ISBN 0-9591210-1-3. A second, revised, edition was published 2007 with a third author included, Max Orchard. ISBN 9780959121087*Anonymous, 1984, Christmas Island, Indian Ocean  a Unique Island. Published by a committee of present and former employees of the phosphate mining company. 60 pages including colour photographs.*D. Bosman (Editor), 1993, Christmas Island Police  19581983. Published by editor. 112 pages including many photographs.*Cyril Ayris, 1993, Tai Ko Seng  Gordon Bennett of Christmas Island. Published by the Gordon Bennett Educational Foundation. 263 pages including photographs. ISBN 0-646-15483-4*CIA World Factbook 2002*Charles. W. Andrews, A Description of Christmas Island (Indian Ocean). Geographical Journal, 13(1), 1735 (1899).*Charles W. Andrews, A Monograph of Christmas Island, London,1900.*H.S. Gray, 1981, Christmas Island Naturally. Published by author. 133 pages including many colour photographs. ISBN 0-9594105-0-3*John Hicks, Holger Rumpff and Hugh Yorkston, 1984, Christmas Crabs. Published by the Christmas Island Natural History Association. 76 pages including colour photographs. ISBN 0-9591210-0-5*National Library of Australia, The Indian Ocean: a select bibliography. 1979 ISBN 0-642-99150-2*Margaret Neale, 1988, We were the Christmas Islanders. Published by Bruce Neale. 207 pages including many b&w photographs. ISBN 0-7316-4158-2/0-7316-4157-4.*W. J. L. Wharton, Account of Christmas Island, Indian Ocean. Proceedings of the Royal Geographical Society and Monthly Record of Geography, 10 (10), 613624 (1888).*Les Waters, 1983, The Union of Christmas Island Workers. Published by Allen & Unwin (1992 edition), St Leonards, NSW. 170 pages including b&w photographs.External links* Christmas Island Shire  official government website* Christmas Island Tourism Association  official tourism website* Christmas Island National Park  official website Christmas Island National Park* Christmas Island Act 1958* * * * Christmas Island Travel Guide from Unearth Travel a creative commons travel wiki* Australia Puts Its Refugee Problem on a Remote Island, Behind Razor Wire  New York Times, 5 November 2009list  list  list  list  af:Kerseilandeg adaszh-min-nan:Christmas-tostrvo(, )Christmasostrovy NadoligIsland (Indiske Ocean)(Australien)et:Julusaar de Navidadeo:KristnaskinsulouharteaIslandChristmas (Australie)ny Nollickde NadalotokNatalis:Jlaeyjadel Natale ()Island ()Nadelikcya Nohelicha KrismasiChristi Natalis (Australia)Salalb:ChrschtdagsinselsalaChristmashu:Karcsony-szigetKrismas nl:Christmaseiland()no:Christmasyann:ChristmasyaBoego NarodzeniaChristmasCrciunului ()Islandostrov (Indick ocen)otokfi:Joulusaarisv:Julnng Paskoth:AdasChristmashan ChristmasChristmasKrsmeszh:
5510
Clipperton_Island
 population     UninhabitedClipperton Island (, ) is an uninhabited nine-square-kilometre (approx. 3.5-square-mile) coral atoll in the eastern Pacific Ocean, southwest of Mexico and west of America, at .  It is an overseas possession of France under direct authority of the of Overseas France.(Art. 9, Loi n 55-1052 du 6 aot 1955 modifie portant statut des Terres australes et antarctiques franaises et de lle de Clipperton. Dcret du 31 janvier 2008 relatif  ladministration de lle de Clipperton.)Clipperton Island is low-lying and largely barren, save for scattered grasses and a few clumps of coconut palms.  A small volcanic outcrop rising to  on its southeast side is referred to as Clipperton Rock.(Clipperton Island History.) The atoll has been occupied at various times by guano miners, would-be settlers or military personnel, mostly from Mexico, which formerly claimed it until international arbitration awarded it to France in 1931.  However, Clipperton has had no permanent inhabitants since 1945. It is still visited on occasion by fishermen, Navy patrols, scientific researchers, film crews, and shipwreck survivors.  It has also proven a popular site for transmissions by radio operators.(Clipperton Island DXpedition, includes details on several previous ham radio expeditions to Clipperton, and photos of the island.)Natural conditionsLocation, lagoon and climateFile:Clippertonisland.jpg|thumb|left|180px|Coconut palms on Clipperton; the lagoon is visible past the treesClipperton Island lies about  southeast of Island in the Revillagigedo Archipelago, the nearest land. The ring-shaped atoll completely encloses a stagnant freshwater lagoon, and is .  The islands rim averages  in width, though it reaches  in the west and narrows to  in the northeast, where sea waves occasionally spill over into the lagoon.  Land elevations average , though Clipperton Rock, a barren  volcanic outcrop located in the atolls southeast, is considerably higher and forms the islands tallest point.  The reef surrounding Clipperton is exposed at low tide.(Clipperton Island Shrubs and Grasslands)Clippertons lagoon is devoid of fish, and contains some deep basins with depths of  , including a spot known as Trou-Sans-Fond, or the bottomless hole, with acidic water at its base.  The water is described as being almost fresh at the surface, and highly eutrophic.  Seaweed beds cover approximately 45 percent of the lagoons surface.(While some sources have rated the lagoon water as non-potable,(Clipperton Island Travel Tips, Lance Hildebrands Journal) testimony from the crew of the tuna clipper M/V Monarch, stranded on Clipperton for 23 days in 1962 after their boat sank, indicates otherwise.  Their report reveals that the lagoon water, while not tasting very good, was drinkable, though muddy and dirty.  Several of the castaways drank it, with no apparent ill effects.(Atoll Research Bulletin No. 94. National Academy of Sciences, Washington, D.C., December 15, 1962, pp.89.)  In contrast, however, survivors of the ill-fated Mexican military colony on Clipperton in 1917 (see below) indicated that they were dependent upon rain for their water supply, catching it in several old boats they used for this purpose.(Atoll Research Bulletin No. 94. National Academy of Sciences, Washington, D.C., December 15, 1962, pg.10.)  Aside from the lagoon and water caught from rain, no other freshwater sources are known to exist on the island.Clipperton Island has a tropical oceanic climate, with average temperatures of . The rainy season occurs from May to October, when it is subject to tropical storms and hurricanes. Surrounding ocean waters are warm, pushed by equatorial and counter-equatorial currents.  The island has no known natural resources, its guano having been depleted early in the 20th century.  Although 115 species of fish have been identified in the waters near Clipperton, the only economic activity in the area is tuna fishing.Flora and faunaWhen Snodgrass and Heller visited Clipperton in 1898, they reported that no land plant is native to the island (Snodgrass and Heller, 1902). Other historical accounts from 1711, 1825 and 1839, however, point out that the island had a low grassy or suffrutescent (partially woody) flora during those periods (Sachet, 1962).  Coconut palms were introduced in the 1890s, and a few still survive.  Introduction of pigs by guano miners at the beginning of the 20th century reduced the crab population on the island, which in turn allowed grassland to gradually cover about 80 percent of the land surface (Sachet,  1962).  The elimination of these pigs in 1958 has caused most of this vegetation to disappear as millions of crabs (Gecarcinus planatus) have returned.  The result is that Clipperton is now virtually a sandy desert, with only 674 remaining palms counted by C. Jost during the Passion 2001 French mission, and five islets in the lagoon with grass that these terrestrial crabs cannot reach.During Sachets visit in 1958, Clippertons vegetation was found to consist of a sparse cover of spiny grass and low thickets, a creeping plant (Ipomoea sp.), and stands of coconut palm. This low-lying herbaceous flora seems to be pioneer in nature, and most of it is believed to be composed of recently introduced species. Sachet suspected that curassavicum and possibly oleracea were native, however (Sachet 1962). On the northwest side of the island, the most abundant species are echinatus, rhombifolia, and Corchorus aestuans. These plants compose a shrub cover up to 30 cm in height and are intermixed with Eclipta, Phyllanthus, and Solanum, as well as a taller plant, juncea. One interesting feature observed about Clipperton Islands flora is that the vegetation is arranged in parallel rows of species; dense rows of taller species alternate with lower, more open vegetation. This was assumed to be a result of the phosphate mining method of trench-digging.(The only land animals known to exist on Clipperton Island are bright orange crabs (which are poisonous to consume),(Clipperton Island Travel Guide) birds, lizards and rats, the last of which seem to have arrived from recently wrecked ships.(Clipperton Island: Pig Sty, Rat Hole, and Booby Prize)  Bird species include Terns, Masked Boobies, Terns, Brown Boobies, Brown Noddies, Black Noddies, Greater Frigates, Coots, Martins, Cuckoos and Warblers.  Ducks have been reported in the lagoon.(  The lagoon equally harbors millions of isopods, which swimmers claim can deliver a painful sting.(1992 Clipperton Island Expedition)A recent report (2006) by the NOAAs Southwest Fisheries Science Center in Jolla, California, indicates that the increased rat presence on Clipperton Island has led to a decline in both crab and bird populations, causing a corresponding increase in both vegetation and coconut palms on the island.  This report urgently recommended eradication of all the rats on the island, so that vegetation might be reduced and the island might return to its pre-human state.(HistoryDiscovery and early claimsClippertons name comes from Clipperton, an English pirate and privateer who fought the Spanish during the early 18th century, and who is said to have passed by the island. Some sources say he used it as a base for his raids on shipping, yet there is no documentary evidence for this assertion.(Bch, Boudewijn. Eilanden (Islands). Holland, 1991, IScBN 9041330860)The name le de la Passion () was officially given to Clipperton in 1711 by French discoverers Martin de Chassiron and Michel Du Bocage, commanding the French ships La Princesse and La Dcouverte.  They drew up the first map of the island and annexed it to France. The first scientific expedition to Clipperton took place in 1725 under Frenchman M. Bocage, who lived on the island for several months. In 1858 France formally laid claim to Clipperton.Other claimants included the United States, whose American Guano Mining Company claimed it under the Islands Act of 1856; Mexico also claimed Clipperton due to activities undertaken there as early as 18481849.  On November 17, 1858, Emperor Napoleon III annexed Clipperton as part of the French colony of Tahiti.  However, this did not settle the question of Clippertons ownership.  On November 24, 1897, French naval authorities found three Americans on Clipperton working for the American Guano Company, who had raised the American flag on the island.  However, U.S. authorities denounced their act, assuring the French that they did not intend to assert American sovereignty over Clipperton.(Clipperton Islands Case (Mexico v. France), Judicial Decisions Involving Questions of International Law (28 January 1931).)Mexico reasserted its claim over Clipperton Island late in the 19th century, and on December 13, 1897, sent the gunboat La Democrata to occupy and annex it.  A colony was established, and a series of military governors were posted to Clipperton from that time, the last of whom would be Arnaud (19061916).  France insisted on its ownership of Clipperton, and a lengthy diplomatic correspondence between the two nations led to the conclusion of a treaty on March 2, 1909, to seek the arbitration of King Emmanuel III of Italy, with each nation promising to abide by that monarchs final determination.(Original treaty between Mexico and France, French Foreign Ministry Archives, PDF file: Gouv-fr-PDF-19.)  His decision would not be rendered until 1931.Guano mining and the tragedy of 1917thumb|300px|right|Survivors from Clipperton Island, 1917The British Pacific Island Company acquired the rights to Clippertons guano deposits in 1906, and built a mining settlement on the island in conjunction with the Mexican government. That same year, a lighthouse was erected under the orders of President Daz. By 1914, around 100 people&mdash;men, women, and children&mdash;were living on Clipperton Island, resupplied every two months by a ship from Acapulco. However, with the escalation of fighting in the Revolution, the regular resupply visits ceased, and the islands inhabitants were left to their own devices.(History of Clipperton Island.)  The US Navy warship Lexington visited the atoll in late 1915 and advised evacuation of all inhabitants, however the governor, Captain Arnaud, declared that evacuation was not necessary.(By 1917, all but one of the males on Clipperton had died.  Many had perished from scurvy, while others (including Captain Arnaud) died during a failed attempt to sail after a passing ship to fetch help. Lighthouse keeper Victoriano lvarez ultimately found himself the last man remaining on the island, together with 15 women and children.(  lvarez proclaimed himself king and began an orgy of rape and murder, before being killed by Captain Arnauds widow, who had become the recipient of his unwanted attentions.( Almost immediately after lvarezs death, four women and seven children (the last survivors) were picked up by the US Navy gunship  on July 18, 1917.(  Following this, no further attempts were made to permanently colonize Clipperton Island, though it would be briefly occupied during the 1930s and 40s.The tragic tale of the Mexican colony on Clipperton Island has been the subject of several novels, including Ivo Mansmanns Clipperton, Schicksale auf einer vergessenen Insel (Clipperton, Destinies on a Forgotten Island); ISBN 3-354-00709-5 (in German, no English translation available).Final arbitration of ownershipOn January 28, 1931, King Victor Emanuel finally declared Clipperton to be a French possession.(Clipperton Islands Case (Mexico v. France) Judicial Decisions Involving Questions of International Law (28 January 1931; article by William Heflin that includes a discussion of the case) The French rebuilt the islands lighthouse and settled a military outpost there, which remained for seven years before being abandoned.Recent developmentsClipperton Island was abandoned by the end of World War II, after briefly being occupied by the USA (1944-5). Since then it has only been visited by sport fishermen, regularly scheduled patrols of the French Navy, and by Mexican tuna and shark fishermen. There have been infrequent scientific and radio expeditions, and in 1978 Cousteau visited with his team of divers, plus a survivor from the 1917 evacuation, to film a television special called Clipperton: The Island that Time Forgot.(Simon Rogerson, Cousteau and the Pit, Dive magazine, July 19, 2006.)In 1958, Clipperton was visited by ornithologist Ken Stager of the Los Angeles County Museum.  Appalled at the depredations visited by feral pigs upon the islands Booby and Booby colonies (reduced to 500 and 150 birds, respectively), Stager procured a shotgun and proceeded to hunt down and kill all of Clipperton Islands 58 pigs.  By 2003, the Booby colonies on Clipperton boasted 25,000 Brown Boobies and 112,000 Masked Boobies, making the atoll the worlds second-largest Brown Booby colony, and its largest Masked Booby colony.(In 1962, the independence of Algeria threatened further French nuclear testing sites within that nation. The French Ministry of Defence considered Clipperton as a possible replacement location; however, due to the islands hostile climate and remote location, this was eventually ruled out.  The French explored reopening the lagoon and developing a harbor for trade and tourism during the 1970s, but this idea, too, was ultimately abandoned. An automatic weather installation was completed on April 7, 1980, with data collected by this station being transmitted directly by satellite to Brittany.In 1981, the Academy of Sciences for Overseas Territories recommended that the island have its own economic infrastructure, with an airstrip and a fishing port in the lagoon. This would mean opening up the lagoon by creating a passage in the atoll rim. For this purpose, an agreement was signed with the French government, represented by the High Commissioner for French Polynesia, whereby Clipperton became French state property. On October 13, 1986, a meeting took place regarding the establishment of a permanent base for fishing at Clipperton, between the high commissioner of Polynesia, representing the state, and the survey firm for the development and exploitation of the island (SEDEIC). Taking into account the economic constraints, the distance from viable markets, and the small size of the atoll, nothing apart from preliminary studies was ever undertaken to carry out this project. Finally, all plans for development of Clipperton were abandoned.CastawaysIn early 1962 (as mentioned above), Clipperton provided a home to nine crewmen of the sunken tuna clipper M/V Monarch, who were stranded on the island for 23 days from February 6 to March 1 of that year.  They reported that the lagoon water was drinkable, though they preferred to drink water from the coconuts they found.  Unable to use any of the dilapidated buildings remaining on the island from previous occupants, they constructed a crude shelter from cement bags and tin salvaged from huts built by the American military twenty years earlier.  Wood from the huts was used for firewood, and fish caught off the fringing reef combined with some potatoes and onions they had saved from their sinking vessel to augment the islands meager (as it turned out) supply of coconuts.  The crewmen reported that they tried eating birds eggs, but found them to be rancid, and they decided after trying to cook a little black bird that it did not have enough meat to make the effort worthwhile.  Pigs that had previously inhabited Clipperton had been eradicated prior to this time, though the crewmen reported seeing their skeletons around the atoll.  Eventually, these crewmen were discovered by another fishing boat, and were rescued by the United States Naval Destroyer USS Robison.(Atoll Research Bulletin No. 94. National Academy of Sciences, Washington, D.C., December 15, 1962, pp.810.)In 1988, five Mexican fishermen became lost at sea after a storm that occurred during their trip along the coast of Rica. They drifted within sight of Clipperton, but were unable to reach it.(Arias, Ron. Five against the sea: A true story of courage and survival, 1989)  In 1998, Steven Longbaugh and David Heritage, two American deckhands from a boat based in California, were stranded on the island for three weeks. They were rescued after rebuilding a survival radio and using distress flares to signal for help.(LaJoie, John.  American Maritime Accident Report , 1998)Recent historyThe Mexican and French oceanographic expedition SURPACLIP (UNAM Mexico and UNC Nouma) made extensive studies in 1997 on and around the island. In 2001, French geographer Ch. Jost extended the 1997 studies through his French Passion 2001 expedition, explaining the evolution of the ecosystem, and releasing several papers, a video film, and a website.(http://clipperton.fr) In 2003 Lance Milbrand stayed on the island for 41 days on a Geographic Society expedition, recording his adventure in video, photos, and a written diary (see links below).In 2005, Clippertons ecosystem was extensively studied for four months by a scientific mission organized by Jean-Louis tienne, which made a complete inventory of mineral, plant, and animal species found on the atoll, studied algae as deep as 100 m (330 ft) below sea level, and examined the effects of pollution on the island.  A 2008 expedition from the of Washingtons School of Oceanography collected sediment cores from the lagoon to study climate change over the last millennium.(Clipperton Atoll Expedition 2008)On February 21, 2007, the administration of Clipperton was transferred from the Commissioner of the Republic in Polynesia to the Minister of Overseas France.(http://www.worldstatesmen.org/Fr_minor.html)A recreational scuba diving expedition by the luxury liveaboard safari boat  M/V Nautilus Explorer dove the reefs around Clipperton from April 15 to 20, 2007 to observe the marine life and compare these observations with those reported by the Connie Limbaugh (Scripps) expeditions in 1956 and 1958. Commencing in 2010, the Nautilus Explorer will be running diving expeditions from San Lucas to Clipperton Atoll via Island every spring.During the night of February 10, 2010, the Sichem Osprey, a Maltese tanker ran aground on Clipperton Island on its way from the Canal to Korea. The 170 meter-long (over 550 feet) ship contained Xylene, a clear, flammable liquid commonly used as a solvent in rubber, leather and the printing industries. All 19 crew members were reported safe, and the vessel reported no leaks of any kind.(http://diver.net/bbs/posts002/81342.shtml Diver.Net, Retrieved, November 13, 2010.)(http://reeftools.com/news/xylene-tanker-runs-aground-on-clipperton-island/ ReefTools, Retrieved November 13, 2010)  The vessel was eventually re-floated on March 6(http://www.lloydslist.com/ll/search-results.htm;jsessionid4ABF68DBDE9D889B43BBE23A30C751CD Lloyds of London; Retrieved, November 13, 2010) and is back in service.(http://www.marinetraffic.com/ais/shipdetails.aspx?MMSI249534000 MarineTraffic.com Retrieved, November 13, 2010)See alsoNotesReferences*Allen, G. R. and D. R. Robertson. 1996. An annotated checklist of the fishes of Clipperton Atoll, tropical eastern Pacific. Retrieved (2001) from: .*Dickinson, Edwin D. The Clipperton Island Case. American Journal of International Law, Vol. 27, No. 1., pp. 130133.*IFRECOR. 1998. Clipperton. Retrieved (2001), PDF file: Reefbase-PDF-98.*Jost, C. and S. Andrefout, 2006, Review of long term natural and human perturbations and current status of Clipperton Atoll, a remote island of the Eastern Pacific, Pacific Conservation Biology, Surrey Beatty & Sons Pty Ltd, Chipping Norton, NSW, Australia, 12: 3*Jost, C., 2005g, Risques environnementaux et enjeux  Clipperton (Pacifique franais). Revue europenne Cybergeo, 314, 01 juillet 2005, cartes et fig., 15 p. http://193.55.107.45/eurogeo2.htm*Jost, C., 2005f, Bibliographie de lle de Clipperton, le de La Passion (17112005). Paris, Journal de la Socit des Ocanistes, 120121, juin-dc. 2005, texte et 411 rf., pp. 181197.*Pitman, R. L. and J. R. Jehl, 1998. Geographic variation and reassessment of species limits in the masked boobies of the eastern Pacific Ocean. Wilson Bulletin 110:155170.*Restrepo, Laura. La Isla de la Pasin (a version of the tragic events which took place on Clipperton, put in the form of a novel).*Sachet, M. H. 1962. Flora and vegetation of Clipperton Island. Proceedings of the California Academy of Sciences. 4th ser., v.31, no.10. The Academy, San Francisco.*Skaggs, Jimmy. 1989. Clipperton. A History of the Island the World Forgot. Walker and Company. New York.*Snodgrass, R. E. and E. Heller. 1902. The birds of Clipperton and Cocos Islands; Papers from the Hopkins Stanford Galapagos expedition 18981899. The Academy, Washington, DC.*Tamburini Francesco, La controversia tra Francia e Messico sulla sovranit dellisola di Clipperton e larbitrato di Vittorio Emanuele III (19091931), in Ricordo di Alberto Aquarone, Studi di Storia, Pisa, Edizioni Plus, 2008*UNEP/IUCN. 1988. Coral Reefs of the World. Volume 3: Central and Western Pacific. UNEP Regional Seas Directories and Bibliographies. IUCN/UNEP, Gland, Switzerland, Cambridge, UK, and Nairobi, Kenya.External linksPhoto galleries*Clipperton Island 2008 Flickr gallery containing 94 large photos from a visit to Clipperton Island in 2008.*3D Photos of Clipperton Island 2010 3D anaglyphs of Clipperton IslandGeneral sites***Clipperton Island at Infoplease*WorldStatesmen  France  Minor possessionsFrench-language sites*  80 pages from C. Jost, CNRS, researchers site*  Site of Jean-Louis tiennes expeditionExpeditions to Clipperton*Lance Milbrands castaway photo album at NationalGeographic.com*Lance Milbrands Clipperton diary at NationalGeographic.com*1992 Clipperton Island Expedition*Chris Grossmans pictures from the 2007 Nautilus Explorer expedition to Clipperton Island*The 2008 Amateur Radio DXpedition*Cousteau and the Pit, Simon Rogerson, Dive magazine, July 19, 2006.*2008 Clipperton Atoll Expedition, includes several large photos of Clipperton Atoll. af:ClippertonClippertonbe-x-old:Clippertonbg:Clippertonostrovde:Clipperton-Inselet:ClippertonClippertoneo:Klipertonode ClippertonClippertonhy:ClippertonClippertonit:Clippertonhe:ka:Clippertonsalahu:Clipperton-szigetnl:Clippertonja:no:Clippertonoc:ClippertonClippertonade ClippertonClippertonru:sk:ClippertonClippertonfi:Clippertoninsaarisv:ClippertonnAdasuk:vi:ClippertonClippertonzh:
5561
Computational_linguistics
Computational linguistics is an interdisciplinary field dealing with the statistical and/or rule-based modeling of language from a computational perspective. This modeling is not limited to any particular field of linguistics. Traditionally, computational linguistics was usually performed by scientists who had specialized in the application of computers to the processing of a language. Computational linguists often work as members of interdisciplinary teams, including linguists (specifically trained in linguistics), language experts (persons with some level of ability in the languages relevant to a given project), and computer scientists. In general, computational linguistics draws upon the involvement of linguists, computer scientists, experts in intelligence, mathematicians, logicians, philosophers, cognitive scientists, cognitive psychologists, psycholinguists, anthropologists and neuroscientists, among others.Computational linguistics has applied and theoretical components, where theoretical computational linguistics takes up issues in theoretical linguistics and cognitive science and applied computational linguistics focuses on the practical outcome of modelling human language use.(Hans Uszkoreit. What Is Computational Linguistics? http://www.coli.uni-saarland.de/~hansu/what_is_cl.html Department of Computational Linguistics and Phonetics of Saarland University)OriginsComputational linguistics as a field predates intelligence, a field under which it is often grouped. Computational linguistics originated with efforts in the United States in the 1950s to use computers to automatically translate texts from foreign languages, particularly Russian scientific journals, into English.(John Hutchins: Retrospect and prospect in computer-based translation. Proceedings of MT Summit VII, 1999, pp. 3044.) Since computers can make arithmetic calculations much faster and more accurately than humans, it was thought to be only a short matter of time before the technical details could be taken care of that would allow them the same remarkable capacity to process language.(Arnold B. Barach: Translating Machine 1975: And the Changes To Come.)When translation (also known as mechanical translation) failed to yield accurate translations right away, automated processing of human languages was recognized as far more complex than had originally been assumed. Computational linguistics was born as the name of the new field of study devoted to developing algorithms and software for intelligently processing language data. When artificial intelligence came into existence in the 1960s, the field of computational linguistics became that sub-division of artificial intelligence dealing with human-level comprehension and production of natural languages.In order to translate one language into another, it was observed that one had to understand the grammar of both languages, including both morphology (the grammar of word forms) and syntax (the grammar of sentence structure). In order to understand syntax, one had to also understand the semantics and the lexicon (or vocabulary), and even to understand something of the pragmatics of language use. Thus, what started as an effort to translate between languages evolved into an entire discipline devoted to understanding how to represent and process natural languages using computers.Nowadays research within the scope of computational linguistics is done at Computational Linguistics Departments (Computational linguistics and phonetics at Saarland University) and laboratories.(Yatskos computational linguistics laboratory)SubfieldsComputational linguistics can be divided into major areas depending upon the medium of the language being processed, whether spoken or textual; and upon the task being performed, whether analyzing language (recognition) or synthesizing language (generation).recognition and synthesis deal with how spoken language can be understood or created using computers. Parsing and generation are sub-divisions of computational linguistics dealing respectively with taking language apart and putting it together. Machine translation remains the sub-division of computational linguistics dealing with having computers translate between languages.Some of the areas of research that are studied by computational linguistics include:*complexity of natural language, largely modeled on theory, with the application of grammar and linearly-bounded machines.*semantics comprises defining suitable logics for meaning representation, automatically constructing them and reasoning with them*Computer-aided linguistics*Design of parsers or chunkers for languages*Design of taggers like POS-taggers (part-of-speech taggers)*translation as one of the earliest and most difficult applications of computational linguistics draws on many subfields.The for Computational Linguistics defines computational linguistics as::...the scientific study of language from a computational perspective. Computational linguists are interested in providing models of various kinds of linguistic phenomena.(The Association for Computational Linguistics What is Computational Linguistics?Published online, Feb, 2005.)See also* for Computational Linguistics* analysis* lexicology* Linguistics (journal)* science* semiotics* reviewing* systems* induction* speechome project* linguistics* Centre for Text Mining* language processing* American Computational Linguistics Olympiad* linguistics* relatedness* functional linguisticsmemory* Knowledge Processing Lab* Networking LanguageReferences External links * Association for Computational Linguistics (ACL)** ACL Anthology of research papers** ACL Wiki for Computational Linguistics* CICLing annual conferences on Computational Linguistics* Computational Linguistics  Applications workshop* Free online introductory book on Computational Linguistics (Internet Archive copy)* Language Technology World* Resources for Text, Speech and Language Processingg-gin-hakbr:Stlennyezhouriezhcomputacionallingvistikada:Datalingvistikde:Computerlinguistiket:Arvutilingvistikacomputacionallingvosciencokonputazionalainformatiquecho-earrooaghcomputacionalko:lingvistikakomputasionalis:Tlvumlvsindicomputazionalelv:Datorlingvistikapengiraantaalkundeja:nn:Datalingvistikkkomputerowacomputacionalcomputaionaljezikoslovjelingvistikafi:Tietokonelingvistiikkasv:Sprkteknologith:zh:
5584
History_of_Cuba
Image:Moll - A Map of the West-Indies.png|thumb|285px|Map of the West Indies and Mexico, together comprising Spain, with Cuba in the center, drawn by Moll in 1736.The known history of Cuba, the largest of the Caribbean islands, predates Columbus sighting of the island during his first voyage of discovery on 27 October 1492. Evidence suggests that, before Columbus arrival, the indigenous Guanajatabey, who had inhabited the island for centuries, were driven to the west of Cuba by the arrival of two subsequent waves of migrants, the Tano and Ciboney. These groups are sometimes referred to as nations.(Gott, Richard Cuba: A new history, Yale University Press: 2004, Chapter 1.) These peoples had migrated north along the Caribbean island chain and mostly used stone tools, but were also familiar with gold (which they called caona) and copper (guann).The Tano and Ciboney were part of a cultural group commonly called the Arawak, which extended far into South America. Initially, the new arrivals inhabited the eastern area of Baracoa, before expanding across the island. The traveling Dominican clergyman and writer de las Casas estimated that the Cuban population of the neo-Tano people had reached 350,000 by the end of the 15th century. The Tano cultivated the yuca root, harvested it and baked it to produce cassava bread. They also grew cotton and tobacco, and ate maize and potatoes. According to Las Casas, they had everything they needed for living; they had many crops, well arranged.(Historia de las Indias, vol 3 Biblioteca Ayacucho, Caracus, 1986, pp. 81101.)After Columbus arrival, Cuba became a colony, ruled by a Spanish governor in Havana, though in 1762 the city was briefly held by Great Britain before being returned in exchange for Florida. A series of rebellions during the 19th century failed to end Spanish rule. However, increased tensions between Spain and the United States, resulting in the War, finally led to Spanish withdrawal, and in 1902 Cuba gained formal independence.In the years following its independence, Cuba saw significant economic development, but also political corruption and a succession of despotic leaders, culminating in the overthrow of the dictator Batista by the communist revolutionary Castro during the 1953-9 Revolution. Cuba has  been ruled by Castros Party of Cuba, although Fidel Castro himself stepped down from leadership of the country in 2006, to be replaced by his brother Castro.Early Spanish colonizationright|thumb|250px|Havana Bay, c. 1639.The first sighting of a Spanish boat approaching the island was on 28 October 1492, probably at Baracoa on the eastern point of the island.( Columbus, on his first voyage to the Americas, sailed south from what is now Bahamas to explore the northeast coast of Cuba and the northern coast of Hispaniola. Columbus discovered the island believing it to be a peninsula of the Asian mainland.()()During a second voyage in 1494, Columbus passed along the south coast of the island, landing at various inlets including what was to become Bay. With the Papal Bull of 1493, Alexander VI commanded Spain to conquer, colonize and convert the Pagans of the World to Catholicism.(Bakewell, Peter. A History of Latin America. Blackwell Publishers, pp. 129130.) On arrival, Columbus observed the Tano dwellings, describing them as looking like tents in a camp. All were of palm branches, beautifully constructed.(Willis Fletcher Johnson, The History of Cuba Volume 1, New York, 1920 p. 228.)The Spanish began to create permanent settlements on the island of Hispaniola, east of Cuba, soon after Columbus arrival in the Caribbean, but it wasnt until 1509 that the coast of Cuba was fully mapped by de Ocampo.(Historia de la Construccin Naval en Cuba) In 1511, Velzquez de Cullar set out from Hispaniola to form the first Spanish settlement in Cuba, with orders from Spain to conquer the island. The settlement was at Baracoa, but the new settlers were to be greeted with stiff resistance from the local Tano population. The Tanos were initially organized by cacique (chieftain) Hatuey, who had himself relocated from Hispaniola to escape the brutalities of Spanish rule on that island. After a prolonged guerrilla campaign, Hatuey and successive chieftains were captured and burnt alive, and within three years the Spanish had gained control of the island. In 1514, a settlement was founded in what was to become Havana.Clergyman de Las Casas observed a number of massacres initiated by the invaders as the Spanish swept over the island, notably the massacre near Camagey of the inhabitants of Caonao. According to his account, some three thousand villagers had traveled to Manzanillo to greet the Spanish with loaves, fishes and other foodstuffs and were without provocation, butchered.(Las Casas, A Short Account, p.29) The surviving indigenous groups fled to the mountains or the small surrounding islands before being captured and forced into reservations. One such reservation was Guanabacoa, which is today a suburb of Havana.(Thomas, Hugh: Cuba: The Pursuit of Freedom, 2nd edition, p.14.)Image:Hatuey monument, Baracoa, Cuba.JPG|thumb|200px|A monument to Tano chieftain Hatuey, in Baracoa, CubaIn 1513, II of Aragon issued a decree establishing the encomienda land settlement system that was to be incorporated throughout the Spanish Americas. Velzquez, who had become Governor of Cuba relocating from Baracoa to de Cuba, was given the task of apportioning both the land and the indigenous Cubans to groups throughout the new colony. The scheme was not a success, however, as the Cubans either succumbed to diseases brought from Spain such as measles and smallpox, or simply refused to work, preferring to slip away into the mountains.( Desperate for labor to toil the new agricultural settlements, the Conquistadors sought slaves from surrounding islands and the continental mainland. But these new arrivals followed the indigenous Cubans by also dispersing into the wilderness or suffering a similar fate at the hands of disease.(Despite the difficult relations between the local Cubans and the new Europeans, some cooperation was in evidence. The Spanish were shown by the Native Cubans how to nurture tobacco and consume it in the form of cigars. There were also many unions between the largely male Spanish colonists and indigenous women. Their children were called mestizos, but the Native Cubans called them Guajiro, which translates as one of us. Modern-day studies have revealed traces of Tano DNA in individuals throughout Cuba,(Cuban Site Casts Light on an Extinct People Anthony DePalma, The New York Times, 5 July 1998) although the population was largely destroyed as a culture and civilization after 1550. With the Spanish New Laws of 1552 Cuban Indians were freed from encomienda, and some seven Indian towns were set up. There are descendant Cuban Indian (Tano) families in several places, mostly in eastern Cuba. The Indian community at Caridad de los Indios, Guantnamo, is one such nuclei. An association of Indian families in Jiguani, near Santiago, is also active. The local Indian population left their mark also on the language with some 400 Tano terms and place-names of the island. Various cults and religions, such as Danza del Cordon and Afro-Cuban religion, incorporate Tano spiritual practices. The name of Cuba itself, Havana,  Camagey, and many others were derived from the neo-Tano language, and Indian words such as tobacco, hurricane and canoe were transferred to English and are used today.(Arrival of African slavesThe Spanish established kurtrice and tobacco as Cubas primary products, and the island soon supplanted Hispaniola as the prime Spanish base in the Caribbean.(Peter Bakewell. A History of Latin America. Bakewell Books. p.74.) Further field labor was required. African slaves were then imported to work the plantations as field labor. However, restrictive Spanish trade laws made it difficult for Cubans to keep up with the 17th and 18th century advances in processing cane pioneered in British Barbados and French Domingue (Haiti). Spain also restricted Cubas access to the trade, which was dominated by the British, French, and Dutch. One important turning point came in the Years War, when the British conquered the port of Havana and introduced thousands of slaves in a ten month period. Another key event was the Revolution in nearby Saint-Domingue, from 1791 to 1804. Thousands of French refugees, fleeing the slave rebellion in Saint Domingue, brought slaves and expertise in sugar refining and coffee growing into eastern Cuba in the 1790 and early 19th century.In the 19th century, Cuban sugar plantations became the most important world producer of sugar, thanks to the expansion of slavery and a relentless focus on improving the islands sugar technology. Use of modern refining techniques was especially important because the British Trade Act 1807 abolished the trade in the Empire (but slavery itself remained legal until the Abolition Act 1833). Cubans were torn between the profits generated by sugar and a repugnance for slavery, which they saw as morally, politically, and racially dangerous to their society. By the end of the 19th century, slavery was abolished.However, leading up to the abolition of slavery, Cuba gained great prosperity from its trade. Originally, the Spanish had ordered regulations on trade with Cuba, which kept the island from becoming a dominant sugar producer. The Spanish were interested in keeping their trade routes and slave trade routes protected. Nevertheless, Cubas vast size and abundance of natural resources made it an ideal place for becoming a booming sugar producer. When Spain opened the Cuban trade ports, it quickly became a popular place. New technology allowed a much more effective and efficient means of producing sugar. They began to use water mills, enclosed furnaces, and steam engines to produce a higher quality of sugar at a much more efficient pace than elsewhere in the Caribbean.The boom in Cubas sugar industry in the 19th century made it necessary for Cuba to improve its means of transportation. Planters needed safe and efficient ways to transport the sugar from the plantations to the ports, in order to maximize their returns. Many new roads were built, and old roads were quickly repaired. Railroads were built early and changed the way that perishable sugar cane (within one or two days after the cane is cut easily crystallizable sucrose sugar has inverted to turn into far less recoverable glucose and fructose sugars) is collected and allowing more rapid and effective sugar transportation. It was now possible for plantations all over this large island to have their sugar shipped quickly and easily. The prosperity seen from the boom in sugar production is a major reason that Cuban ethnicity became further enriched by new influx of Spanish migrants. Many Spaniards immigrated to Cuba, calling it a place of refuge.Sugar plantationsCuba failed to prosper before the 1760s due to Spanish trade regulations. Spain had set up a monopoly in the Caribbean and their primary objective was to protect this. They did not allow the islands to trade with any foreign ships. Spain was primarily interested in the Caribbean for its gold. The Spanish crown thought that if the colonies traded with other countries it would not itself benefit from it. This slowed the growth of the Spanish Caribbean. This effect was particularly bad in Cuba because Spain kept a tight grasp on it. It held great strategic importance in the Caribbean. As soon as Spain opened Cubas ports up to foreign ships, a great sugar boom began that lasted until the 1880s. The Island was perfect for growing sugar. It is dominated by rolling plains, with rich soil and adequate rainfall. It is the largest island in the Caribbean. Its relatively low mountains and large plains are suitable for roads and railroads, and it has the best ports in the area. By 1860, Cuba was devoted to growing sugar. The country had to import all other necessary goods. They were dependent on the United States which bought 82 percent of the sugar. Cubans resented the economic policy Spain implemented in Cuba, which was to help Spain and hurt Cuba. In 1820, Spain abolished the slave trade, hurting the Cuban economy even more and forcing planters to buy more expensive, illegal, and troublesome slaves (as demonstrated by the events surrounding the ship Amistad).()Cuba under attackthumb|250px|The British fleet closing in on Havana in 1762Morro.jpg|250px|thumb|El Morro fortress in Havana, built in 1589Cuba had long been a target of buccaneers, pirates and French corsairs seeking Spains World riches. Repeated raids meant that defences were bolstered throughout the island during the 16th century. Havana was furnished with the fortress of de los Tres Reyes Magos del Morro to deter potential invaders, which included the English privateer Drake, who sailed within sight of Havana harbour but did not disembark on the island.(Gott, Richard: Cuba, A  A new history, Yale University Press: 2004, p 32) Havanas inability to resist invaders was dramatically exposed in 1628, when a Dutch fleet led by Heyn plundered the Spanish ships in the citys harbor.(Gott, Richard: Cuba, A  A new history, Yale University Press: 2004, p 34-35) In 1662, English admiral and pirate Myngs captured and briefly occupied de Cuba on the eastern part of the island, in an effort to open up Cubas protected trade with neighbouring Jamaica.(Nearly a century later, the English were to invade in earnest, taking Guantnamo Bay in 1741 during the of Jenkins Ear with Spain. Vernon, the British admiral who devised the scheme, saw his 4,000 occupying troops capitulate to local guerilla resistance, and more critically, a disease epidemic, forcing him to withdraw his fleet to British-owned Jamaica.(Gott, Richard: Cuba, A  new history, Yale University Press: 2004, p 39-41) Seven years later, in 1748, tensions between the three dominant colonial powers, Britain, France and Spain, were transported to the Caribbean. A skirmish between British and Spanish squadrons off the coast of Cuba became known as the Battle of Havana.(The Years War, which erupted in 1754 across three continents, eventually arrived in the Spanish Caribbean. Spains alliance with the French pitched them into direct conflict with the British, and in 1762 a British expedition of 5 warships and 4,000 troops set out from Portsmouth to capture Cuba. The British arrived on 6 June, and by August had Havana under siege.(Thomas, Hugh: Cuba: The Pursuit of Freedom 2nd edition. Chapter One)When Havana surrendered, the admiral of the British fleet, George Keppel, the 3rd of Albemarle, entered the city as a conquering new governor and took control of the whole western part of the island.The arrival of the British immediately opened up trade with their North American and Caribbean colonies, causing a rapid transformation of Cuban society. Food, horses and other goods flooded into the city, and thousands of slaves from West Africa were transported to the island to work on the undermanned sugar plantations.( Though Havana, which had become the third largest city in the Americas, was to enter an era of sustained development and closening ties with North America, the British occupation was not to last. Pressure from London sugar merchants fearing a decline in sugar prices forced a series of negotiations with the Spanish over colonial territories. Less than a year after Havana was seized, the Peace of Paris was signed by the three warring powers, ending the Seven Years War. The treaty gave Britain Florida in exchange for Cuba on the recommendation of the French, who advised that declining the offer could result in Spain losing Mexico and much of the South American mainland to the British.( This led to disappointment in Britain, as many believed that Florida was a poor return for Cuba and Britains other gains in the war.The 19th century: years of upheavalIn the early 19th century, three major political currents took shape in Cuba: reformism, annexation and independence. In addition, there were spontaneous and isolated actions carried out from time to time, adding a current of abolitionism.The declaration of independence by the 13 British colonies of North America, and the victory of the Revolution of 1789, influenced early Cuban liberation movements, as did the successful revolt of black slaves in Haiti. One of the first, headed by a free black, Morales, was aimed at the equality between mulattos and whites and the abolition of sales taxes and other burdens that oppressed the poor; Morales plot was discovered in 1795 in Bayamo, and the conspirators were jailed.Reform, autonomy and separatist movementsAs a result of the political upheavals caused by the Iberian Peninsular War and the removal of Ferdinand VII from the Spanish throne, a separatist rebellion emerged among the Cuban Creole aristocracy in 1809 and 1810. One of its leaders, Infante, drafted Cubas first constitution, declaring the island a sovereign state, presuming the rule of the countries wealthy, maintaining slavery as long as it was necessary for agriculture, establishing a social classification based on skin colour and declaring Catholicism the official religion. This conspiracy also failed and the main leaders were sentenced to prison and deported to Spain.(Cantn Navarro, Jos and Juan Jacomino. History of Cuba: The Challenge of the Yoke and the Star: Biography of a People. Havana, Editoral SI-MAR, 1998, p. 35, ISBN 959-705-419-1.)In 1812, a mixed-race abolitionist conspiracy arose, organized by Antonio Aponte, a free black carpenter in Havana. He and others were executed.()The main reason for the lack of support for these efforts was that the vast majority of Creoles, especially the plantation owners, rejected any kind of separatism, considering Spains power essential to the maintenance of slavery. The Constitution of 1812, and the legislation passed by the Cortes after it was set up in 1808, created a number of liberal political and commercial policies, which were welcomed in Cuba but also curtailed a number of previous political and commercial liberties. Between 1810 and 1814, the island elected six representatives to the Cortes, in addition to forming a locally-elected Provincial Deputation.(Rieu-Millan, Marie Laure. Los diputados americanos en las Cortes de Cdiz: Igualdad o independencia. Madrid: Consejo Superior de Investigaciones Cientficas, 1990, 41. ISBN 978-8400070915) Nevertheless, the liberal regime and the Constitution proved to be ephemeral: they were suppressed by Ferdinand VII when he returned to the throne in 1814. Therefore, by the end of the decade, some Cubans were inspired by the successes of Bolvar, despite the fact that the Spanish Constitution was restored in 1820. Numerous secret societies emerged, of which the most important was the so-called Soles y Rayos Bolvar, founded in 1821 and led by Francisco Lemus. Its aim was to establish the free Republic of Cubanacn, and it had branches in five districts of the island. In 1823, the societys leaders were arrested and condemned to exile. In the same year, Ferdinand VII, with French help and the approval of the Alliance, managed to abolish constitutional rule in Spain yet again and re-establish absolutism. As a result, the national militia of Cuba, established by the Constitution and a potential instrument for liberal agitation, was dissolved, a permanent executive military commission under the orders of the governor was created, newspapers were closed, elected provincial representatives were removed and other liberties suppressed.This suppression and the success of independence movements in the former Spanish colonies on the North American mainland led to a rise of Cuban nationalism, and a number of independence conspiracies took place during the 1820s and 1830s, but all failed. Among these were the Expedicin de los Trece (Expedition of the 13) in 1826, the Gran Legin del Aguila Negra (Great Legion of the Black Eagle) in 1829, the Cadena Triangular (Triangular Chain) and the Soles de la Libertad (Suns of Liberty) in 1837. Leading national figures in these years included Varela and Cubas first revolutionary poet, Mara Heredia.(Navarro, Jos Cantn: History of Cuba, La Habana, 1998, p. 36-38, ISBN 959-705-19-1) The US also opposed possible agreements between Spain and England.Antislavery and independence movementsIn 1836, the first armed uprising for independence took place in Puerto Prncipe (Camagey Province), led by de Agero and Manuel Snchez. Agero (a white man) and Snchez (a mulatto) were both executed, becoming the first popular martyrs of the Cuban independence movement.()The 1830s saw a surge of the reformist movement, whose main leader was Jos Antonio Saco, standing out for his criticism of Spanish despotism and the slave trade. Nevertheless, this surge bore no fruit; Cubans remained deprived of the right to send representatives to the Spanish parliament, and Madrid stepped up repression.Nonetheless, Spain had long been under pressure to end the slave trade. In 1817, it signed a first treaty, to which it did not adhere. With the abolishment of slavery altogether in their colonies, the British forced Spain to sign another treaty in 1835. In this context, black revolts in Cuba increased, and were put down with mass executions.One of the most significant was the de La Escalera (Ladder Conspiracy), which started in March 1843 and continued until 1844. The conspiracy took its name from a torture method, in which blacks were tied to a ladder and whipped until they confessed or died. The Ladder Conspiracy involved free blacks and slaves, as well as white intellectuals and professionals. It is estimated that 300 blacks and mulattos died from torture, 78 were executed, over 600 were imprisoned and over 400 expelled from the island.(Cantn Navarro, Jos. History of Cuba. La Habana, 1998, p. 40, ISBN 959-705-419-1.)() (See comments in new translation of Villaverdes Cecilia Valds.) Among the executed was one of Cubas greatest poets, de la Concepcin Valds, now commonly known as Placido.() Antonio Saco, one of Cubas foremost thinkers, was expelled from Cuba.()Following the 1868&ndash;1878 rebellion of the Years War, all slavery was abolished by 1884, making Cuba the second-to-last country in the Western Hemisphere to abolish slavery, with Brazil being the last. Instead of blacks, slave traders looked for others sources of cheap labour, such as Chinese colonists and Indians from Yucatn. Another feature of the population was the number of Spanish-born colonists, known as peninsulares, who were mostly adult males; they constituted between ten and twenty per cent of the population between the middle of the 19th century and the great depression of the 1930s.The possibility of annexationBlack unrest and British pressure to abolish slavery motivated many Creoles to advocate Cubas annexation by the United States, where slavery was still legal. Other Cubans supported the idea, because they longed for what they considered higher development and democratic freedom. The annexation of Cuba was repeatedly supported by the US. In 1805 President Jefferson considered possessing Cuba for strategic reasons, sending secret agents to the island to negotiate with Governor Someruelos.In April 1823, Secretary of State Quincy Adams discussed the rules of political gravitation, in a theory often referred to as the ripe fruit theory. Adams wrote, There are laws of political as well as physical gravitation; and if an apple severed by its native tree cannot choose but fall to the ground, Cuba, forcibly disjoined from its own unnatural connection with Spain, and incapable of self-support, can gravitate only towards the North American Union which by the same law of nature, cannot cast her off its bosom. (Worthington, Chauncey Ford: Writings of John Quincy Adams vol. VII, Boston, Massachusetts, 2001, p372)He furthermore warned that the transfer of Cuba to Great Britain would be an event unpropitious to the interest of this Union.(Worthington, Chauncey Ford: Writings of John Quincy Adams vol. VII,  Boston, Massachusetts, 2001, p373) Adams voiced concern that a country outside of North America would attempt to occupy Cuba upon its separation from Spain. He wrote, The question both of our right and our power to prevent it, if necessary, by force, already obtrudes itself upon our councils, and the administration is called upon, in the performance of its duties to the nation, at least to use all the means with the competency to guard against and forfend it. (Worthington, Chauncey Ford: Writings of John Quincy Adams vol. VII,  Boston, Massachusetts, 2001, p379)On 2 December 1823, US President Monroe specifically addressed Cuba and other European colonies in his proclamation of the Doctrine. Cuba, located just  from the US city of West, was of interest to the doctrines founders, as they warned European forces to leave America for the Americans.(Dez de Medina, Ral: Autopsy of the Monroe doctrine The strange story of inter-American relations, New York, 1934, p.21)The most outstanding attempts in support of annexation were made by Army General Lpez, who prepared four filibuster expeditions to Cuba in the US. The first two, in 1848 and 1849, failed before departure due to US opposition. The third, made up of some 600 men, managed to land in Cuba and take the central city of Crdenas, but failed eventually due to a lack of popular support. Lpezs fourth expedition landed in Pinar del Ro province with around 400 men in August 1851; the invaders were defeated by Spanish troops and Lpez was executed.The independence struggle resumedIn the 1860s, Cuba had two more liberal-minded governors, Serrano and Dulce, who encouraged the creation of a Reformist Party, despite the fact that political parties were forbidden. But they were followed by a reactionary governor, Francisco Lersundi, who suppressed all liberties granted by the previous governors and maintained a pro-slavery regime.(Cantn Navarro, Jos. History of Cuba, p. 42.) On 10 October 1868, landowner Manuel de Cspedes made the Grito de Yara, the Cry of Yara, declaring Cuban independence and freedom for his slaves. This began the Years War, which lasted from 1868 to 1878, and eventually contributed to the abolition of slavery.The War of 1895Build-up to the warSocial, political and economic changeIn the years of the so-called Rewarding Truce, lasting for 17 years from the end of the Years War in 1878, there were fundamental changes in Cuban society. With the abolition of slavery in October 1886, former slaves joined the ranks of farmers and urban working class. Most wealthy Cubans lost their properties and many of them joined the urban middle class. The number of sugar mills dropped and efficiency increased with only companies and the most powerful plantation owners owning them. The numbers of campesinos and tenant farmers rose considerably. It is the period when U.S. capital began flowing into Cuba, mostly into the sugar and tobacco businesses and mining. By 1895 investments reached 50 million U.S. dollars. Although Cuba remained Spanish politically, economically it started to depend on the U.S.(Cantn Navarro, Jos. History of Cuba, p. 53-55.)Although the conditions were very difficult, these changes entailed the rise of labour movements; the first organisation was created in 1878 being the Cigar Makers Guild, followed by the Central Board of Artisans in 1879 and many more across the island.(Cantn Navarro, Jos. History of Cuba, p. 55-57.)Abroad, a new trend of aggressive U.S. influence emerged, evident in Secretary of State G. Blaines expressed ideals that all of Central and South America would some day fall to the U.S. Blaine placed particular importance on the control of Cuba. That rich island, he wrote on 1 December 1881, the key to the Gulf of Mexico, is, though in the hands of Spain, a part of the American commercial system If ever ceasing to be Spanish, Cuba must necessarily become American and not fall under any other European domination. (Spanish-Cuban-American War - History of Cuba) Blaines vision did not allow the existence of an independent Cuba. Mart noticed with alarm the movement to annex Hawaii, viewing it as establishing a pattern for Cuba(Marts insurrection and the start of the warAfter his second deportation to Spain in 1878, Mart moved to the U.S. in 1881 where he took up mobilizing the support of the Cuban exile community, especially in City in the Tampa, Florida, area and West, Florida. He was working for a revolution and independence from Spain, but also lobbying to oppose U.S. annexation of Cuba, which some American and Cuban politicians desired. After deliberations with patriotic clubs across the U.S., the Antilles and Latin America El Partido Revolucionario Cubano (The Cuban Revolutionary Party), with the purpose of gaining independence for both Cuba and Puerto Rico, was officially proclaimed on April 10, 1892. Mart was elected delegate, the highest party position. By the end of 1894 the basic conditions for launching the revolution were set.(Cantn Navarro, Jos. History of Cuba, p. 59-60.)Marts impatience to start the revolution for independence was affected by his growing fear that the imperialist forces in the United States would succeed in annexing Cuba before the revolution could liberate the island from Spain.(Foner, Philip: The Spanish-Cuban-American War and the Birth of American Imperialism quoted in: http://www.historyofcuba.com/history/scaw/scaw1.htm)On 25 December 1895, three ships loaded with fighters and weapons, the Lagonda, the Almadis and the Baracoa, set sail for Cuba from Fernandina Beach, Florida; the weapons and supplies they carried had been difficult and costly to obtain. Two of the ships were seized by U.S. authorities in early January, who also alerted the Spanish government, but the proceedings went ahead.The insurrection began on 24 February 1895, with uprisings all across the island. In Oriente the most important ones took place in Santiago, Guantnamo, Jiguan, San Luis, El Cobre, El Caney, Alto Songo, Bayate and Baire. The uprisings in the central part of the island, such as Ibarra, Jagey Grande and Aguada, suffered from poor co-ordination and failed; the leaders were captured, some of them deported and some executed. In the province of Havana the insurrection was discovered before it got off and the leaders detained. Thus, the insurgents further west in Pinar del Ro were ordered to wait.Mart, on his way to Cuba, proclaimed the Manifesto de Montecristi in Domingo, outlining the policy for Cubas war of independence: the war was to be waged by blacks and whites alike; participation of all blacks was crucial for victory; Spaniards who did not object to the war effort should be spared, private rural properties should not be damaged; and the revolution should bring new economic life to Cuba.((Cantn Navarro, Jos. History of Cuba, p. 61)On April 1 and 11, 1895, the main Mambi leaders landed on two expeditions in Oriente: Major Antonio Maceo and 22 members near Baracoa and Mart, Gomez and four other members in Playitas. Around that time, Spanish forces in Cuba numbered about 80,000, of which 20,000 were regular troops,and 60,000 were Spanish and Cuban volunteers. The latter were a locally-enlisted force that took care of most of the guard and police duties on the island. Wealthy landowners would volunteer a number of their slaves to serve in this force, which was under local control and not under official military command. By December 98,412 regular troops had been sent to the island and the number of volunteers increased to 63,000 men. By the end of 1897 there were 240,000 regulars and 60,000 irregulars on the island. The revolutionaries were far outnumbered.(The Mambises were named after the Negro Spanish officer, Ethninius Mamby, who joined the Dominicans in the fight for independence in 1846. The Spanish soldiers referred to the insurgents as the men of Mamby and Mambies. When Cubas first war of independence (known as the Ten Year War) broke out in 1868, some of the same soldiers were assigned to the island, importing what had by then become a derogatory Spanish slur. The Cubans adopted the name with pride.After the Ten-Year War, possession of weapons by private individuals had been prohibited. Thus, from the very beginning of the war one of the most serious problems for the rebels was the acquisition of suitable weapons. This lack of arms led to the guerrilla-style war using the environment, the element of surprise, a fast horse and a machete. Most of the weapons were acquired in raids on the Spaniards. Between 11 June 1895, and 30 November 1897, out of 60 attempts to bring weapons and supplies to the rebels from outside the country, only one succeeded through the protection of the British. 28 were prevented already within U.S.territory; five were intercepted by the U.S. Navy, four by the Spanish Navy, two were wrecked, one was driven back to port by storm, the fate of another is unknown.(Escalation of the warMart was killed only shortly after his landing on 19 May 1895, at Dos Rios; but Mximo Gomez and Antonio Maceo fought on, taking the war to all parts of Oriente. By the end of June all of Camagey was at war. Continuing west they were met by 1868 war veterans, Polish internationalists, Gen. Roloff and Serafn Snchez in Las Villas, adding weapons, men and experience.In mid-September representatives of the five Liberation Army Corps assembled in Jimaguay, Camagey, to approve the Jimaguay Constitution. This constitution established a central government, which grouped the executive and legislative powers into one entity named the Government Council, headed by Cisneros and Mas.After a period of consolidation in the three eastern provinces, the liberation armies headed for Camagey and then for Matanzas, outmanoeuvring and deceiving the Spanish Army several times, defeating the Spanish general Martnez Campos, himself the victor of the Ten Year War, and killing his most trusted general at Peralejo. Campos tried the same strategy he had employed in the Ten Year War, constructing a broad belt across the island, called the trocha, about  long and  wide. This defense line was to limit rebel activities to the eastern provinces. The belt consisted of a railroad, from Jucaro in the south to Moron in the north, on which to move armoured railcars. At various points along this railroad there were fortifications, at intervals of  there were posts and at intervals of  there was barbed wire. In addition, traps were placed at the locations most likely to be attacked.For the rebels, it was essential to bring the war to the western provinces of Matanzas, Havana and Pinar del Ro, where the islands government and wealth was located. The Ten Year War failed because it had not managed to proceed beyond the eastern provinces.( In a successful cavalry campaign, overcoming the trochas, the rebels invaded every province. Surrounding all the larger cities and well-fortified towns, they arrived at the westernmost tip of the island on 22 January 1896, exactly three months after the invasion near Baragu.()(Cantn Navarro, Jos. History of Cuba, p. 64-65.)Campos was replaced by Gen. Valeriano Weyler y Nicolau (nicknamed The Butcher), who reacted to these rebel successes by introducing terror methods: periodic executions, mass exiles, and the destruction of farms and crops. These methods reached their height on October 21, 1896, when he ordered all countryside residents and their livestock to gather in various fortified areas and towns occupied by his troops within eight days. Hundreds of thousands of people had to leave their homes, creating appalling conditions of overcrowding in the towns and cities. It is estimated that this measure caused the death of at least one-third of Cubas rural population.(Canalejas, Jos in Cantn Navarro, Jos. History of Cuba, p. 66.) The forced relocation policy was maintained until March 1898.(Since the early 1880s, Spain had also been suppressing an independence movement in the Philippines, which was intensifying; Spain was thus now fighting two wars, which placed a heavy burden on its economy. In secret negotiations in 1896, Spain turned down U.S. offers to buy Cuba.Maceo was killed on 7 December 1896 in Havana province, while returning from the west.()As the war continued, the major obstacle to Cuban success was weapons supply. Although weapons and funding came from within the U.S., the supply operation violated American laws, which were enforced by the Coast Guard; of 71 resupply missions, only 27 got through, with 5 being stopped by the Spanish and 33 by the U.S. Coast Guard.()In 1897, the liberation army maintained a privileged position in Camagey and Oriente, where the Spanish only controlled a few cities. Spanish liberal leader Praxedes Sagasta admitted in May 1897: After having sent 200,000 men and shed so much blood, we dont own more land on the island than what our soldiers are stepping on.(Cantn Navarro, Jos. History of Cuba, p. 69.) The rebel force of 3,000 defeated the Spanish in various encounters, such as the battle of La Reforma and the surrender of Las Tunas on 30 August, and the Spaniards were kept on the defensive. Las Tunas had been guarded by over 1,000 well-armed and well-supplied men.As stipulated at the Jimaguay Assembly two years earlier, a second Constituent Assembly met in La Yaya, Camagey, on 10 October 1897. The newly-adopted constitution decreed that a military command be subordinated to civilian rule. The government was confirmed, naming Bartolom Mas as president and Dr. Domingo Mndez Capote vice as president.Madrid decided to change its policy toward Cuba, replacing Weyler, drawing up a colonial constitution for Cuba and Rico, and installing a new government in Havana. But with half the country out of its control, and the other half in arms, the new government was powerless and rejected by the rebels.The Maine incidentthumb|285px|right|Wreckage of the Maine, 1898The Cuban struggle for independence had captured the American imagination for years and newspapers had been agitating for intervention with sensational stories of Spanish atrocities against the native Cuban population, intentionally sensationalized and exaggerated. Americans believed that Cubas battle with Spain resembled Americas Revolutionary War.This continued even after Spain replaced Weyler and changed its policies and American public opinion was very much in favour of intervening in favour of the Cubans.()In January 1898, a riot by Cuban Spanish loyalists against the new autonomous government broke out in Havana leading to the destruction of the printing presses of four local newspapers for publishing articles critical of Spanish Army atrocities. The US Consul-General cabled Washington with fears for the lives of Americans living in Havana. In response the battleship  was sent to Havana in the last week of January. On 15 February 1898 the Maine was rocked by an explosion, killing 268 of the crew and sinking the ship in the harbour. The cause of the explosion has not been clearly established to this day.In an attempt to appease the US the colonial government took two steps that had been demanded by President McKinley: it ended the forced relocation and offered negotiations with the independence fighters. But the truce was rejected by the rebels.The Spanish-American War - the Cuban theatreThe explosion of the Maine sparked a wave of indignation in the US. Newspaper owners such as R. Hearst leapt to the conclusion that Spanish officials in Cuba were to blame, and they widely publicized the conspiracy although Spain could have had no interest in getting the US involved in the conflict.(Cantn Navarro, Jos. History of Cuba, p. 71.) journalism fuelled American anger by publishing atrocities committed by Spain in Cuba. Hearst, when informed by Remington, whom he had hired to furnish illustrations for his newspaper, that conditions in Cuba were not bad enough to warrant hostilities, allegedly replied, You furnish the pictures and Ill furnish the war.()McKinley, Speaker of the House Brackett Reed, and the business community opposed the growing public demand for war, which was lashed to fury by yellow journalism. The American cry of the hour became, Remember the Maine, To Hell with Spain!The decisive event was probably the speech of Senator Proctor delivered on 17 March, analyzing the situation and concluding that war was the only answer. The business and religious communities switched sides, leaving McKinley and Reed almost alone in their opposition to the war.(Offner 1992 pp 13135; Michelle Bray Davis and Rollin W. Quimby, Senator Proctors Cuban Speech: Speculations on a Cause of the Spanish-American War, Quarterly Journal of Speech 1969 55(2): 13141. ISSN 0033-5630.) Faced with a revved up, war-ready population, and all the editorial encouragement the two competitors could muster, the US jumped at the opportunity to get involved and showcase its new steam-powered Navy.( On 11 April McKinley asked Congress for authority to send American troops to Cuba for the purpose of ending the civil war there. On 19 April Congress passed resolutions (by a vote of 311 to 6 in the House and 42 to 35 in the Senate) supporting Cuban independence and disclaiming any intention to annex Cuba, demanding Spanish withdrawal, and authorizing the president to use as much military force as he thought necessary to help Cuban patriots gain independence from Spain. This was adopted by resolution of Congress and included from Senator Teller the Amendment, which passed unanimously, stipulating that the island of Cuba is, and by right should be, free and independent.( The amendment disclaimed any intention on the part of the US to exercise jurisdiction or control over Cuba for other than pacification reasons, and confirmed that the armed forces would be removed once the war is over. Senate and Congress passed the amendment on 19 April, McKinley signed the joint resolution on 20 April and the ultimatum was forwarded to Spain. War was declared on 20/21 April 1898.Its been suggested that a major reason for the US war against Spain was the fierce competition emerging between Joseph Pulitzers New York World and William Randolph Hearsts New York Journal. Joseph E. Wisan wrote in an essay titled The Cuban Crisis As Reflected In The New York Press, published in American Imperialism in 1898: In the opinion of the writer, the Spanish-American War would not have occurred had not the appearance of Hearst in New York journalism precipitated a bitter battle for newspaper circulation. It has also been argued that the main reason the U.S. entered the war was the failed secret attempt, in 1896, to purchase Cuba from a weaker, war-depleted Spain.( Hostilities started hours after the declaration of war when a US contingent under Admiral William T. Sampson blockaded several Cuban ports. The Americans decided to invade Cuba and to start in Oriente where the Cubans had almost absolute control and were able to co-operate, for example, by establishing a beachhead and protecting the US landing in Daiquiri. The first US objective was to capture the city of Santiago de Cuba in order to destroy Linares army and Cerveras fleet. To reach Santiago they had to pass through concentrated Spanish defences in the San Juan Hills and a small town in Caney. Between 22 and 24 June the Americans landed under General R. Shafter at Daiquir and Siboney, east of Santiago, and established a base.The port of Santiago became the main target of naval operations. The US fleet attacking Santiago needed shelter from the summer hurricane season. Thus nearby Bay with its excellent harbour was chosen for this purpose and attacked on 6 June (invasion of Guantnamo Bay). The of Santiago de Cuba, on 3 July 1898, was the largest naval engagement during the Spanish-American War resulting in the destruction of the Spanish Caribbean Squadron (Flota de Ultramar).Resistance in Santiago consolidated around Fort Canosa,(Daley#, L. 2000. El Fortin Canosa en la Cuba del 1898. in Los Ultimos Dias del Comienzo. Ensayos sobre la Guerra Hispano-Cubana-Estadounidense. B. E. Aguirre and E. Espina eds. RiL Editores, Santiago de Chile pp. 16171.) all the while major battles between Spaniards and Americans took place at Las Guasimas (of Las Guasimas) on 24 June El Caney of El Caney and San Juan Hill of San Juan Hill on 1 July 1898 outside of Santiago (The Battles at El Caney and San Juan Hills at HomeOfHeroes.com.) after which the American advance ground to a halt. Spanish troops successfully defended Fort Canosa, allowing them to stabilize their line and bar the entry to Santiago. The Americans and Cubans forcibly began a bloody, strangling siege of the city() which eventually surrendered on 16 July after the defeat of the Spanish Caribbean Squadron. Thus, Oriente was under control of Americans and the Cubans, but US General A. Miles would not allow Cuban troops to enter Santiago, claiming that he wanted to prevent clashes between Cubans and Spaniards. Thus, Cuban General Garca, head of the mambi forces in the Eastern department, ordered his troops to hold their respective areas and resigned, writing a letter of protest to General Shafter.(After losing the Philippines and Puerto Rico, which had also been invaded by the US, and with no hope of holding on to Cuba, Spain sued for peace on 17 July 1898.() On 12 August the US and Spain signed a protocol of Peace in which Spain agreed to relinquish all claim of sovereignty over and title of Cuba.() On 10 December 1898 the US and Spain signed the Treaty of Paris, recognizing Cuban independence() Although the Cubans had participated in the liberation efforts, the US prevented Cuba from participating in the Paris peace talks and signing the treaty. The treaty set no time limit for US occupation and the Isle of Pines was excluded from Cuba.(Cantn Navarro, Jos. History of Cuba, p. 77.)Although the treaty officially granted Cubas independence, US General William R. Shafter refused to allow Cuban General Calixto Garca and his rebel forces to participate in the surrender ceremonies in Santiago de Cuba.The first US occupation and the Platt amendmentAfter the Spanish troops left the island in December 1898, the government of Cuba was handed over to the United States on 1 January 1899. The first governor was General R. Brooke. Unlike Guam, Rico, and the Philippines, the United States did not annex Cuba because of the restrictions imposed in the Amendment.()Political changesThe US administration was undecided on Cubas future status. Once it had been pried away from the Spaniards it was to be assured that it moved and remained in the US sphere. How this was to be achieved was a matter of intense discussion and annexation was an option, not only on the mainland but also in Cuba. McKinley spoke about the links that should exist between the two nations.(Cantn Navarro, Jos. History of Cuba, p. 78.)Brooke set up a civilian government, placed US governors in seven newly created departments, and named civilian governors for the provinces as well as mayors and representatives for the municipalities. Many Spanish colonial government officials were kept in their posts. The population were ordered to disarm and, ignoring the Mambi Army, Brooke created the Rural Guard and municipal police corps at the service of the occupation forces. Cubas judicial powers and courts remained legally based on the codes of the Spanish government. Toms Estrada Palma, Marts successor as delegate of the Cuban Revolutionary Party, dissolved the party a few days after the signing of the Paris Treaty in December 1898, claiming that the objectives of the party had been met. The revolutionary Assembly of Representatives was also dissolved. Thus, the three representative institutions of the national liberation movement disappeared.(Cantn Navarro, Jos. History of Cuba, p. 74.)Economic changesBefore the US officially took over the government, it had already begun cutting tariffs on US goods entering Cuba without granting the same rights to Cuban goods going to the US.(Cantn Navarro, Jos. History of Cuba, p. 75) Government payments had to be made in US dollars.(Cantn Navarro, Jos. History of Cuba, p. 77) In spite of the Amendment, prohibiting the US occupation government from granting privileges and concessions to US investors, the Cuban economy, facilitated by the occupation government, was soon dominated by US capital.( The growth of US sugar estates was so quick that in 1905 nearly 10% of Cubas total land area belonged to US citizens. By 1902 US companies controlled 80% of Cubas ore exports and owned most of the sugar and cigarette factories.(Cantn Navarro, Jos. History of Cuba, p. 76)The US Army also began a massive public health program to fight endemic diseases, mainly fever, and an education system was organized at all levels, increasing the number of primary schools fourfold.Elections and independenceVoices soon began to be heard, demanding a Constituent Assembly.( In December 1899 the US War Secretary assured that the occupation was temporary, that municipal elections would be held, that a Constituent Assembly would be set up, followed by general elections and that sovereignty would be handed to Cubans. Brooke was replaced by General Leonard Wood to oversee the transition. Parties were created, including the National Party, the Republican Party of Las Villas, the Party of Havana and the Democratic Union Party.The first elections for mayors, treasurers and attorneys of the countrys 110 municipalities for a one-year-term took place on 16 June 1900 but balloting was limited to literate Cubans older than 21 and with properties worth more than 250 US dollars. Only members of the dissolved Liberation Army were exempt from these conditions. Thus, the number of about 418,000 male citizens over 21 was reduced to about 151,000. 360,000 women were totally excluded. The same elections were held one year later, again for a one-year-term.Elections for 31 delegates to a Constituent Assembly were held on 15 September 1900 with the same balloting restrictions. In all three elections, pro-independence candidates, including a large number of mambi delegates, won overwhelming majorities.(Cantn Navarro, Jos. History of Cuba, p. 79.) The Constitution was drawn up from November 1900 to February 1901 and then passed by the Assembly. It established a republican form of government, proclaimed internationally-recognized individual rights and liberties, freedom of religion, separation between church and state, and described the composition, structure and functions of state powers.On 2 March 1901, the US Congress passed the Army Appropriations Act,  stipulating the conditions for the withdrawal of United States troops remaining in Cuba following the War. As a rider, this act included the Amendment, which defined the terms of Cuban-US relations until 1934. It replaced the earlier Amendment. The amendment provided for a number of rules heavily infringing on Cubas sovereignty:*Cuba would not transfer Cuban land to any power other than the United States.*Cuba would contract no debt without guarantees that the interest could be served from ordinary revenues.*The right to US intervention in Cuban affairs and military occupation when the US authorities considered that the life, properties and rights of US citizens were in danger,*Cuba was prohibited from negotiating treaties with any country other than the United States which will impair or to impair the independence of Cuba.*Cuba was prohibited to permit any foreign power or powers to obtain  lodgement in or control over any portion of Cuba.*The Isle of Pines (now called de la Juventud) was deemed outside the boundaries of Cuba until the title to it was adjusted in a future treaty.*The sale or lease to the United States of lands necessary for coaling or naval stations at certain specified points to be agreed upon. The amendment ceded to the United States the naval base in Cuba (Guantnamo Bay) and granted the right to use a number of other naval bases as coal stations.As a precondition to Cubas independence, the US demanded that this amendment be approved fully and without changes by the Constituent Assembly as an appendix to the new constitution. Faced with this alternative, the appendix was approved, after heated debate, by a margin of 4 votes. Governor Wood admitted: Little or no independence had been left to Cuba with the Platt Amendment and the only thing appropriate was to seek annexation.(In the presidential elections of 31 December 1901, Estrada Palma, a US citizen still living in the United States, was the only candidate. His adversary, General Mas, withdrew his candidacy in protest against US favoritism and the manipulation of the political machine by Palmas followers. Palma was elected to be the Republics first President, although he only returned to Cuba four months after the election. The US occupation officially ended when Palma took office on 20 May 1902.(Cantn Navarro, Jos. History of Cuba, p. 81.)Cuba in the early 20th centuryIn 1902, the United States handed over control to a Cuban government that as a condition of the transfer had included in its constitution provisions implementing the requirements of the Amendment, which among other things gave the United States the right to intervene militarily in Cuba. Havana and Varadero became popular tourist resorts. The Cuban population gradually enacted civil rights anti-discrimination legislation that ordered minimum employment quotas for Cubans.President Estrada Palma was elected in 1902, and Cuba was declared independent, though Guantanamo Bay was leased to the United States as part of the Platt Amendment. The status of the Isle of Pines as Cuban territory was left undefined until 1925 when the United States finally recognized Cuban sovereignty over the island. Estrada Palma, a frugal man, governed successfully for his four year term; yet when he tried to extend his time in office, a revolt ensued. In 1906, the United States representative Howard Taft, notably with the personal diplomacy of Funston, negotiated an end of the successful revolt led by able young general Loynaz del Castillo,() who had served under Antonio Maceo in the final war of independence. Estrada Palma resigned. The United States Governor Magoon assumed temporary control until 1909.() In this period in the area of Manzanillo, Agustn Martn Veloz, Roca, and Francisco (Paquito) Rosales founded the embryonic Cuban Communist Party.()For three decades, the country was led by former War of Independence leaders, who after being elected did not serve more than two constitutional terms. The Cuban presidential succession was as follows: Miguel Gmez (19081912); Garca Menocal (19131920); Zayas (192125).()In World War I, Cuba declared war on Germany on 7 April 1917, the day after the US entered the war. Despite being unable to send troops to fight in Europe, Cuba played a significant role as a base to protect the West Indies from U-Boat attacks. A draft law was instituted, and 25,000 Cuban troops raised, but the war ended before they could be sent into action.After World War IPresident Machado was elected by popular vote in 1925, but he was constitutionally barred from reelection. Machado, who determined to modernize Cuba, set in motion several massive civil works projects such as the Central Highway, but at the end of his constitutional term he held on to power. The United States, despite the Platt Amendment, decided not to interfere militarily. The communists of the PCC did very little to resist Machado in his dictator phase; however, numerous other groups did. In the late 1920s and early 1930s a number of Cuban action groups, including some Mamb, staged a series of uprisings that either failed or did not affect the capital. The revolution of 1933 undermined the institutions and coercivestructures of the oligarchic state. The young and relatively inexperiencedrevolutionaries found themselves pushed into the halls of state power byworker and peasant mobilisations. Between September 1933 and January1934 a loose coalition of radical activists, students, middle-classintellectuals, and disgruntled lower-rank soldiers formed a ProvisionalRevolutionary Government. This coalition was directed by a popularuniversity professor, Dr Ram6n Grau San Martin. The Grau governmentpromised a new Cuba with social justice for all classes, and theabrogation of the Platt Amendment. While the revolutionary leaderscertainly wanted diplomatic recognition by Washington, they believedtheir legitimacy stemmed from the popular rebellion which brought themto power, and not from the approval of the United States Departmentof State. To this end, throughout the autumn of 1933 the governmentdecreed a dramatic series of reforms. The Platt Amendment wasunilaterally abrogated, and all the political parties of the machadato weredissolved.4 The Provisional Government granted autonomy to theUniversity of Havana, women obtained the right to vote, the eight-hour day was decreed, a minimum wage was established for cane-cutters, andcompulsory arbitration was promoted. The government created a Ministryof Labour, and a law was passed establishing that 50 per cent of allworkers in agriculture, commerce and industry had to be Cuban citizens.The Grau regime set agrarian reform as a priority, promising peasantslegal title to their lands. For the first time in Cuban history the countrywas governed by people who did not negotiate the terms of politicalpower with Spain (before i898), or with the United States (after i898).The Provisional Government survived until January 1934, when it wasoverthrown by an equally loose anti-government coalition of right-wingcivilian and military elements. Led by a young sergeant, Fulgencio Batistay Zaldivar, this movement was supported by the United States. (Whitney 2000:436-437)Batista, with his straight Tano hair and very dark skin, often lightened in later photographs, was known as El Mulato Lindo. He was the first and only mulatto leader in Cuban history.The 1940 constitution and the Batista eraImage:Prio Socarras 1948.jpg|thumb|right|120px|President Pro Socarrs (left), with US president S. Truman in Washington, 1948.The rise of BatistaIn 1940, Cuba had free and fair elections.(() Batista, endorsed by Communists,() won the election. Communists attacked the anti-Batista opposition, saying that Ramn Grau and others were fascists, reactionaries, and Trotskyists.( The 1940 Constitution, which Julia E. Sweig describes as extraordinarily progressivist, was adopted by Batista administration.()( The constitution denied Batista the possibility to run consecutively in the 1944 election.Rather than endorsing Batistas hand-picked successor Carlos Zayas, the Cuban people elected Dr. Grau San Martn in 1944. A populist physician, who had briefly held the presidency in the 1933 revolutionary process, Grau made a deal with unions to continue Batistas pro-labour policies.( Graus administration coincided with the end of World War II, and he inherited an economic boom as sugar production and prices rose. He inaugurated a program of public works and school construction. Social security benefits were increased, and economic development and agricultural production were encouraged. But increased prosperity brought increased corruption. Nepotism and favoritism flourished, and urban violence, a legacy of the early 1930s, reappeared now with tragic proportions.(http://www.answers.com/topic/grau-san-mart-n-ram-n>)( The country was also steadily gaining a reputation as a base for organized crime, with the Conference of 1946 seeing leading Mafia mobsters descend upon the city.(Havana Conference)Grau was followed by Pro Socarrs, also elected democratically, but whose government was tainted by increasing corruption and violent incidents among political factions. Around the same time Castro had become a public figure at the University of Havana. Chibs was the leader of the Ortodoxo (Orthodox Party), a liberal democratic group, who was widely expected to win in 1952 on an anticorruption platform. Chibs committed suicide before he could run for the presidency, and the opposition was left without its major leader.Taking advantage of the opportunity, Batista, who was running for president in the 1952 elections, but was only expected to get a small minority of votes, seized power in an almost bloodless coup three months before the election was to take place. President Pro did nothing to stop the coup, and was forced to leave the island. Due to the corruption of the past two administrations, the general public reaction to the coup was somewhat accepting at first. However, Batista soon encountered stiff opposition when he temporarily suspended the balloting and the constitution, and attempted to rule by decree. Elections were held in 1953 and Batista was elected. Opposition parties mounted a blistering campaign, and continued to do so, using the Cuban free press during all of Batistas tenure in office.Economic expansionAlthough Batista was intent on lining his pockets, Cuba did flourish economically during his regime. Cubas wages were among the worlds highest;( according to the Labor Organization, the average industrial salary in Cuba was the worlds 8th highest in 1958, and the average agricultural wage was higher than in nations such as Denmark, West Germany, Belgium, or France.()( Although a third of the population still lived in poverty, Cuba was one of the five most developed countries in Latin America.() Only 44% of the population was rural.(domestic product per capita was already about equal to that of Italy and significantly higher than that of countries such as Japan at the time, although Cubas GDP was still only a sixth as large as that of the US.(( According to the United Nations at the time, one feature of the Cuban social structure was a large middle class.() Labour rights were also favourable - an day had been established in 1933, long before other countries, and Cuban workers had a monthss paid holiday, nine days sick leave with pay, and six weeks holiday before and after childbirth.(Cuba also had Latin Americas highest per capita consumption rates of meat, vegetables, cereals, automobiles, telephones and radios.(()(186 Televisions per capita was the fifth highest in the world, and despite Cubas small size, it had the worlds 8th highest number of radio stations (160). According to the United Nations, Cubans read 58 daily newspapers during the late 1950s, with more newspapers being read only in three much more populous countries: Brazil, Argentina and Mexico.( People migrated to Havana at fast pace. Havana was the worlds fourth most expensive city at the time,( and had more cinemas than New York.( The economy could not always keep up with demand, however - under Batista, Cuba had the highest telephone penetration in Latin America, but thousands of citizens were still waiting to be connected to the phone network, causing mass frustration.(Moreover, Cubas health service was remarkably developed. It had one of the highest numbers of doctors per capita - more than in the United Kingdom - and the third-lowest adult mortality rate in the world. According to the Health Organization, the island had the lowest mortality rate in Latin America and the 13th lowest in the world - better than in France, Belgium, West Germany, Israel, Japan, Austria, Italy, Spain, and Portugal.()()() Education spending in Cuba was, relatively, the highest in Latin America.( Cuba had the 4th highest literacy rate in the region at almost 80% according to the United Nations, higher than that of Spain.()((Stagnation and dissatisfactionHowever, the United States was the frame of reference, not Latin America.(( Cubans travelled to America, read American newspapers, listened to American radio, watched American television, and were attracted to American culture.( Middle class Cubans dreamed of the American economy and the gap between Cuba and the US increasingly frustrated many in the mid-1950s.( The middle class became increasingly dissatisfied with the administration, while labour unions supported Batista until the very end.((There were large income disparities that were a result of the fact that Cubas unionized workers enjoyed perhaps the most extensive privileges in Latin America.( Cuban labour unions had established limitations on mechanization and even bans on dismissals.( The labour unions privileges were obtained in large measure at the cost of the unemployed and the peasants.()Cubas labour regulations ultimately caused economic stagnation. Hugh Thomas asserts that militant unions succeeded in maintaining the position of unionized workers and, consequently, made it difficult for capital to improve efficiency.() Between 1933 and 1958, Cuba increased economic regulation enormously.( The regulation led to declining investment.( The Bank also complained that the Batista administration raised the tax burden without assessing its impact. Unemployment was high; many university graduates could not find jobs.( After its earlier meteoric rise, the Cuban gross domestic product grew at only 1% annually on average between 1950 and 1958.()The Cuban revolutionCastro, a young lawyer from a rich family, who was running for a seat in the Chamber of Representatives for the Partido Ortodoxo, circulated a petition to depose Batistas government on the grounds that it had illegitimately suspended the electoral process. However, the petition was not acted upon by the courts. On 26 July 1953 Castro led a historic attack on the Barracks near de Cuba, but failed. Many soldiers were killed by Castros forces. Castro was captured, tried and sentenced to 15 years in prison. However, he was released by the Batista government in 1956, when amnesty was given to many political prisoners, including the ones that assaulted the Moncada barracks. Castro subsequently went into exile in Mexico where he met Che Guevara. While in Mexico, he organized the of July Movement with the goal of overthrowing Batista. A group of 82 men sailed to Cuba on board the yacht Granma, landing in the eastern part of the island in December 1956. Despite a pre-landing rising in Santiago by Pais and his followers of the urban pro-Castro movement, most of Castros men were promptly killed, dispersed or taken prisoner by Batistas forces.Castro managed to escape to the Maestra mountains with about 12-17 effectives, aided by the urban and rural opposition, including Celia Sanchez and the bandits of Cresencio Perezs family, he began a guerrilla campaign against the regime. Castros main forces supported by numerous poorly armed escopeteros, and with support from the well armed fighters of the Pais urban organization who at times went to the mountains the rebel army grew more and more effective. The country was soon driven to chaos conducted in the cities by diverse groups of the anti-Batista resistance and notably a bloodily crushed rising by the Batista Navy personnel in Cienfuegos. At the same time, rival guerrilla groups in the Escambray Mountains also grew more and more effective. Castro attempted to arrange a general strike in 1958, but did not get support from Communists or labor unions.()United States imposed trade restrictions on the Batista administration and sent an envoy which attempted to persuade Batista to leave the country voluntarily.( The middle class was dissatisfied with the unemployment and wanted to restore the 1940 constitution. Batista fled on 1 January 1959.Castro took over. Within months of taking control, Castro moved to consolidate power by brutally marginalizing other resistance groups and figures and imprisoning and executing opponents and former supporters. As the revolution became more radical and continued its persecution of those who did not agree with its direction, hundreds of thousands of Cubans fled the island.Castros CubaPoliticsFidel Castro quickly purged political opponents from the administration. Loyalty to Castro became the primary criterion for all appointments.( Groups such as labour unions were made illegal.(By the end of 1960, all opposition newspaper had been closed down and all radio and television stations were in state control.(189 Teachers and professors were purged.(189 The Communist Party strengthened its one-party rule, with Castro as the supreme leader.(189 Moderates were arrested.(189 Fidels brother Ral Castro became the commander of the army.(189 In September 1960, the watch networks known as for the defense of the revolution (CDR) were created.(189In July 1961, two years after the 1959 Revolution, the Revolutionary Organizations (IRO) was formed by the merger of Fidel Castros of July Movement, the Popular Socialist Party led by Roca and the Directory March 13th led by Chomn. On March 26, 1962 the IRO became the United Party of the Cuban Socialist Revolution (PURSC) which, in turn, became the Party of Cuba on October 3, 1965 with Castro as First Secretary. As of 2011, the Communist Party remains the only recognized political party in Cuba. Other parties, though not illegal, are unable to campaign or conduct any activities on the island that could be deemed counter-revolutionary.Break with the United StatesCastros resentment of US influenceThe US recognized the Castro government on 7 January, only six days after Batista fled Cuba. President Eisenhower sent a new ambassador, Bonsal, to replace T. Smith, who had been close to Batista. The administration, in agreement with the media and the Congress (Republicans and Democrats alike), did this with the assumption that Cuba must remain in the US sphere of influence. If Castro accepted these parameters, he would be allowed to stay in power. Otherwise he would be overthrown.(Gleijeses, Piero: Conflicting Missions, Havana, Washington and Africa, 19591976, The University of North Carolina Press, 2002, p. 14.)Among the opponents of Batista there were many who wanted to accommodate the US. However, Castro belonged to a faction who, to the astonishment of Eisenhower and many Americans, was repulsed by US domination and paternalism. Castro did not forgive the US supply of arms to Batista during the revolution. On 5 June 1958, he wrote: The Americans are going to pay dearly for what they are doing. When the war is over, Ill start a much longer and bigger war of my own: the war Im going to fight against them. That will be my true destiny.(Castro to Celia Sanches, 5 June 1958 in Franqui: Diary, p. 338.) (The US had stopped supplies to Batista in March 1958, but left its Military Advisory Group in Cuba(Paterson in: Contesting Castro, p. 242.)). Thus, Castro had no intention to bow to the US. Even though he did not have a clear blueprint of the Cuba he wanted to create, Castro dreamed of a sweeping revolution that would uproot his countrys oppressive socioeconomic structure and of a Cuba that would be free of the United States.(Quotations from Unofficial Visit of Prime Minister Castro of Cuba to Washington  A Tentative Evaluation, enclosed in Herter to Eisenhower, April 23, 1959, jFRUS 195860, 6:483, and Special NIE in: The Situation in the Caribbean through 1959, 30 June 1959, p. 3, NSA)Breakdown of relationsOnly six months after Castro seized power, the Eisenhower administration began to plot his ouster. The United Kingdom was persuaded to cancel the sale of Hunter aircraft to Cuba.At the same meeting R. Rubottom, Jr., Assistant Secretary of State for Inter-American Affairs, summarized the evolution of States relations since January: The period from January to March might be characterized as the honeymoon period of the Castro government. In April a downward trend in US-Cuban relations had been evidentIn June we had reached the decision that it was not possible to achieve our objectives with Castro in power and had agreed to undertake the program referred to by Mr. Merchant. In July and August we had been busy drawing up a program to replace Castro. However some US companies reported to us during this time that they were making some progress in negotiations, a factor that caused us to slow the implementation of our program. The hope expressed by these companies did not materialize. October was a period of clarification   On 31 October in agreement with Intelligence Agency, the Department had recommended to the President approval of a program along the lines referred to by Mr. Merchant. The approved program authorized us to support elements in Cuba opposed to the Castro government while making Castros downfall seem to be the result of his own mistakes.(NSC meeting, 14 January 1960, FRUS 1958-60, 6:74243.) It was probably as part of this program that Cuban exiles mounted sea borne raids against Cuba from US territory and that unidentified planes attacked economic targets on the island, leading the US to warn Washington that the population was becoming aroused against the United States.(Braddock to SecState, Havana, 1 February 1960, FRUS 195860, 6:778.)(Gleijeses, Piero in: Conflicting Missions, Havana, Washington and Africa, 19591976, The University of North Carolina Press, 2002, pp. 145.) In January 1960, CIA Chief Dulles proposed to sabotage sugar refineries on Cuba. Eisenhower considered such undertakings timely and felt that more ambitious programs should be implemented. In his view it was probably now the time to move against Castro in a positive and aggressive way which went beyond pure harassment. He asked the CIA to develop an enlarged program which was presented in March 1960.(Gray (Eisenhowers special assistant for national security affairs) to Wilson (assistant director, DDEL), 3 December 1974, p. 1, Gray Papers, box 2, DDEL.) This program led to the invasion in the Bay of Pigs.(Kornbluh: Bay of Pigs.)(Blight and Kornbluh in: Politics)(Vandenbroucke in: Perilous Options, p. 9-50)(Bissell: Reflections, pp. 152204) In February 1960, the French ship Coubre was blown up in Harbor as it unloaded munitions, killing dozens.Relations between the United States and Cuba deteriorated rapidly as the Cuban government, in reaction to the refusal of Dutch Shell, Oil and Texaco to refine petroleum from the Soviet Union in Cuban refineries under their control, took control of those refineries in July 1960. The Eisenhower administration promoted a boycott of Cuba by companies, to which Cuba responded by nationalizing the refineries in August 1960. Both sides continued to escalate the dispute. Cuba expropriated more US-owned properties, notably those belonging to the International Telephone and Telegraph Company (ITT) and the Fruit Company.In the Castro governments first reform law, on 17 May 1959, it sought to limit the size of land holdings, and to distribute that land to small farmers in Vital Minimum tracts.Formal disconnectionThe US broke diplomatic relations on 3 January 1961 and imposed the embargo against Cuba on 3 February 1962.The of American States, under pressure from the United States, suspended Cubas membership in the body on 22 January 1962, and the US Government banned all US-Cuban trade a couple of weeks later on 7 February. The Kennedy administration extended this on 8 February 1963 making travel, financial and commercial transactions by US citizens to Cuba illegal.(Priestland, Jane (editor) 2003 British Archives on Cuba: Cuba under Castro 1959&ndash;1962. Archival Publications International Limited, 2003, London ISBN 1-903008-20-4)In April 2009, US President Obama expressed his intention to relax the existing travel restrictions by making it legal for Americans to travel to Cuba. However, on September 2, 2010, Obama extended the embargo through September 14, 2011, determining that the embargo is in the national interest of the United States.(Presidential Memorandum-Continuation of Authorities Under the Trading With the Enemy Act: http://www.whitehouse.gov/the-press-office/2010/09/02/presidential-memorandum-continuation-authorities-under-trading-with-enem)The embargo is still in effect , although some humanitarian trade in food and medicines is now allowed. At first, the embargo did not extend to other countries and Cuba traded with most European, Asian and Latin American countries and especially Canada. But now the United States pressures other nations and US companies with foreign subsidiaries to restrict trade with Cuba. Also, the Act of 1996 makes it very difficult for companies doing business with Cuba to also do business in the United States, forcing internationals to choose between the two.Bay of Pigs invasionThe Bay of Pigs Invasion (known as La Batalla de Girn in Cuba), was an unsuccessful attempt by a U.S.-trained force of exiles to invade southern Cuba with support from U.S. government armed forces to overthrow the Cuban government of Castro. The plan was launched in April 1961, less than three months after F. Kennedy assumed the presidency in the United States. The Cuban armed forces, trained and equipped by Bloc nations, defeated the exile combatants in three days. The strained relations were exacerbated the following year by the Missile Crisis.The Cuban missile crisisTensions between the two governments peaked again during the October 1962 missile crisis. The United States had a much larger arsenal of long-range nuclear weapons than the Soviet Union, as well as medium-range ballistic missiles (MRBMs) in Turkey, whereas the Soviet Union had a large stockpile of medium-range nuclear weapons which were primarily located in Europe. Cuba agreed to let the Soviets secretly place SS-4 Sandal and SS-5 Skean MRBMs on their territory. Reports from inside Cuba to exile sources questioned the need for large amounts of ice going to rural areas, which led to the discovery of the missiles, confirmed by U-2 photos. The United States responded by establishing a cordon in international waters to stop Soviet ships from bringing in more missiles (designated a quarantine rather than a blockade to avoid issues with law). At the same time, Castro was getting a little too extreme for the liking of Moscow, so at the last moment the Soviets called back their ships. In addition, they agreed to remove the missiles already there in exchange for an agreement that the United States would not invade Cuba. Only after the fall of the Soviet Union was it revealed that another part of the agreement was the removal of US missiles from Turkey. It also turned out that some submarines that the US Navy blocked were carrying nuclear missiles and that communication with Moscow was tenuous, effectively leaving the decision of firing the missiles at the discretion of the captains of those submarines. In addition, following the dissolution of the Soviet Union, the Russian government revealed that FROGs (Free Rocket Over Ground) armed with nuclear warheads and Il-28 Beagle bombers armed with nuclear bombs had also been deployed in Cuba.Military build-upIn the 1961 Years Day parade, the Communist administration exhibited Soviet tanks and other weapons.() By 1982, Cuba possessed the second largest armed forces in Latin America, second only to Brazil, though it was thought not to have the ability to invade another nation (apart from perhaps small Caribbean nations).()RepressionsUnits to Aid Production or UMAPs (Unidades Militares para la Ayuda de Produccin) (labor camps) were established in 1965 as a way to eliminate alleged bourgeois and counter-revolutionary values in the Cuban population. In July 1968 the name UMAP was erased and paperwork associated with the UMAP was destroyed. The camps continued as Military Units.()By 1970s the standard of living was extremely spartan and discontent was rife.() Castro changed economic policies in the first half of 1970s.( In the 1970s unemployment reappeared as problem. The solution was to criminalize unemployment with 1971 Anti-Loafing Law; the unemployed would be put into jail.(194 One alternative was to go fight Soviet-supported wars in Africa.(194In any given year, there were about 20,000 dissidents held and tortured under inhuman prison conditions.(194 Homosexuals were imprisoned in internment camps in the 1960s, where they were subject to medical-political reeducation.() The Book of Communism estimates that 15,000-17,000 people were executed.(Black Book of Communism. p. 664.)EmigrationThe establishment of a socialist system in Cuba led to the fleeing of many hundreds of thousands of upper- and middle-class Cubans to the United States and other countries since Castros rise to power.By 1961, thousands of Cubans had fled Cuba for the United States. On 22 March an exile council was formed.( After defeating the Communist regime, the council planned to form a provisional government in which Mir Cardona (who had become a noted leader in the civil opposition to President Fulgencio Batista) would have served as the temporary president until elections.From 1959 through 1993, some 1.2 million Cubans (about 10% of the current population) left the island for the United States,(US Census Press Releases) often by sea in small boats and fragile rafts. In the early years a number of those who could claim dual Spanish-Cuban citizenship left for Spain. Over time a number of Jews were allowed to emigrate to Israel after quiet negotiations; the majority of the 10,000 or so Jews who were in Cuba in 1959 have left. After the collapse of the Soviet Union many Cubans now reside in a diverse number of countries, some ending up in countries of the Union. A large number of Cubans live in Mexico and Canada.One major exception to the embargo was made on 6 November 1965 when Cuba and the United States formally agreed to start an airlift for Cubans who wanted to go to the United States. The first of these so-called Flights left Cuba on 1 December 1965 and by 1971 over 250,000 Cubans had flown to the United States. In 1980, another 125,000 came to US during six-months period in the boat lift, some of them criminals and people with psychiatric diagnoses. It was discovered that the Cuban government was using the event to rid Cuba of the unwanted segments of its society. Currently, there is an immigration lottery allowing 20,000 Cubans seeking political asylum to go to the United States legally every year.The closest points between Key West and Cuba are at a distance of ninety-four statute miles apart.(http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Key_West,_Florida) The ocean separating the two destinations is known for its changing currents and high concentrations of sharks. County of Florida neighbors the Atlantic Ocean and is considered the Shark Capital of the World.(Shark Facts) Nonetheless, a thousand or more Cuban natives take the risk of traveling by small raft or boat to West, the southern most part of the continental US.Cuban involvement in Third World conflictsFrom the very beginning the Cuban Revolution defined itself as internationalist and focused on the whole world. Thus, out of this idealism and also as a strategy for survival, already one year after the victory of revolution on Cuba the country took on civil and military assignments in the hemisphere. Although still a third world country itself Cuba supported African, Central American and Asian countries in the fields of military development, health and education. These overseas adventures not only irritated the USA but quite often were a major headache for Cubas ostensible allies in the Kremlin.(Jim Lobe http://www.strategypage.com/militaryforums/50-9.aspx)The Sandinista insurgency in Nicaragua, which lead to the demise of the Somoza dictatorship in 1979, was openly supported by Cuba. However, it was on the African continent where Cuba was most active, supporting a total of 17 liberation movements or leftist governments, in countries including Angola, Ethiopia, Guinea-Bissau and Mozambique. Its Angolan involvement was particularly intense and noteworthy, ultimately assisting the Marxist-Leninist MPLA to victory in the Civil War.AngolaCubas involvement in Angola began in the 1960s when relations were established with the leftist Movement for the Popular Liberation of Angola (MPLA). The MPLA was one of three organisations struggling to liberate Angola from Portugal, the other two being UNITA and the FNLA. In August and October 1975, South African Defence Forces (SADF) invaded Angola in support of the UNITA and FNLA. On 5 November 1975, without consulting the USSR, the Cuban government opted for an all out intervention with combat troops (Carlota) in support of the MPLA.((Une Odysse Africaine  (France, 2006, 59mn) directed by: Jihan El Tahri) In 1987&ndash;1988, South Africa again sent military forces to Angola to stop an advance of Angolan government forces (FAPLA) against UNITA leading to the of Cuito Cuanavale, and, without consulting the USSR, Cuba directly participated in the negotiations between Angola and South Africa. On 22 December 1988, Angola, Cuba and South Africa signed the Tripartite Accord in New York, arranging for the retreat of South African and Cuban troops within 30 months, and the implementation of the 10-year-old UN Security Council Resolution 435 for the independence of Namibia. The Cuban intervention, for a short time, turned Cuba into a global player in the midst of the War. It ended with the independence of Namibia and sounded the bell for the decline of the Apartheid regime in South Africa. The withdrawal of the Cubans ended 13 years of military presence in Angola. At the same time they removed their troops from Pointe Noire of the Congo and Ethiopia.((Cuba (11/07))North AfricaAs early as 1961, Cuba supported the FLN in Algeria against France.(Gleijeses, Piero: Conflicting Missions: Havana, Washington, and Africa, (The University of North Carolina Press)) Shortly after Algerian independence, Morocco started a border dispute in October 1963 in which Cuba sent troops to help Algeria (see: War). From a Memorandum of 20 October 1963 by Major Castro, it can be seen that great importance was attached to the decent behaviour of the troops, with strict instructions being given on their proper conduct during foreign interventions.(http://www.gwu.edu/~nsarchiv/NSAEBB/NSAEBB67/gleijeses10.pdf (Document from the Centro de Informacion de la Defensa de las Fuerzas Armadas Revolucionarias, CIDFAR, Centre of the Revolutionary Armed Forces))CongoIn 1965 Cuba supported the Rebellion of adherents of Lumumba in Congo-Leopoldville (today the Republic of the Congo).( Among the insurgents was also Kabila who, 30 years later, would overthrow long-time dictator Mobutu. This secret Cuban mission turned out to be a complete failure.(Ernesto Che Guevara: The African Dream The Diaries of the Revolutionary War in the Congo. With an Introduction by Richard Gott (New York: Grove Press, 2001))EthiopiaFidel Castro was a friend of the Marxist-Leninist dictator Haile Mariam, whose regime killed hundreds of thousands during the Ethiopian Red Terror of the late 1970s and who was later convicted of genocide and against humanity. Castro backed Mengistu Haile Mariam even when the latter had a war with the Somalian Marxist-Leninist dictator Barre.(() Castro explained this to Honecker, communist dictator of Germany, by saying that Siad Barre was above all a chauvinist.()Escalation of foreign interventionsIn the 1970s and 1980s Cuba stepped up its military presence abroad, especially in Africa. It had up to 50,000 men stationed in Angola, 24,000 in Ethiopia and hundreds in other countries. Cuban forces played a key role in the War 1977/78 between Ethiopia and Somalia and kept a substantial garrison stationed in Ethiopia. In the Civil War beginning in 1977 and in Congo-Brazzaville (today of the Congo) Cubans acted as advisors. Congo-Brazzaville acted as a supply base for the Angola mission.(Cooperation between Cuban and Soviet intelligence servicesAs early as September 1959, Valdim Kotchergin (or Kochergin), a KGB agent, was seen in Cuba.((British Foreign Office. Chancery American Department, Foreign Office, London 2 September 1959 (2181/59) to British Embassy Havana classified as restricted Released 2000 by among British Foreign Office papers FOREIGN OFFICES FILES FOR CUBA Part 1: Revolution in Cuba in our letter 1011/59 May 6 we mentioned that a Russian workers delegation had been invited to participate in the May Day celebrations here, but had been delayed. The interpreter with the party, which arrived later and stayed in Cuba a few days, was called Vadim Kotchergin although he was at the time using what he subsequently claimed was his mothers name of Liston (?). He remained in the background, and did not attract any attention..)((English title: The training camp Point Zero where the Communist Party of Cuba (PCC) trained national and international terrorists)   Los coroneles soviticos de la KGB Vadim Kochergin y Victor Simonov (ascendido a general en 1970) fueron entrenadores en Punto Cero desde finales de los aos 60 del siglo pasado. Uno de los graduados por Simonov en este campo de entrenamiento es Ilich Ramrez Snchez, ms conocido como Carlos El Chacal. Otro alumno de esta instalacin del terror es el mexicano Rafael Sebastin Guilln, alias subcomandante Marcos, quien se gradu en Punto Cero a principio de los aos 80.) Jorge Luis Vasquez, a Cuban who was imprisoned in Germany, states that the East German Stasi trained the personnel of the Interior Ministry (MINIT).( ) The relationship between the Soviet Unions KGB and the Cuban Directorate was complex and marked by times of extremely close cooperation and times of extreme competition. The Soviet Union saw the new revolutionary government in Cuba as an excellent proxy agent in areas of the world where Soviet involvement was not popular on a local level. Leninov, the KGB Chief in City, was one of the first Soviet officials to recognize Castros potential as a revolutionary and urged the Soviet Union to strengthen ties with the new Cuban leader. The USSR saw Cuba as having far more appeal with new revolutionary movements, western intellectuals, and members of the Left, given Cubas perceived David and Goliath struggle against US imperialism. Shortly after the Missile Crisis in 1963, 1,500 DI agents, including Guevara, were invited to the USSR for intensive training in intelligence operations.Cuba after the Soviet UnionStarting from the mid-1980s and the collapse of Soviet Union,() Cuba experienced a crisis referred to as the Period. In 2008, Fidel Castro transferred power to his brother, Castro. Cuba remains one of the few states in the world. Although contacts between Cubans and foreign visitors were made legal in 1997,(Rennie, David. Cuba apartheid as Castro pulls in the tourists, Daily Telegraph, 08 June 2002.)() extensive censorship has isolated it from the rest of the world.When the Soviet Union broke up in late 1991, a major boost to Cubas economy was lost, leaving it essentially paralyzed because of the economys narrow basis, focused on just a few products with just a few buyers. Also, supplies (including oil) almost dried up. Over 80% of Cubas trade was lost and living conditions worsened. A Special Period in Peacetime was declared, which included cutbacks on transport and electricity and even food rationing. In response, the United States tightened up its trade embargo, hoping it would lead to Castros downfall. But Castro tapped into a pre-revolutionary source of income and opened the country to tourism, entering into several joint ventures with foreign companies for hotel, agricultural and industrial projects. As a result, the use of US dollars was legalized in 1994, with special stores being opened which only sold in dollars. There were two separate economies, dollar-economy and the peso-economy, creating a social split in the island because those in the dollar-economy made much more money (as in the tourist-industry). However, in October 2004, the Cuban government announced an end to this policy: from November US dollars would no longer be legal tender in Cuba, but would instead be exchanged for convertible pesos (since April 2005 at the exchange rate of $1.08) with a 10% tax payable to the state on the exchange of US dollars cash  though not on other forms of exchange.A Medical Association Journal paper states that The famine in Cuba during the Special Period was caused by political and economic factors similar to the ones that caused a famine in North Korea in the mid-1990s. Both countries were run by authoritarian regimes that denied ordinary people the food to which they were entitled when the public food distribution collapsed; priority was given to the elite classes and the military.( The government did not accept American donations of food, medicines and cash until 1993.()Cubans had to resort to eating anything they could find. In the Havana zoo, the peacocks, the buffalo and even the rhea were reported to have disappeared.( Cuban cats disappeared from streets to dinner tables.()Extreme shortages of food and other goods as well as electrical blackouts led to a brief period of unrest, including numerous anti-government protests and widespread increases in crime. In response, the Cuban Communist party government formed hundreds of rapid-action brigades to confront protesters. According to the Communist Party daily, Granma, delinquents and anti-social elements who try to create disorder and an atmosphere of mistrust and impunity in our society will receive a crushing reply from the people.The massacre in July 1994 was a massacre of fleeing Cubans.()Thousands of Cubans protested in Havana and chanted Libertad! during the uprising on August 5, 1994. The regimes security forces dispersed them soon.() A paper published in the Journal of Democracy states this was the closest that the Cuban opposition could come to asserting itself decisively.(In 1997, a group led by Roca, a decorated veteran of the Angolan war and the son of the founder of the Communist Party, sent a petition, entitled La Patria es de Todos (the homeland belongs to all) to the Cuban general assembly requesting democratic and human rights reforms. As a result, Roca and his three associates were sentenced to jail, from which they were eventually released.In 2001, a group of activists collected thousands of signatures for the Project, a petition requesting a referendum on the islands political process was openly supported by former US president Carter during his historic 2002 visit to Cuba. The petition gathered sufficient signatures, but was rejected on an alleged technicality. Instead, a plebiscite was held in which it was formally proclaimed that Castros brand of socialism would be perpetual.In 2003, Castro cracked down on independent journalists and other dissidents, which became known as the Black Spring.()()()() The government imprisoned 75 dissident thinkers, including 29 journalists,( librarians, human rights activists and democracy activists, on the basis that they were acting as agents of the United States by accepting aid from the US government.Fidel Castro steps downIn 2006, Fidel Castro took ill and withdrew from public life. The following year, Ral Castro became Acting President, replacing his brother as the de facto leader of the country. In a letter dated 18 February 2008, Castro announced that he would not accept the positions of president and commander in chief at the 24 February 2008 National Assembly meetings, saying I will not aspire nor acceptI repeat I will not aspire or acceptthe post of President of the Council of State and Commander in Chief.See also*of Cuban history*colonization of the Americas*of Cuban NationalityReferencesFurther reading*Castillo Ramos, Ruben 1956 Muerto Edesio, El rey de la Sierra Maestra (Edesio the king of Sierra Maestra Is Dead 19141956), Bohemia XLVIII No. 9 (12 August 1956) pp. 5254 and 87*Aviva Chomsky, Barry Carr, and Pamela Maria Smorkaloff (Eds.) The Cuba Reader: History, Culture, Politics (2004)*De Paz Snchez, Manuel Antonio (en colaboracin con Jos Fernndez y Nelson Lpez) 19931994. El bandolerismo en Cuba (18001933). Presencia canaria y protesta rural, Santa Cruz de Tenerife, two, 2 vols.* Foner, Philip S. A History of Cuba and its Relations with the United States, 1962.*Franklin, James. Cuba and the United States: A Chronological History, Ocean Press, 1997.* Gleijeses, Piero. Conflicting Missions: Havana, Washington, and Africa, 19591976. U. of North Carolina Press, 2002. 552 pp.* Richard Gott. Cuba: A New History (2004)* Hernndez, Rafael and Coatsworth, John H., ed. Culturas Encontradas: Cuba y los Estados Unidos Harvard U. Press, 2001. 278 pp.* Hernndez, Jos M. Cuba and the United States: Intervention and Militarism, 18681933 U. of Texas Press, 1993. 288 pp.* Johnson, Willis Fletcher, The History of Cuba, New York : B.F. Buck & Company, Inc., 1920* Kirk, John M. and McKenna, Peter. Canada-Cuba Relations: The Other Good Neighbor Policy. U. Press of Florida, 1997. 207 pp.* McPherson, Alan. Yankee No! Anti-Americanism in U.S.-Latin American Relations. Harvard U. Press, 2003. 257 pp.* Morley, Morris H. and McGillian, Chris. Unfinished Business: America and Cuba after the Cold War, 19892001. Cambridge U. Press, 2002. 253 pp.* Offner, John L. An Unwanted War: The Diplomacy of the United States and Spain over Cuba, 18951898. U. of North Carolina Press, 1992. 306 pp.* Paterson, Thomas G. Contesting Castro: The United States and the Triumph of the Cuban Revolution. Oxford U. Press, 1994. 352 pp.* Prez, Louis A., Jr. The War of 1898: The United States and Cuba in History and Historiography. U. of North Carolina Press 1998. 192 pp.* Prez, Louis A. Cuba and the United States: Ties of Singular Intimacy. U. of Georgia Press, 1990. 314 pp.*Perez, Louis A. 1989 Lords of the Mountain: Social Banditry and Peasant Protest in Cuba, 18781918 (Pitt Latin American Series) Univ of Pittsburgh Press ISBN 0-8229-3601-1* Schwab, Peter. Cuba: Confronting the U.S. Embargo New York: St. Martins, 1999. 226 pp.* Staten, Clifford L. The History of Cuba (Palgrave Essential Histories) (2005), brief* Thomas, Hugh . Cuba or the Pursuit of Freedom (rev ed. 1998) ISBN 978-0306808272* Tone, John Lawrence. War and Genocide in Cuba, 18951898 (2006)* Walker, Daniel E. No More, No More: Slavery and Cultural Resistance in Havana and New Orleans U. of Minnesota Press, 2004. 188 pp.* Whitney, Robert W., State and Revolution in Cuba: Mass Mobilization and Political Change, 1920&ndash;1940, Chapel Hill and London: University of North Carolina Press, 2001. ISBN 0807826111*Zeuske, Michael, Insel der Extreme. Kuba im 20. Jahrhundert (Island of Extremes. Cuba in the 20th Century), Zrich: Rotpunktverlag, 2004 ISBN 3-85869-208-5*Zeuske, Schwarze Karibik. Sklaven, Sklavereikulturen und Emanzipation {Black Caribbean. Slaves, Slavery Cultures and Emnacipation}, Zuerich: Rotpunktverlag, 2004 ISBN 3-85869-272-7External links*History of Cuba - World History Database*History of Cuba Timeline*1908 Catholic Encyclopedia entry on Cuba*History of Cuba*Online guides History of Cuba*Reflecting on Cubas Bloody History by Peter Coyote, San Francisco Chronicle, 4 March 2009*Deena Stryker Photographs of Cuba, 1963-1964 - Duke University Libraries Digital Collections*Cuban Historical and Literary Manuscript Collection - University of Miami Libraries Digital Collections{{Link GA|csKubyhistorieKubasde Cubahistoriade Cubade CubaKubedi Cuba vu KubaistorijaCubaja:de CubaCubeiKubyhistoriahistoria
5592
Foreign_relations_of_Cuba
Cubas once-ambitious foreign policy has been down sized as a result of economic hardship after the collapse of the bloc. Without massive Soviet subsidies and its primary trading partner Cuba was comparatively isolated in the 1990s, but has since entered bilateral co-operation with several South American countries, most notably Venezuela and Bolivia. The United States continues an embargo so long as it continues to refuse to move toward democratization and greater respect for human rights,() while the Union accuses Cuba of continuing flagrant violation of human rights and fundamental freedoms.() Cuba has developed a growing relationship with the Republic of China and Russia. In all, Cuba continues to have formal relations with 160 nations, and provided civilian assistance workers - principally medical - in more than 20 nations.(Cuba (09/01) US Department of State report) More than two million exiles have escaped to foreign countries. Cubas present minister is Rodrguez Parrilla.Cuba is currently a lead country on the Nations Human Rights Council, and is a founding member of the anti-American organization known as the Alternative for the Americas, a member of the American Integration Association and the Nations. Cuba is a member of the Movement and hosted its September 2006 summit. In addition as a member of the of Caribbean States (ACS), Cuba was re-appointed as the chair- of the special committee on transportation issues for the Caribbean region.(Cuba Takes Over Chair of ACS Transport Committee Caribbean Investor) Following a meeting in November 2004, several leaders of South America have attempted to make Cuba either a full or associate member of the South American trade-bloc known as Mercosur.(How Cuba Fits into Brazils Plans Brazzilmag)(Cuba Asks to Join Mercosur The Trumpet)HistorySpanish colonial periodPrior to achieving its independence, Cuba was a colony of Spain.1898-1959Prior to the triumph of the Revolution, Cuba maintained strong economic and political ties to the United States. From 1902 until its abrogation in 1934, the Amendment authorized the US to use military force to preserve Cubas independence.In 1917, Cuba entered World War I on the side of the allies.(History of Cuba)Cuba joined the of Nations in 1920.In 1941, Cuba declared war on Italy, Germany, and Japan.Cuba joined the United Nations in 1945.Cuba joined the of American States (OAS) in 1948.During the Presidency of Batista, Cuba did not initially face trade restrictions. In mid-1958, the United States imposed an arms embargo on the Batista administration.The Cold WarAs early as September 1959, Valdim Kotchergin (or Kochergin), a KGB agent, was seen in Cuba.((British Foreign Office. Chancery American Department, Foreign Office, London September 2, 1959 (2181/59) to British Embassy Havana classified as restricted Released 2000 by among British Foreign ILES FOR CUBA Part 1: Revolution in Cuba in our letter 1011/59 May 6 we mentioned that a Russian workers delegation had been invited to participate in the May Day celebrations here, but had been delayed. The interpreter with the party, which arrived later and stayed in Cuba a few days, was called Vadim Kotchergin although he was at the time using what he subsequently claimed was his mothers name of Liston (?). He remained in the background, and did not attract any attention..)()Following the establishment of diplomatic ties to the Soviet Union, and after the Cuban Missile Crisis, Cuba became increasingly dependent on Soviet markets and military and economic aid. Castro was able to build a formidable military force with the help of Soviet equipment and military advisors. The KGB kept in close touch with Havana, and Castro tightened Communist Party control over all levels of government, the media, and the educational system, while developing a Soviet-style internal police force.Castros alliance with the Soviet Union caused something of a split between him and Guevara. In 1966, Guevara left for Bolivia in an ill-fated attempt to stir up revolution against the countrys government.On August 23, 1968, Castro made a public gesture to the USSR that caused the Soviet leadership to reaffirm their support for him. Two days after the Soviet invasion of Czechoslovakia to repress the Spring, Castro took to the airwaves and publicly denounced the Czech rebellion. Castro warned the Cuban people about the Czechoslovakian counterrevolutionaries, who were moving Czechoslovakia towards capitalism and into the arms of imperialists. He called the leaders of the rebellion the agents of Germany and fascist reactionary rabble.() In return for his public backing of the invasion, at a time when some Soviet allies were deeming the invasion an infringement of Czechoslovakias sovereignty, the Soviets bailed out the Cuban economy with extra loans and an immediate increase in oil exports.The relationship between the Soviet Unions KGB and the Cuban Directorate was complex and marked by times of extremely close cooperation and times of extreme competition. The Soviet Union saw the new revolutionary government in Cuba as an excellent proxy agent in areas of the world where Soviet involvement was not popular on a local level. Leninov, the KGB Chief in City, was one of the first Soviet officials to recognize Castros potential as a revolutionary and urged the Soviet Union to strengthen ties with the new Cuban leader. Moscow saw Cuba as having far more appeal with new revolutionary movements, western intellectuals, and members of the Left with Cubas perceived David and Goliath struggle against imperialism. Shortly after the Missile Crisis in 1963, Moscow invited 1,500 DI agents, including Guevara, to the KGBs Center for intensive training in intelligence operations.After the revolution of 1959, Cuba soon took actions inimical to American trade interests on the island. In response, the U.S. stopped buying Cuban sugar and refused to supply its former trading partner with much needed oil. Relations between the countries deteriorated rapidly. In April 1961, following air attacks preparing for the of Pigs invasion by CIA-trained exiles, prime minister Fidel Castro declared Cuba to be a republic, and moved quickly to develop the growing relations between Cuba and the Soviet Union.In 1962, Cuba was expelled from the of American States - Thereafter, many nations throughout Latin America broke ties with Cuba.Following the establishment of diplomatic ties, and after the Missile Crisis in 1962, Cuba became increasingly dependent on Soviet markets and military and economic aid. Cuba was able to build a large military force with the help of Soviet equipment and military advisors. The Soviets also kept in close touch with Havana, sharing varying close relations until the collapse of the bloc in 1990.RussiaSee relationsRelations between the two countries suffered somewhat during the Yeltsin administration, as Cuba was forced to look for new major allies, such as China, after the dissolution of the Soviet Union. Relations improved when Putin was elected as the new Russian President. Putin, and later Medvedev, emphasized re-establishing strong relations with old Soviet allies. In 2008, Medvedev visited Havana and Castro made a week long trip to Moscow. In that same year the two governments signed multiple economic agreements and Russia sent tons of humanitarian aid to Cuba. Cuba, meanwhile, gave staunch political support for Russia during the South Ossetia war. Relations between the two nations are currently at a post-Soviet high, and talks about potentially re-establishing a Russian military presence in Cuba are even beginning to surface.Relations in Latin America and Africa during the Cold WarDuring the cold war, Cubas influence in the Americas was inhibited by the Doctrine and the dominance of the United States.(Cuba in Africa Foreign Affairs magazine 1987) Despite this Fidel Castro became an influential figurehead for leftist groups in the region, extending support to Marxist Revolutionary movements throughout Latin America, most notably aiding the Sandinistas in overthrowing Somoza in Nicaragua in 1979. In 1971, Fidel Castro took a month-long visit to Chile. The visit, in which Castro participated actively in the internal politics of the country, holding massive rallies and giving public advice to Allende, was seen by those on the political right as proof to support their view that The Chilean Way to Socialism was an effort to put Chile on the same path as Cuba.()Cubas intervention in Africa, which began in the mid-1970s, was more substantial leading to involvement in 17 African nations and three African insurgencies soon leading Cuban soldiers engaging in frontline military combat.( In doing so Castro aligned Cuba with African insurgencies against colonial vestiges and specifically against South Africa.( By providing military aid Cuba won trading partners for the Soviet bloc and potential converts to Marxism.(On November 4, 1975, Castro ordered the deployment of Cuban troops to Angola to aid the Marxist MPLA government against UNITA forces, which were being supported by the Republic of China, and later the United States, Israel, and South Africa (see: in Angola). After two months on their own, Moscow aided the Cuban mission with the USSR engaging in a massive airlift of Cuban forces into Angola. On this, Mandela is said to have remarked Cuban internationalists have done so much for African independence, freedom, and justice.() Cuban troops were also sent to Marxist Ethiopia to assist Ethiopian forces in the War with Somalia in 1977. Cuba sent troops along with the Soviet Union to aid the FRELIMO and MPLA governments in Mozambique and Angola, respectively, while they were fighting U.S. and South African-backed insurgent groups RENAMO (supported by Rhodesia as well) and UNITA. He also aided the government of Haile Mariam in Ethiopia during its conflict with Somalia. Overall, an estimated 14,000 Cubans were killed in Cuban military actions abroad.()Castro never disclosed the amount of casualties in Soviet African wars, but one estimate is 14,000, a high number for the small country.(Return to Havana by Maurice Halperin)Cuban troops were also sent to Marxist Ethiopia to assist Ethiopian forces in the Ogaden War with Somalia in 1977. In addition, Castro extended support to Marxist Revolutionary movements throughout Latin America, such as aiding the Sandinistas in overthrowing the Somoza government in Nicaragua in 1979. It has been claimed by the Foundation-funded Center for a Free Cuba() that an estimated 14,000 Cubans were killed in Cuban military actions abroad.(PostCold War relationsImage:Vladimir Putin in Cuba 14-17 December 2000-12.jpg|thumb|right|Fidel Castro with Russian President Putin, December 2000In the postCold War environment Cuban support for guerrilla warfare in Latin America has largely subsided, though the Cuban government continued to provide political assistance and support for left leaning groups and parties in the developing Western Hemisphere.When Soviet leader Gorbachev visited Cuba in 1989, the comradely relationship between Havana and Moscow was strained by Gorbachevs implementation of economic and political reforms in the USSR. We are witnessing sad things in other socialist countries, very sad things, lamented Castro in November 1989, in reference to the changes that were sweeping such communist allies as the Soviet Union, Germany, Hungary, and Poland.() The subsequent of the Soviet Union in 1991 had an immediate and devastating effect on Cuba.Cuba today works with a growing bloc of Latin American politicians opposed to the consensus, the American-led doctrine that trade, open markets, and privatization will lift poor third world countries out of economic stagnation. The Cuban government have condemned neoliberalism as a destructive force in the developing world, creating an alliance with Presidents Chvez of Venezuela and Morales of Bolivia in opposing such policies.(Reel, Monte. For Bolivian Majority, a New Promise; Nations First Indian President Vows to Chart Course Independent of U.S. The Washington Post. Washington, D.C.: 23 January 2006. pg. A.01)(Bolivia to Widen Control of Industry. The Washington Post. Washington, D.C.: May 3, 2006. pg. A.16)(Constable, Pamela. For Bolivian Victor, A Powerful Mandate; Populist Faces Practical Constraints. The Washington Post. Washington, D.C.: 20 December 2005. pg. A.01)(McDonnell, Patrick J. Global Capital; Leftist Presidents Take Spotlight at Trade Summit; A South American common market welcomes Venezuela, underscoring the blocs new politics. Cubas Castro steals the show. Los Angeles Times. Los Angeles, California: 22 July 2006. pg. C.4)Currently, Cuba has diplomatically friendly relationships with Presidents Chvez of Venezuela, da Silva of Brazil, and Fernndez of Argentina, with Chvez as perhaps his staunchest ally in the post-Soviet era. Cuba has sent thousands of teachers and medical personnel to Venezuela to assist Chvezs socialist oriented economic programs. Chvez, in turn provides Cuba with lower priced petroleum. Cubas debt for oil to Venezuela is believed to be on the order of one billion US dollars.(http://havanajournal.com/business_comments/A1221_0_4_0_M/)Relations with Caribbean Community (CARICOM)Ties between the nations of the Community (CARICOM) and Cuba have remained cordial over the course of the later half of the 20th century.(Arthur points out ties that bind The Nation newspaper) Formal diplomatic relations between the CARICOM economic giants: Barbados, Jamaica, Guyana and and Tobago have existed since 1972,(Advocate)(All set for Cuba/Caricom Summit - JAMAICAOBSERVER.COM) and have over time led to an increase in cooperation between the Heads of Government and Cuba. At a summit meeting of sixteen Caribbean countries in 1998, Fidel Castro called for regional unity, saying that only strengthened cooperation between Caribbean countries would prevent their domination by rich nations in a global economy.() Cuba, for many years regionally isolated, increased grants and scholarships to the Caribbean countries.To celebrate ties between the Caribbean Community and Cuba in 2002 the Heads of Government of Cuba and CARICOM have designated the day of December 8 to be called CARICOM-Cuba Day.(Caribbean Net News: CARICOM-Cuba Day: 8 December - A time for Celebration) The day is the exact date of the formal opening of diplomatic relations between the first CARICOM-four and Cuba.In December 2005, during the second CARICOM/CUBA summit held in Barbados, heads of CARICOM and Cuba agreed to deepen their ties in the areas of socio-economic and political cooperation in addition to medical care assistance. Since the meeting, Cuba has opened four additional embassies in the Caribbean Community including: and Barbuda, Dominica, Suriname, and Vincent and the Grenadines. This development makes Cuba the only nation to have embassies in all independent countries of the Caribbean Community.(Caribbean Net News: Cuba opens more Caribbean embassies) CARICOM and Canadian politicians(New focus on CARICOM/Canada relations) have jointly maintained that through the International inclusion of Cuba, a more positive change might indeed be brought about there (politically) as has been witnessed in the Republic of China.Cuban cooperation with the Caribbean was extended by a joint health programme between Cuba and Venezuela named Operacin Milagro, set up in 2005. The initiative is part of the Sandino commitment, which sees both countries coming together with the aim of offering free ophthalmology operations to an estimated 4.5 million people in Latin America and the Caribbean over a ten-year period.(Havanas Operation Miracle helps eye patients see light News. Scotsman) According to Douglas, the prime minister of Kitts and Nevis and the current Caricom chairman, more than 1,300 students from member nations are studying in Cuba while more than 1,000 Cuban doctors, nurses and other technicians are working throughout the region. In 1998 Trinidad Prime Minister Manning had a heart valve replacement surgery in Cuba and returned in 2004 to have a pacemaker implanted.(Cuba enjoys ties with Caribbean neighbor ASSOCIATED PRESS)Following Fidel Castros illness and temporary transfer of power Caribbean leaders sent get-well-soon messages to Castro. Leaders included Prime Minister Anthony of Lucia who announced: We pray for President Castro and we wish him Gods blessings.( Grenadan Prime Minister Mitchell stated Cuba has been a long-standing friend to the entire Caribbean, and Trinidad Prime Minister Patrick Manning issued a statement extending Castro his best wishes for a prompt recovery.( Additionally the Cuban-Barbadian Friendship Association (CBFA) and the social movement known as the Payne Movement also extended a press release stating We will lead the process for all progressive organisations in Barbados to hold a solidarity meeting with the government and people of the Republic of Cuba on August 13 at the Clement Payne Cultural Centre. Both organizations stated they would be planning to send a delegation to Cuba to celebrate with Fidel Castro his 80th birthday, in addition to the annual observance on October 6 of Flight 455 which was bombed off the coast of Barbados in 1976 via a CIA-linked plot.(The Nation Newspaper | Get-well wishes for Castro)In December 2008 the CARICOM Heads of Government opened the third Cuba-CARICOM Summit in Cuba. The summit is to look at closer integration of the Caribbean Community and Cuba.(TIES THAT BIND: CUBA/CARICOM leaders talk closer cooperation - Caribbean News Agency (CANA) - Monday, 08 December 2008) During the summit the Caribbean Community (CARICOM) bestowed Fidel Castro with the highest honour of CARICOM, The Honorary Order of the Caribbean Community which is presented in exceptional circumstances to those who have offered their services in an outstanding way and have made significant contributions to the region.(http://www.granma.cu/ingles/2008/diciembre/mar9/50orden-i.html)(Caricoms highest honour for Fidel - Trinidad and Tobago Express Newspaper - December 7, 2008)At a summit meeting of sixteen Caribbean countries in 1998, Castro called for regional unity, saying that only strengthened cooperation between Caribbean countries would prevent their domination by rich nations in a global economy.() Caribbean nations have embraced Cubas Fidel Castro while accusing the US of breaking trade promises. Castro, until recently a regional outcast, has been increasing grants and scholarships to the Caribbean countries, while US aid has dropped 25% over the past five years.() Cuba has opened four additional embassies in the Caribbean Community including: Antigua and Barbuda, Dominica, Suriname, Saint Vincent and the Grenadines. This development makes Cuba the only country to have embassies in all independent countries of the Caribbean Community.()AmericasCuba has supported a number of leftist groups and parties in Latin America and the Caribbean since the 1959 revolution. In the 1960s Cuba established close ties with the emerging Guatemalan social movement led by Luis Augusto Turcios Lima, and supported the establishment of the URNG, a militant organization that has evolved into one of Guatemalas current political parties. In the 1980s Cuba backed the FMLN in Salvador, providing military and intelligence training, weapons, guidance, and organizational support.BrazilWith the electoral win of the President of Brazil, Incio Lula da Silva in 2002 ties between Cuba and Brazil have steadily warmed. Brazil continues to play its part in trying to revive and upgrade the offshore oil and gas infrastructure of Cuba.() In addition, talks led by Brazil are underway seeking to develop a framework for Cuba to become a normalised affiliate member of the Mercosur bloc of countries.CanadaCanada has maintained consistently cordial relations with Cuba, in spite of considerable pressure from the United States, and the island is also one of the most popular travel destinations for Canadian citizens. Canada-Cuba relations can be traced back to the 18th century, when vessels from the provinces of Canada traded codfish and beer for rum and sugar. Cuba was the first country in the Caribbean selected by Canada for a diplomatic mission. Official diplomatic relations were established in 1945, when Vaillancourt, a noted writer and historian, was designated Canadas representative in Cuba. Canada and Mexico were the only two countries in the hemisphere to maintain uninterrupted diplomatic relations with Cuba following the Cuban Revolution in 1959.In 1994, a joint venture was formed between the Nickel Union and the Canadian firm International, which operates a mining and processing plant on the island in Moa. A second enterprise, Refinery Co. Inc., was created in Alberta for nickel refining. Canada has been critical of the U.S. trade embargo against Cuba, and strongly objected to the Act. In 1996 Foreign Affairs Minister Axworthy stated: Canada shares the U.S. objectives of improving human rights standards and moving to more representative government in Cuba. But we are concerned that the Helms-Burton Act takes the wrong approach. That is why we have been working with other countries to uphold the principles of international law. In 1996 a Members Bill was introduced, but not made law, in the parliament; this law called the Bill was in response to the extraterritoriality of the aforementioned Act.Former Prime Minister Trudeau and Fidel Castro were personal friends. Castro was among Pierre Trudeaus pallbearers at his funeral in 2000. Former Prime Minister Chrtien and Fidel Castro also maintained a close relationship.ChileCuba has been since the 1960s a reference point to wing politicians in Chile. Recently relations to Cuba has been hot subject in Concertacin politics since the Democrat Party of Chile, member of the Concertacin, has supported a  harder line in the diplomatic relations with Cuba while the Party of Chile has opposed this.In 1971, despite an of American States convention that no nation in the Western Hemisphere would have a relationship with Cuba (the only exception being Mexico, which had refused to adopt that convention), Castro took a month-long visit to Chile, following the re-establishment of diplomatic relations with Cuba. The visit, in which Castro participated actively in the internal politics of the country, holding massive rallies and giving public advice to Allende, was seen by those on the political right as proof to support their view that The Chilean Way to Socialism was an effort to put Chile on the same path as Cuba.()ColombiaDuring the Cold War, Cuba gave training, money, medicines, weapons and safe haven to members of Colombian guerrilla movements, especially to the ELN and also to members of the FARC, both of which were founded in the early 1960s. In recent years, Fidel Castro has made gestures of reconciliation with different Colombian government administrations, and has been considered responsible for facilitating talks between them and the opposing guerrilla groups.Costa RicaRica broke relations with Cuba in 1961 to protest Cuban support of the left in Central America and renewed formal diplomatic ties with Fidel Castros government in March, 2009. In 1995, Costa Rica established a office in Havana. Cuba opened a consular office in Costa Rica in 2001, but relations continued to be difficult. In 2006, shortly after the death of Pinochet, Costa Rican President Arias compared Fidel Castros human rights record to that of the former Chilean president. In response, Cuban officials released a statement describing the Washington aligned Arias as a vulgar mercenary of U.S. officials, and asserting that Washington always had on hand another opportunistic clown ready to follow its aggressive plans against Cuba.(http://www.mlive.com/newsflash/international/index.ssf?/base/international-10/11672682008600.xml&storylistinternational Cuba slams Costa Rican leaders remarks. Associated Press.)()El SalvadorCuba and Salvador resumed diplomatic relations on June 1, 2009. El Salvador previously suspended diplomatic relations with Cuba 50 years ago due to the Cuban Revolution.(El Salvador and Cuba reestablish diplomatic ties) Diplomatic ties were resumed after El Salvadors new president Funes, who had pledged to reestablish them, was sworn into office. El Salvador is also the very last Latin American nation to resume diplomatic relations with Cuba.MexicoCuba had held good relations with Mexico since the Revolution. Also, when Cuba was expelled from the of American States, Mexico did not support this resolution and abstained. Relations were stable from 1934 to 1998.Although the relationship between Cuba and Mexico remains strained, each side appears to make attempts to improve it. In 1998, Fidel Castro apologized for remarks he made about Mickey Mouse which led Mexico to recall its ambassador from Havana. He said he intended no offense when he said earlier that Mexican children would find it easier to name Disney characters than to recount key figures in Mexican history. Rather, he said, his words were meant to underscore the cultural dominance of the US.() Mexican president Fox apologized to Fidel Castro in 2002 over statements by Castro, who had taped their telephone conversation, to the effect that Fox forced him to leave a United Nations summit in Mexico so that he would not be in the presence of President Bush, who also attended.()NicaraguaCuba developed close relations with the 1979 Sandinista government in Nicaragua (having supported the Sandinista insurgency against Anastasio Somozas rule). Cuba proved to be the organizations chief international ally in the civil war against the U.S.-backed Contras. Cuba transported weapons to Panama. From Panama, the Cuban weapons would be taken through Costa Rica to Nicaragua. Cuba continues to have close relations with the National Liberation Front, since being re-elected in 2006 for the first time since 1984, they are again the governing party of Nicaragua.PanamaCuba and Panama have restored diplomatic ties after breaking them off in 2004 when Panamas former president pardoned four Cuban exiles accused of attempting to assassinate Cuban President Fidel Castro. The foreign minister of each country re-established official diplomatic relations in Havana by signing a document describing a spirit of fraternity that has long linked both nations.() Cuba, once shunned by many of its Latin American neighbours, now has full diplomatic relations with all but Costa Rica and El Salvador.( However, in March 2009, both governments of Costa Rica and El Salvador announced that they plan on re-establishing full diplomatic relations with Cuba.()VenezuelaRelations between Cuba and Venezuela have significantly improved during the of Hugo Chvez. Chvez has formed a major alliance with Cuban president Fidel Castro and significant trade relationship with Cuba since his election in 1999.The warm relationship between the two countries continued to intensify.()   Hugo Chvez has described Castro as his mentor() and has called Cuba a revolutionary democracy.()Venezuelan president Hugo Chvez is a close ally of Fidel Castro, and has described the Fidel CastroHugo ChvezMorales relationship as an of good. Chvezs formulation is a play on the of evil phrase used by President Bush when describing governments such as those of Iraq, Iran, and Korea in his 2002 State of the Union Address. The Republic of Venezuela has agreed to barter Venezuelan oil, in exchange for Cuban medical assistance.On December 15, 2004, an agreement called the ALBA (Alternative for the Americas) was signed to eliminate tariffs and import duties and promote investment as well as technical and educational cooperation between the two countries. Venezuela and Cuba have been close trading partners since a cooperative agreement was signed between them on October 30, 2000. The new agreement meant that Cuban goods and services were to be paid for with Venezuela products and currency. Venezuela will transfer technology, finance development projects in the agriculture, service, energy and infrastructures sectors. Cuba, in addition to providing over 15,000 medical professionals who participate in Adentro, a social program which provides Cuban healthcare treatment to Venezuelans and trains doctors and specialists, will grant 2,000 annual scholarships to Venezuelan students. Also, the agreement commits the two countries to work together with other Latin American countries to fight illiteracy.(Venezuela and Cuba Sign New Cooperation Agreements)In 2005 the two countries also signed cooperation agreements in the area of energy and electricity, an accord between Venezuelas oil company PDVSA and its Cuban counterpart Cupet to buy and sell crude oil and a crude oil storage agreement between the two companies.(Cuba and Venezuela sign millionaire bilateral trade agreement)Hugo Chvez, who says he is one of the few people in the world who knows Castros illness from July 31, 2006, has helped Cuba undermine a strict U.S. embargo by sending cheap oil and boosting commercial relations. Agreements between Cuba and Venezuela, the worlds No. 5 oil exporter, have brought more than 20,000 Cuban doctors to Venezuela to provide medical services for the poor. The program, one of numerous oil-funded social projects, has helped Chvez build a strong political support base and he was widely expected to win a reelection bid in December 2006.() Chvez was able to win that election.A White House point man on plans for a post-Castro transition, Caleb McCarry, recently told The Miami Herald that U.S. estimates of total Venezuelan subsidies to Cuba per year are up to the $2 billion figure. This is comparable to the $4 billion to $6 billion that the Soviet Union once pumped into Cuba per year.(http://www.miami.com/mld/miamiherald/news/world/cuba/15395148.htm)United StatesSince the revolution of 1959 relations deteriorated substantially and have subsequently been marked by tension and confrontations. The United States does not have formal diplomatic relations with Cuba and has maintained an embargo which makes it illegal for U.S. corporations to do business with Cuba. This includes travel restrictions. These measures were further strengthened by the implementation by the U.S. of the Act of 1996 which attempted to punish any foreign companies operating in Cuba, especially those using expropriated US assets. US diplomatic representation in Cuba is handled by the States Interests Section in Havana, and a similar Cuban Interests Section remains in Washington. Both are officially part of the respective embassies of Switzerland.AfricaImage:FidelCastro645.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Fidel Castro with South African president Mbeki (to Castros left)On a visit to South Africa, Fidel Castro was warmly received by President Mandela.() President Mandela gave Castro South Africas highest civilian award for foreigners, the Order of Good Hope.() In 2005 Castro fulfilled his promise of sending 100 medical aid workers to Botswana, according to the Botswana presidency. According to Vallejera, Cubas first-ever Ambassador to Botswana, the health workers are part of her countrys ongoing commitment to proactively assist in the global war against HIV/AIDS.() Cuba also has historically good ties with a number of other African countries, including Angola, Guinea-Bissau, Mozambique, Namibia and Algeria.AngolaAngola-Cuba diplomatic relations are, for Angola, second only to relations with the United States. During civil war, Cuban forces fought to install a Marxist-Leninist MPLA-PT government;  against Western-backed UNITA and FLNA guerrillas and an invading army of the African apartheid state. For the time being South African forces were repelled though the UNITA insurgency continued; eventually Cuban forces withdrew from the country, especially as Cuba faced tremendous economic difficulties as a result of the Soviet Unions collapse. The outcome of Cuban withdrawal and the peace accords resulted in the MPLA changing from a Marxist-Leninist party to a Multi-Party Democratic system based on market principles (the MPLA also dropped the PT extension to their name as a clear sign of dropping their Communist aspirations).  From an economic stand point, Cuba has lost its preferred status among Angolans and South Africa has become the biggest single investor and trading partner with Angola (outside of oil sales).Namibia Cuban-Namibian relations began during the War of Independence when Cuba politically, militarily and diplomatically supported the Namibian rebel organization and future ruling party, West Africa Peoples Organization (SWAPO) against the military of Apartheid South Africa.(Cuba-Namibia Joint Commission Meeting Kicks off in Havana, Radio Habana, Cuba, 5 July 2005) Since independence, Namibia and Cuba have held joint meetings every two years for Economic, Scientific-Technical and Commercial Cooperation. In 2005, it was reported that 1,460 Cuban professionals had worked in Namibia, including 208 in 2005.(EuropeEuropean UnionUnion (EU) relations with Cuba are governed by the Common Position, as approved by the Council of Ministers in 1996, which is updated every six months following regular evaluations. According to the Common Position the objective of the European Union in its relations with Cuba is to encourage a process of transition to a pluralist democracy and respect for human rights and fundamental freedoms, as well as sustainable recovery and improvement in the living standards of the Cuban people. Cuba rejects the Common Position as interference in its internal affairs. There is an EU Delegation in Havana that works under the responsibility of the EC Delegation in Domingo, Republic.Cuba benefits from the GPS (Generalized Preference System) preferential treatment for its exports. Furthermore, Cuba does not benefit from the ACP-EU Sugar Protocol but from a sugar quota granted by the EU (some 59,000 tonnes per year; duty paid on this quota is EUR 98/t).(http://ec.europa.eu/comm/development/body/country/country_home_en.cfm?cidcu&statusnew)GreeceAlthough Greece is a member of the European Union, it has better relations with Cuba than other member states.* Cuba has an embassy in Athens.* Greece has an embassy in Havana.OceaniaCuba has  two embassies in Oceania, located in Wellington (opened in November 2007())and also one in Canberra opened October 24 2008. It also has a General in Sydney.(General Consulate of The Republic of Cuba in Australia) However, Cuba has official diplomatic relations with Nauru since 2002(Cuba News) and the Islands since 2003,(solomonstarnews.com) and maintains relations with other Pacific countries by providing aid.In 2008, Cuba will reportedly be sending doctors to the Solomon Islands, Vanuatu, Tuvalu, Nauru and Papua New Guinea,(Cuban Physicians to Aid 81 Nations, Latina, March 29, 2008) while seventeen medical students from Vanuatu will study in Cuba.() It may also provide training for Fiji doctors. Indeed, Fijis ambassador to the United Nations, Vunibobo, has stated that his country may seek closer relations with Cuba, and in particular medical assistance, following a decline in Fijis relations with New Zealand.()AustraliaAustralia and Cuba have a growing relationship on positive terms. Relations began in 1989. Relations were given a rebirth in 2009 when the foreign minister Stephen Smith visited Cuba. In 2010 the foreign minister of Cuba Bruno Rodriguez visited Australia. The ministers signed a memorandum of understanding in political cooperation between the foreign ministries and for closer bilateral relations. There is a Cuban embassy in Australia. It was opened on the 24th October 2008.KiribatiRelations are recent, having developed in the 2000s. Like other countries in Oceania, Kiribati is a beneficiary of Cuban medical aid; bilateral relations between Tarawa and Havana must be viewed within the scope of Cubas regional policy in Oceania.There are currently sixteen doctors providing specialised medical care in Kiribati, with sixteen more scheduled to join them.(Pacific Magazine: Six More Cuban Physicians To Serve In Kiribati) Cubans have also offered training to I-Kiribati doctors.() Cuban doctors have reportedly provided a dramatic improvement to the field of medical care in Kiribati, reducing the child mortality rate in that country by 80%,() and winning the proverbial hearts and minds in the Pacific. In response, the Islands began recruiting Cuban doctors in July 2007, while New Guinea and Fiji considered following suit.(NauruIn June 2007, Nauru adopted the Cuban literacy method, reportedly used also in several other countries.(Cuban Literacy Method to Pacific Isle - Prensa Latina) In October 2007, Nauruan Foreign Minister and Trade Minister Adeang travelled to Cuba to strengthen relations between the two island nations.(Cuba, Nauru to Strengthen Links - Prensa Latina) This led to the creation of a Cuba-Nauru Joint Intergovernmental Commission for Economic Cooperation.(Economy) An unspecified number of Cuban doctors are serving in Nauru.New ZealandRegarding relations with New Zealand, Cuban ambassador Jose Luis Robaina Garcia said his country had admiration for New Zealands independent foreign policy.(Solomon IslandsRelations between the Solomon Islands and Cuba have only a short history. The two countries moved to establish relations from the 2000s, and particularly from 2007, within the context of Cubas growing interest in the Islands region. Like other countries in Oceania, Solomon Islands is a beneficiary of Cuban medical aid; bilateral relations between Havana and Honiara must be viewed within the scope of Cubas regional policy in Oceania.In April 2007, the Star reported that the Islands High Commissioner to the United Nations was soon to be sworn in as Ambassador to Cuba.(solomonstarnews.com) In September 2007, it was announced that 40 Cuban doctors would be sent to the Solomon Islands.(http://www.radioaustralia.net.au/news/stories/s2030359.htm) The Solomons Minister of Foreign Affairs Oti said that Solomon Islander doctors would learn from their Cuban colleagues in specialized areas.(solomonstarnews.com) In addition to providing doctors, Cuba provided scholarships for 50 Solomon Islanders to study medicine in Cuba for free.(()TuvaluRelations between Tuvalu and Cuba are recent, having developed in the 2000s. Like other countries in Oceania, Tuvalu is a beneficiary of Cuban medical aid; bilateral relations between Funafuti and Havana must be viewed within the scope of Cubas regional policy in Oceania.VanuatuRelations between the Republic of Vanuatu and Cuba began shortly after the former gained its independence from France and the United Kingdom in 1980, and began establishing its own foreign policy as a newly independent state. Vanuatu and Cuba established official diplomatic relations in 1983.()AsiaIranIran has a productive trade balance with Cuba. The two governments signed a document to bolster cooperation in Havana in January 2006.() President Ahmadinejad called relations firm and progressive over the past three decades.(President urges Tehran-Havana cooperation in NAM - Irna)IraqCuba consistently supported Iraq at the UN against sanctions and threats made by the United States.() The thirteen year against Iraq prevented much trade between Havana and Baghdad. Iraq has an embassy in Havana. Cuba has an embassy in Baghdad(Embassy of Cuba in Iraq) Both countries are full members of the of 77.Kazakhstan* Cuba has an embassy in Astana.* Kazakhstan has a consulate-general in Havana.* Cuba is the only country in the Caribbean that maintains an embassy in Kazakhstan.PakistanThe relations between the two countries strengthened after Cuba provided humanitarian assistance to the victims of the Kashmir earthquake. Both nations continue to strengthen the bilateral relations especially in the fields of higher education, agriculture, industry and science and technology and have also held talks for military cooperation.In March 2008, ambassador Machin Gomez met General Majid, the Chairman of Joint Chiefs of Staff Committee (CJCSC) at Joint Staff Headquarters and discussed issues related to military cooperation. Both of them expressed positive views over the increasing relations between the two nations and were optimistic that the bilateral cooperation will expand in different fields. Majid stressed that Pakistan has formed strong defence infrastructure both in defence production and in shape of military academies to provide help and cooperation to the of Cuba. He also said that both countries should use their capacity for expanding military cooperation.Peoples Republic of ChinaAs the economy of the Soviet Union fell into a decline during the 1990s, the Republic of China has emerged as a new a key partner for Cubas foreign relations and the guardian of socialist countries around the world. Relations between Cuba and China continue to grow including deals for China to set up a possible military base in Cuba, similar to the Bejucal Base and an agreement was signed between China and Cuba for China open more factories producing local goods such as televisions. Cuba has also purchased from China a wide range of items including bicycles, rice cookers, energy-saving lightbulbs and diesel-electric locomotives with the aim of providing a boost to Cubas national infrastructure.(Cuba gets Chinas first trains exported to Latin America Caribbean Net News)South KoreaThere is no official-level diplomatic relation between Cuba and Korea. Despite this, there has been unofficial interactions in the economic level between the two countries. For instance, South Koreas Heavy Industries sent PPS mobile generators to Cuba for the countrys power grids. The picture of PPS were later incorporated into the 10 convertible peso banknote.()International organizations and groupsACS  AOSIS  CTO  ECLAC  G33  G77  IAEA  ICAO  ICRM  IFAD  ILO  IMO  Interpol  IOC  ISO  ITU  LAES  NAM  OPANAL  OPCW  PAHO  Group  UN  UNCTAD  UNESCO  UPU  WCO  WHO  WIPO  WMOOrganization of American StatesCuba was formerly excluded from participation in the of American States under a decision adopted by the Eighth Meeting of Consultation in del Este, Uruguay, on 21 January 1962. The resolution stated that as Cuba had officially identified itself as a Marxist-Leninist government, is was incompatible with the principles and objectives of the inter-American system.(http://www.cidh.oas.org/countryrep/Cuba79eng/intro.htm) This stance was frequently questioned by some member states. This situation came to an end on 3 June 2009, when foreign ministers assembled in Pedro Sula, Honduras, for the OASs 39th General Assembly, passed a vote to lift Cubas suspension from the OAS. In its resolution (AG/RES 2438), the General Assembly decided that:#Resolution VI, ... which excluded the Government of Cuba from its participation in the Inter-American system, hereby ceases to have effect#The participation of the Republic of Cuba in the OAS will be the result of a process of dialogue initiated at the request of the Government of Cuba, and in accordance with the practices, purposes, and principles of the OAS.The reincorporation of Cuba as an active member had arisen regularly as a topic within the inter-American system (e.g., it was intimated by the outgoing ambassador of Mexico in 1998)(OAS: Mexico Calls for Cubas Reinstatement into the OAS) but most observers did not see it as a serious possibility while the Socialist government remained in power. On 6 May 2005, President Fidel Castro reiterated that the island nation would not be part of a disgraceful institution that has only humiliated the honor of Latin American nations.(Fidel Castro: OAS Is an Instrument of the US - Prensa Latina)In an editorial published by Granma, Fidel Castro applauded the Assemblys rebellious move and said that the date would be recalled by future generations.() However, a Declaration of the Revolutionary Government dated 8 June 2009 stated that while Cuba welcomed the Assemblys gesture, in light of the Organizations historical record  Cuba will not return to the OAS.()Cuba joined the American Integration Association becoming the tenth member (out of 12) on 26 August 1999. The organization was set up in 1980 to encourage trade integration association. Its main objective is the establishment of a common market, in pursuit of the economic and social development of the region.On September 15, 2006, Cuba officially took over leadership of the Movement during the 14th summit of the organization in Havana.(ABC News: ABC News)Cuban intervention abroad: 1959 - Early 1990sAided by a massive buildup of Soviet advisors, military personnel, and advanced weaponry during the Cold War, Cuba became a staunch ally of the USSR during Castros rule, modeling its political structure after that of the CPSU. Due to this huge amount of support, Cuba became a major sponsor of Marxist wars of national liberation not only in Latin America, but worldwide.Black PanthersIn the 60s and 70s, Cuba openly supported the black nationalist and Marxist-oriented Panther Party of the U.S. Many members found their way into Cuba for political asylum, where Cuba welcomed them after they had been convicted of crimes in the U.S.PalestiniansCuba has also lent support to Palestinian nationalist groups against Israel. Fidel Castro claims Israel practices Zionist Fascism. Cuba has also lent support to the prominent Liberation Organization (PLO) and the lesser-known Marxist-Leninist Front for the Liberation of Palestine (PFLP) both received training from Cubas General Intelligence Directorate, as well as financial and diplomatic support from the Cuban government.In 2010, Castro indicated that he strongly supported Israels right to exist. http://www.google.com/hostednews/afp/article/ALeqM5gTESm0GlM9yQizdmGzrIOoEGdq0wIrish RepublicansThe Republican political party, Fin is also known to have close political links to the Cuban government. In the past Fidel Castro has expressed support for the Irish Republican cause of a Ireland. The Cuban government supported and still supports the Republican cause, but opposed the attacks which took place on civilian targets by Sinn Fins military ally, the Irish Republican Army and of course attacks on civilians by their loyalist enemies such as the Ulster Volunteer Force and Defence Association.Humanitarian aidSince the establishment of the Revolutionary Government of Cuba in 1959, the country has sent more than 52,000 medical workers abroad to work in needy countries, including countries affected by the Indian Ocean earthquake and the Kashmir earthquake.(http://www.irna.ir/en/news/view/menu-236/0607178261185837.htm) There are currently about 20,000 Cuban doctors working in 68 countries across three continents, including a 135-strong medical team in Java, Indonesia.()Read more about Cubas medical collaboration in Africa at:*White Coats by the Gambia RiverCuba provides Medical Aid to Children Affected by Chernobyl Nuclear Accident:*The children of Chernobyl in My MemoryUS Accusations of supporting terrorismThe list of state sponsors of international terrorism includes Cuba. According to the US, the Cuban Government has taken no action against al-Qaida or other terrorist groups. The Government of Cuba maintains close relationships with Iran and North Korea, and has provided safe haven to members of ETA after an agreement with the Spanish government (under Gonzlez),(Conferencia de Prensa ofrecida por Prez Roque, Ministro de Relaciones Exteriores de Cuba. Centro de Convenciones Atlapa de la Ciudad de Panam. 7 November 2000.) FARC, and the ELN. U.S. fugitives from justice and ETA members are living legally in Cuba. The States Department of State has no information on their activities on Cuban territory.(Country Reports on Terrorism: Released by the Office of the Coordinator for Counterterrorism (April 28, 2006): The Government of Cuba maintains close relationships with other state sponsors of terrorism such as Iran and Korea, and has provided safe haven to members of ETA, FARC, and the ELN. There is no information concerning activities of these or other organizations on Cuban territory.  Press reports indicate that fugitives from US justice and ETA members are living legally in Cuba, just like fugitives from Cuban justice live legally in the US.  The United States says it is not aware of specific terrorist enclaves in the country.) Cuba refuses to extradite U.S. fugitives by stating that approval would be contingent upon the U.S. returning wanted Cuban criminals and that it will no longer provide safe haven to new U.S. fugitives who may enter Cuba.(List of Foreign Ministers of CubaSee also*rights in Cuba*in Cuba*Directorate*Wars*of diplomatic missions in Cuba*of diplomatic missions of CubaExternal links*Cuban Ministry of Foreign Affairs*Cuban Mission to the United Nations*Text of U.S.- Cuban agreement on military bases*Fidel Castros Reflection on U.S. Travel Restrictions Miami Herald, April 14, 2009Representations of other countries in Cuba*British Embassy in Havana*Embassy of India in Havana*The Canadian Embassy in Cuba*U.S. Interests Section in HavanaCuban represntations to other countries*Cuban Embassy in LebanonAspects of Cubas foreign policy*Cubas health diplomacy, Broadcasting Corporation, February 25, 2010.Referencesinternacionais de Cuba
5598
Economy_of_Cyprus
spelling         Economic affairs in Cyprus are dominated by the division of the country into the southern area, controlled by the internationally recognized government of the Republic of Cyprus, and Turkish-occupied Cyprus.Classified by the Bank as a high-income economy,() Cyprus was included by the Monetary Fund in its list of advanced economies in 2001.() Erratic growth rates in the 1990s reflected the economys vulnerability to swings in tourist arrivals, caused by political instability on the island and fluctuations in economic conditions in Western Europe. On 1 January 2008, the country entered the eurozone and adopted the euro as its official currency, replacing the pound at an irrevocable fixed exchange rate of CYP 0.585274 per EUR 1.00.Economy in the government-controlled areaFile:Nicosia makariou avenue.jpg|thumb|left|Nicosia, the capital and economic heart of Cyprus.Cyprus has an open, free-market, service-based economy with some light manufacturing. Internationally, Cyprus promotes its geographical location as a bridge between East and West, along with its educated English-speaking population, moderate local costs, good airline connections, and telecommunications.Since gaining independence from the United Kingdom in 1960, Cyprus has had a record of successful economic performance, reflected in strong growth, full employment conditions and relative stability. The underdeveloped agrarian economy inherited from colonial rule has been transformed into a modern economy, with dynamic services, industrial and agricultural sectors and an advanced physical and social infrastructure. The Cypriots are among the most prosperous people in the Mediterranean region, with GDP per capita reaching $30,000.( Their of living is reflected in the countrys very high Development Index,() and Cyprus is ranked 23rd in the world in terms of the index.() However, after more than three decades of unbroken growth, the Cypriot economy contracted in 2009.() This reflected the exposure of Cyprus to the global recession and sovereign debt crisis. In recent times, concerns have been raised about the state of public finances and spiralling borrowing costs. Furthermore, Cyprus was dealt a severe blow by the Florakis Naval Base explosion in July 2011, with the cost to the economy estimated at 13 billion, or up to 17% of GDP.(The economic achievements of Cyprus during the preceding decades have been significant, bearing in mind the severe economic and social dislocation created by the Turkish invasion of 1974 and the continuing occupation of the northern part of the island by Turkey. The Turkish invasion inflicted a serious blow to the Cyprus economy and in particular to agriculture, tourism, mining and quarrying: 70 percent of the islands wealth-producing resources were lost, the tourist industry lost 65 percent of its hotels and tourist accommodation, the industrial sector lost 46 percent, and mining and quarrying lost 56 percent of production. The loss of the port of Famagusta, which handled 83 percent of the general cargo, and the closure of Nicosia International Airport, in the buffer zone, were additional setbacks.The success of Cyprus in the economic sphere has been attributed, inter alia, to the adoption of a market-oriented economic system, the pursuance of sound macroeconomic policies by the government as well as the existence of a dynamic and flexible entrepreneurship and a highly educated labor force. Moreover, the economy benefited from the close cooperation between the public and private sectors.In the past 30 years, the economy has shifted from agriculture to light manufacturing and services. The services sector, including tourism, contributes almost 80% to GDP and employs more than 70% of the labor force. Industry and construction account for approximately one-fifth of GDP and labor, while agriculture is responsible for 2.1% of GDP and 8.5% of the labor force. Potatoes and citrus are the principal export crops.File:Cranes Limassol Harbour 20110703.jpg|thumb|Port of Limassol, the busiest in Cyprus.After robust growth rates in the 1980s (average annual growth was 6.1%), economic performance in the 1990s was mixed: real GDP growth was 9.7% in 1992, 1.7% in 1993, 6.0% in 1994, 6.0% in 1995, 1.9% in 1996 and 2.3% in 1997. This pattern underlined the economys vulnerability to swings in tourist arrivals (i.e., to economic and political conditions in Cyprus, Western Europe, and the Middle East) and the need to diversify the economy. Declining competitiveness in tourism and especially in manufacturing are expected to act as a drag on growth until structural changes are effected. Overvaluation of the Cypriot pound prior to the adoption of the euro in 2008 had kept inflation in check.Trade is vital to the Cypriot economythe island is not self-sufficient in food and has few natural resourcesand the trade deficit continues to grow. Cyprus must import fuels, most raw materials, heavy machinery, and transportation equipment. More than 50% of its trade is with the rest of the European Union, especially Greece and the United Kingdom, while the Middle East receives 20% of exports. In 1991, Cyprus introduced a Added Tax (VAT), which is currently 15% in line with the EU minimum. Cyprus ratified the new world trade agreement (Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, GATT) in 1995 and began implementing it fully on 1 January 1996.File:Cyprusgrapefarm.jpg|thumb|A vineyard in the Mountains. The agricultural sector continues to employ a significant proportion of the labor force.EU accession negotiations started on 31 March 1998, and concluded when Cyprus joined the organization as a full member in 2004. File:Bank of Cyprus new and huge offices in Aglandjia suberb of Nicosia Republic of Cyprus.jpg|thumb|of Cyprus offices in Aglandjia suberb of NicosiaCyprus has the fourth-largest ship registry in the world, with 2,758 ships and 25.5 million gross registered tons (GRTs). It is an open registry and includes ships from more than 43 countries, including Greece, Germany, and Russia.Investment climateIn February 1997, the government revised its policy on foreign direct investment, permitting 100% foreign ownership in certain cases. Regulations on foreign portfolio investment in the Cyprus Stock Exchange have also been liberalized. Additionally, Cyprus passed a modern banking law in July 1997, incorporating all the provisions and directives of the EU for the prudential supervision of credit institutions.Cyprus has concluded treaties on double taxation with 26 countries, and has removed exchange restrictions on current international transactions. Non-residents and foreign investors may freely repatriate proceeds from investments in Cyprus.view with central bank of Cyprus in the back.jpg|thumb|Central Bank headquarters, Nicosia.Economy in the Turkish-occupied areaThe economy of Turkish-occupied Cyprus is about one-fifth the size of the economy of the government-controlled area, while GDP per capita is around one-third. Because the de facto administration is recognized only by Turkey, it has had much difficulty arranging foreign financing, and foreign firms have hesitated to invest there. The economy mainly revolves around the agricultural sector and government service, which together employ about half of the work force. The tourism sector also contributes substantially into the economy. Moreover, the small economy has seen some downfalls because the lira is tender. To compensate for the economys weakness, Turkey has been known to provide significant financial aid. In both parts of the island, water shortage is a growing problem, and several desalination plants are planned.The economic disparity between the two communities is pronounced. Although the economy operates on a free-market basis, the lack of private and government investment, shortages of skilled labor and experienced managers, and inflation and the devaluation of the Turkish lira continue to plague the economy.Turkey is by far the main trading partner of the Turkish-occupied area, supplying 55% of imports and absorbing 48% of exports. In a landmark case, the Court of Justice (ECJ) ruled on 5 July 1994 against the British practice of importing produce from northern Cyprus based on certificates of origin and phytosanitary certificates granted by the de facto authorities. The ECJ decided that only goods bearing certificates of origin from the internationally recognized Republic of Cyprus could be imported by EU member states. The decision resulted in a considerable decrease of Turkish Cypriot exports to the EU: from $36.4 million (or 66.7% of total Turkish Cypriot exports) in 1993 to $24.7 million in 1996 (or 35% of total exports) in 1996. Even so, the EU continues to be the second-largest trading partner of northern Cyprus, with a 24.7% share of total imports and 35% share of total exports.Assistance from Turkey is the mainstay of the Turkish Cypriot economy. Under the latest economic protocol (signed 3 January 1997), Turkey has undertaken to provide loans totalling $250 million for the purpose of implementing projects included in the protocol related to public finance, tourism, banking, and privatization. Fluctuation in the Turkish lira, which suffered from hyperinflation every year until its replacement by the new lira in 2005, exerted downward pressure on the Turkish Cypriot standard of living for many years.The de facto authorities have instituted a free market in foreign exchange and permit residents to hold foreign-currency denominated bank accounts. This encourages transfers from Turkish Cypriots living abroad.See also*pound*of Europe*of Ministers of Finance of the Republic of CyprusReferences*External links* de XipreZyperns de Chiprede Chyprede Chipredi ChiproCyprusde Chipredo Chipre
5626
Cognitive_science
File:Cognitive science heptagram.svg|300px|thumb|Figure illustrating the fields that contributed to the birth of cognitive science, including linguistics, education, neuroscience, Intelligence, philosophy, anthropology, and psychology. Adapted from Miller, George A (2003). The cognitive revolution: a historical perspective. TRENDS in Cognitive Sciences 7. Cognitive science is the interdisciplinary scientific study of mind and its processes.  It examines what cognition is, what it does and how it works. It includes research on how information is processed (in faculties such as perception, language, memory, reasoning, and emotion), represented, and transformed in behaviour, (human or other animal) nervous system or machine (e.g., computer). Cognitive science consists of multiple research disciplines, including psychology, intelligence, philosophy, neuroscience, linguistics, anthropology, sociology, and education.(Thagard, Paul, Cognitive Science, The Stanford Encyclopedia of Philosophy (Fall 2008 Edition), Edward N. Zalta (ed.).) It spans many levels of analysis, from low-level learning and decision mechanisms to high-level logic and planning; from neural circuitry to modular brain organization. The term cognitive science was coined by Christopher Longuet-Higgins in his 1973 commentary on the report, which concerned the then-current state of Intelligence research.(Longuet-Higgins, H. C. (1973). Comments on the Lighthill Report and the Sutherland Reply, in Artificial Intelligence: a paper symposium, Science Research Council, 35-37) In the same decade, the journal Cognitive Science and the Science Society were founded.(Cognitive Science Society) In 1982, College became the first institution in the world to grant an undergraduate degree in Cognitive Science.( http://cogsci.vassar.edu/about/index.html )HistoryCognitive science has a pre-history traceable back to ancient Greek philosophical texts (see Platos Meno); and certainly must include writers such as Descartes, Hume, Kant, de Spinoza, Malebranche, Cabanis, Leibniz and Locke.  But, although these early writers contributed greatly to the philosophical discovery of mind and this would ultimately lead to the development of psychology, they were working with an entirely different set of tools and core concepts than those of the cognitive scientist.The modern culture of cognitive science can be traced back to the early cyberneticists in the 1930s and 1940s, such as McCulloch and Pitts, who sought to understand the organizing principles of the mind. McCulloch and Pitts developed the first variants of what are now known as neural networks, models of computation inspired by the structure of neural networks.Another precursor was the early development of the of computation and the computer in the 1940s and 1950s. Turing and von Neumann were instrumental in these developments. The modern computer, or Neumann machine, would play a central role in cognitive science, both as a metaphor for the mind, and as a tool for investigation.In 1959, Chomsky published a scathing review of F. Skinners book Behavior. At the time, Skinners behaviorist paradigm dominated psychology: Most psychologists focused on functional relations between stimulus and response, without positing internal representations. Chomsky argued that in order to explain language, we needed a theory like grammar, which not only attributed internal representations but characterized their underlying order.In the 1970s and early 1980s, much cognitive science research focused on the possibility of intelligence. Researchers such as Minsky would write computer programs in languages such as LISP to attempt to formally characterize the steps that human beings went through, for instance, in making decisions and solving problems, in the hope of better understanding human thought, and also in the hope of creating artificial minds. This approach is known as symbolic AI.Eventually the limits of the symbolic AI research program became apparent. For instance, it seemed to be unrealistic to comprehensively list human knowledge in a form usable by a symbolic computer program. The late 80s and 90s saw the rise of networks and connectionism as a research paradigm. Under this point of view, often attributed to James McClelland and Rumelhart, the mind could be characterized as a set of complex associations, represented as a layered network.  Critics argue that there are some phenomena which are better captured by symbolic models, and that connectionist models are often so complex as to have little explanatory power. Recently symbolic and connectionist models have been combined, making it possible to take advantage of both forms of explanation.(S. dAvila Garcez, Luis C. Lamb and Dov M. Gabbay. Neural-Symbolic Cognitive Reasoning. Cognitive Technologies. Springer, 2008, ISBN 978-3-540-73245-7, 2008.)PrinciplesLevels of analysisA central tenet of cognitive science is that a complete understanding of the mind/brain cannot be attained by studying only a single level. An example would be the problem of remembering a phone number and recalling it later. One approach to understanding this process would be to study behavior through direct observation. A person could be presented with a phone number, asked to recall it after some delay. Then the accuracy of the response could be measured. Another approach would be to study the firings of individual neurons while a person is trying to remember the phone number. Neither of these experiments on their own would fully explain how the process of remembering a phone number works. Even if the technology to map out every neuron in the brain in real-time were available, and it were known when each neuron was firing, it would still be impossible to know how a particular firing of neurons translates into the observed behavior. Thus an understanding of how these two levels relate to each other is needed. This can be provided by a functional level account of the process. Studying a particular phenomenon from multiple levels creates a better understanding of the processes that occur in the brain to give rise to a particular behavior.Marr(Marr, D. (1982). Vision: A Computational Investigation into the Human Representation and Processing of Visual Information. W. H. Freeman.) gave a famous description of three levels of analysis:# the computational theory, specifying the goals of the computation;# representation and algorithm, giving a representation of the input and output and the algorithm which transforms one into the other; and# the hardware implementation, how algorithm and representation may be physically realized.(See also the entry on functionalism.)Interdisciplinary natureCognitive science is an interdisciplinary field with contributors from various fields, including psychology, neuroscience, linguistics, of mind, science, anthropology, sociology, and biology.  Cognitive science tends to view the world outside the mind much as other sciences do. Thus it too has an objective, observer-independent existence. The field is usually seen as compatible with the physical sciences, and uses the method as well as simulation or modeling, often comparing the output of models with aspects of human behavior. Some doubt whether there is a unified cognitive science and prefer to speak of the cognitive sciences in plural.(Miller, G. A. (2003). The cognitive revolution: a historical perspective. Trends in Cognitive Sciences, 7, 141-144.)Many, but not all, who consider themselves cognitive scientists have a functionalist view of the mind&mdash;the view that mental states are classified functionally, such that any system that performs the proper function for some mental state is considered to be in that mental state.  According to some versions of functionalism, even non-human systems, such as other animal species, alien life forms, or advanced computers can, in principle, have mental states.Cognitive science: the termThe term cognitive in cognitive science is used for any kind of mental operation or structure that can be studied in precise terms (Lakoff and Johnson, 1999). This conceptualization is very broad, and should not be confused with how cognitive is used in some traditions of philosophy, where cognitive has to do only with formal rules and truth conditional semantics.The earliest entries for the word cognitive in the OED take it to mean roughly pertaining to the action or process of knowing. The first entry, from 1586, shows the word was at one time used in the context of discussions of Platonic theories of knowledge. Most in cognitive science, however, presumably do not believe their field is the study of anything as certain as the knowledge sought by Plato.ScopeCognitive science is a large field, and covers a wide array of topics on cognition. However, it should be recognized that cognitive science is not equally concerned with every topic that might bear on the nature and operation of the mind or intelligence. Social and cultural factors, emotion, consciousness, cognition, comparative and evolutionary approaches are frequently de-emphasized or excluded outright, often based on key philosophical conflicts. Another important mind-related subject that the cognitive sciences tend to avoid is the existence of qualia, with discussions over this issue being sometimes limited to only mentioning qualia as a philosophically-open matter. Some within the cognitive science community, however, consider these to be vital topics, and advocate the importance of investigating them.(A number of authors consider the qualia problem to be part of the cognitive science field, e.g. Some philosophical issues in cognitive science: qualia, intentionality, and the mind-body problem, Qualia: The Hard Problem, and indeed the entire discipline of philosophy as being part of the cog sci field, e.g. What is Cognitive Science?, while other reputable sources that cover both qualia and cog sci do not draw any obvious connection between them, e.g. the Stanford encyclopedia of philosophy (Jan 2008 online edition) does have full-size articles on both qualia and cog sci, but qualia are not even mentioned in the cog sci article while cog sci is not mentioned in the qualia article.)Below are some of the main topics that cognitive science is concerned with. This is not an exhaustive list, but is meant to cover the wide range of intelligent behaviors. See of cognitive science topics for a list of various aspects of the field.Artificial intelligence... One major contribution of AI and cognitive science to psychology has been the information processing model of human thinking in which the metaphor of brain-as-computer is taken quite literally.. AAAI Web pages.Artificial intelligence (AI) involves the study of cognitive phenomena in machines. One of the practical goals of AI is to implement aspects of human intelligence in computers. Computers are also widely used as a tool with which to study cognitive phenomena. Computational modeling uses simulations to study how human intelligence may be structured.(Sun, Ron (ed.) (2008). The Cambridge Handbook of Computational Psychology. Cambridge University Press, New York.) (See the section on computational modeling in the Research Methods section.)There is some debate in the field as to whether the mind is best viewed as a huge array of small but individually feeble elements (i.e. neurons), or as a collection of higher-level structures such as symbols, schemas, plans, and rules. The former view uses connectionism to study the mind, whereas the latter emphasizes symbolic computations. One way to view the issue is whether it is possible to accurately simulate a human brain on a computer without accurately simulating the neurons that make up the human brain.AttentionAttention is the selection of important information.  The human mind is bombarded with millions of stimuli and it must have a way of deciding which of this information to process.  Attention is sometimes seen as a spotlight, meaning one can only shine the light on a particular set of information.  Experiments that support this metaphor include the listening task (Cherry, 1957) and studies of blindness (Mack and Rock, 1998).  In the dichotic listening task, subjects are bombarded with two different messages, one in each ear, and told to focus on only one of the messages.  At the end of the experiment, when asked about the content of the unattended message, subjects cannot report it.Knowledge, and Processing, of Languagewell known example of a Phrase structure tree. This is one way of representing human language that shows how different components are organized hierarchically. The ability to learn and understand language is an extremely complex process. Language is acquired within the first few years of life, and all humans under normal circumstances are able to acquire language proficiently. A major driving force in the theoretical linguistic field is discovering the nature that language must have in the abstract in order to be learned in such a fashion. Some of the driving research questions in studying how the brain itself processes language include: (1) To what extent is linguistic knowledge innate or learned?, (2) Why is it more difficult for adults to acquire a second-language than it is for infants to acquire their first-language?, and (3) How are humans able to understand novel sentences?The study of language processing ranges from the investigation of the sound patterns of speech to the meaning of words and whole sentences. Linguistics often divides language processing into orthography, phonology and phonetics, morphology, syntax, semantics, and pragmatics. Many aspects of language can be studied from each of these components and from their interaction.The study of language processing in cognitive science is closely tied to the field of linguistics. Linguistics was traditionally studied as a part of the humanities, including studies of history, art and literature. In the last fifty years or so, more and more researchers have studied knowledge and use of language as a cognitive phenomenon, the main problems being how knowledge of language can be acquired and used, and what precisely it consists of. Linguists have found that, while humans form sentences in ways apparently governed by very complex systems, they are remarkably unaware of the rules that govern their own speech. Thus linguists must resort to indirect methods to determine what those rules might be, if indeed rules as such exist. In any event, if speech is indeed governed by rules, they appear to be opaque to any conscious consideration.Learning and developmentLearning and development are the processes by which we acquire knowledge and information over time. Infants are born with little or no knowledge (depending on how knowledge is defined), yet they rapidly acquire the ability to use language, walk, and recognize people and objects. Research in learning and development aims to explain the mechanisms by which these processes might take place.A major question in the study of cognitive development is the extent to which certain abilities are innate or learned. This is often framed in terms of the versus nurture debate. The nativist view emphasizes that certain features are innate to an organism and are determined by its genetic endowment. The empiricist view, on the other hand, emphasizes that certain abilities are learned from the environment. Although clearly both genetic and environmental input is needed for a child to develop normally, considerable debate remains about how genetic information might guide cognitive development. In the area of acquisition, for example, some (such as Pinker)() have argued that specific information containing universal grammatical rules must be contained in the genes, whereas others (such as Jeffrey Elman and colleagues in Innateness) have argued that Pinkers claims are biologically unrealistic. They argue that genes determine the architecture of a learning system, but that specific facts about how grammar works can only be learned as a result of experience.MemoryMemory allows us to store information for later retrieval. Memory is often thought of consisting of both a long-term and short-term store. Long-term memory allows us to store information over prolonged periods (days, weeks, years). We do not yet know the practical limit of long-term memory capacity. Short-term memory allows us to store information over short time scales (seconds or minutes).Memory is also often grouped into declarative and procedural forms. memory--grouped into subsets of semantic and episodic forms of memory--refers to our memory for facts and specific knowledge, specific meanings, and specific experiences (e.g., Who was the first president of the U.S.A.?, or What did I eat for breakfast four days ago?). memory allows us to remember actions and motor sequences (e.g. how to ride a bicycle) and is often dubbed implicit knowledge or memory .Cognitive scientists study memory just as psychologists do, but tend to focus in more on how memory bears on processes, and the interrelationship between cognition and memory. One example of this could be, what mental processes does a person go through to retrieve a long-lost memory? Or, what differentiates between the cognitive process of recognition (seeing hints of something before remembering it, or memory in context) and recall (retrieving a memory, as in fill-in-the-blank)?Perception and actionthumb|150px|The Necker cube, an example of an optical illusionPerception is the ability to take in information via the senses, and process it in some way. Vision and hearing are two dominant senses that allow us to perceive the environment. Some questions in the study of visual perception, for example, include: (1) How are we able to recognize objects?, (2) Why do we perceive a continuous visual environment, even though we only see small bits of it at any one time? One tool for studying visual perception is by looking at how people process illusions. The image on the right of a Necker cube is an example of a bistable percept, that is, the cube can be interpreted as being oriented in two different directions.The study of haptic (tactile), olfactory, and gustatory stimuli also fall into the domain of perception.Action is taken to refer to the output of a system. In humans, this is accomplished through motor responses. Spatial planning and movement, speech production, and complex motor movements are all aspects of action.Research methodsMany different methodologies are used to study cognitive science. As the field is highly interdisciplinary, research often cuts across multiple areas of study, drawing on research methods from psychology, neuroscience, science and theory.Behavioral experimentsIn order to have a description of what constitutes intelligent behavior, one must study behavior itself. This type of research is closely tied to that in psychology and psychophysics. By measuring behavioral responses to different stimuli, one can understand something about how those stimuli are processed. Lewandowski and Strohmetz (2009) review a collection of innovative uses of behavioral measurement in psychology including behavioral traces, behavioral observations, and behavioral choice.() Behavioral traces are pieces of evidence that indicate behavior occurred, but the actor is not present (e.g., litter in a parking lot or readings on an electric meter). Behavioral observations involve the direct witnessing of the actor engaging in the behavior (e.g., watching how close a person sits next to another person). Behavioral choices are when a person selects between two or more options (e.g., voting behavior, choice of a punishment for another participant). * Reaction time. The time between the presentation of a stimulus and an appropriate response can indicate differences between two cognitive processes, and can indicate some things about their nature. For example, if in a search task the reaction times vary proportionally with the number of elements, then it is evident that this cognitive process of searching involves serial instead of parallel processing.* Psychophysical responses. Psychophysical experiments are an old psychological technique, which has been adopted by cognitive psychology. They typically involve making judgments of some physical property, e.g. the loudness of a sound. Correlation of subjective scales between individuals can show cognitive or sensory biases as compared to actual physical measurements. Some examples include:** sameness judgments for colors, tones, textures, etc.** threshold differences for colors, tones, textures, etc.* tracking. This methodology is used to study a variety of cognitive processes, most notably visual perception and language processing. The fixation point of the eyes is linked to an individuals focus of attention. Thus, by monitoring eye movements, we can study what information is being processed at a given time. Eye tracking allows us to study cognitive processes on extremely short time scales. Eye movements reflect online decision making during a task, and they provide us with some insight into the ways in which those decisions may be processed.Brain imagingImage:Hypothalamus.jpg|thumb|150px||Image of the human head with the brain. The arrow indicates the position of the hypothalamus.Brain imaging involves analyzing activity within the brain while performing various cognitive tasks. This allows us to link behavior and brain function to help understand how information is processed. Different types of imaging techniques vary in their temporal (time-based) and spatial (location-based) resolution. Brain imaging is often used in neuroscience.* photon emission computed tomography and emission tomography. SPECT and PET use radioactive isotopes, which are injected into the subjects bloodstream and taken up by the brain. By observing which areas of the brain take up the radioactive isotope, we can see which areas of the brain are more active than other areas. PET has similar spatial resolution to fMRI, but it has extremely poor temporal resolution.* Electroencephalography. EEG measures the electrical fields generated by large populations of neurons in the cortex by placing a series of electrodes on the scalp of the subject. This technique has an extremely high temporal resolution, but a relatively poor spatial resolution.* magnetic resonance imaging. fMRI measures the relative amount of oxygenated blood flowing to different parts of the brain. More oxygenated blood in a particular region is assumed to correlate with an increase in neural activity in that part of the brain. This allows us to localize particular functions within different brain regions. fMRI has moderate spatial and temporal resolution.* imaging. This technique uses infrared transmitters and receivers to measure the amount of light reflectance by blood near different areas of the brain. Since oxygenated and deoxygenated blood reflects light by different amounts, we can study which areas are more active (i.e., those that have more oxygenated blood). Optical imaging has moderate temporal resolution, but poor spatial resolution. It also has the advantage that it is extremely safe and can be used to study infants brains.*Magnetoencephalography. MEG measures magnetic fields resulting from cortical activity. It is similar to EEG, except that it has improved spatial resolution since the magnetic fields it measures are not as blurred or attenuated by the scalp, meninges and so forth as the electrical activity measured in EEG is. MEG uses SQUID sensors to detect tiny magnetic fields.Computational modelingthumb|200px|A Neural network with two layers.Computational models require a mathematically and logically formal representation of a problem. Computer models are used in the simulation and experimental verification of different specific and general properties of intelligence.  Computational modeling can help us to understand the functional organization of a particular cognitive phenomenon.There are two basic approaches to cognitive modeling. The first is focused on abstract mental functions of an intelligent mind and operates using symbols, and the second, which follows the neural and associative properties of the human brain, and is called subsymbolic.* Symbolic modeling evolved from the computer science paradigms using the technologies of systems, as well as a philosophical perspective, see for example Good Old-Fashioned Artificial Intelligence (GOFAI). They are developed by the first cognitive researchers and later used in engineering for systems . Since the early 1990s it was generalized in systemics for the investigation of functional human-like intelligence models, such as personoids, and, in parallel, developed as the SOAR environment. Recently, especially in the context of cognitive decision making, symbolic cognitive modeling is extended to socio-cognitive approach including social and organization cognition interrelated with a sub-symbolic not conscious layer.* Subsymbolic modeling includes Connectionist/neural network models. Connectionism relies on the idea that the mind/brain is composed of simple nodes and that the power of the system comes primarily from the existence and manner of connections between the simple nodes. nets are textbook implementations of this approach. Some critics of this approach feel that while these models approach biological reality as a representation of how the system works, they lack explanatory powers because complicated systems of connections with even simple rules are extremely complex and often less interpretable than the system they model.Other approaches gaining in popularity include the use of systems theory and also techniques putting symbolic models and connectionist models into correspondence (Neural-symbolic integration). Bayesian models, often drawn from learning, are also gaining popularity.All the above approaches tend to be generalized to the form of integrated computational models of a synthetic/abstract intelligence, in order to be applied to the explanation and improvement of individual and social/organizational decision-making and reasoning.Neurobiological methodsResearch methods borrowed directly from neuroscience and neuropsychology can also help us to understand aspects of intelligence. These methods allow us to understand how intelligent behavior is implemented in a physical system.* recording* Direct brain stimulation* models* studiesKey findingsCognitive science has much to its credit. Among other accomplishments, it has given rise to models of human bias and risk perception, and has been influential in the development of finance, part of economics.  It has also given rise to a new theory of the of mathematics, and many theories of intelligence, persuasion and coercion. It has made its presence firmly known in the of language and epistemology - a modern revival of rationalism - as well as constituting a substantial wing of modern linguistics. Fields of cognitive science have been influential in understanding the brains particular functional systems (and functional deficits) ranging from speech production to auditory processing and visual perception. It has made progress in understanding how damage to particular areas of the brain affect cognition, and it has helped to uncover the root causes and results of specific disfunction, such as dyslexia, anopia, and neglect.CriticismIn a paper written shortly before his death, Skinner stated that cognitive science is the creation science of psychology.(B. F. Skinner, Can Psychology be a Science of Mind?, American Psychologist, November 1990, page 1209, At the APA Web Site Successfully accessed 29 December 2009)Notable researchersSome of the more recognized names in cognitive science are usually either the most controversial or the most cited. Within philosophy familiar names include Dennett who writes from a computational systems perspective, Searle known for his controversial Room, Fodor who advocates functionalism, and Hofstadter, famous for writing Escher, Bach, which questions the nature of words and thought. In the realm of linguistics, Chomsky and Lakoff have been influential (both have also become notable as political commentators). In intelligence Minsky, Simon, Newell, and Warwick are prominent. Popular names in the discipline of psychology include James McClelland and Pinker. Anthropologists Sperber, Hutchins, Atran,  Boyer and Henrich have been involved in collaborative projects with cognitive and social psychologists, political scientists and evolutionary biologists in attempts to develop general theories of culture formation, religion and political association.See also* science* science of religion* bias* linguistics* neuropsychology* neuroscience* psychology* neuroscience* theory* field theory* Dynamicism* psychology* neuroscience* Heterophenomenology* Cognome Project* Archives of Cognitive Science* (academic field)* cognitive science* cognition* Enactivism* Linguistics* of cognitive scientists* of institutions granting degrees in cognitive science* intelligence* Darwinism* network* Neuropsychology* Neuroscience* information management (PIM)* of mind* Psycholinguistics* Psychology* consciousness* cognition* of Mind theory* Pathology* Mining* Thought* CognitionReferencesFurther reading;Introductory literature* Eckardt, Barbara Von (2003): Cognitive Science: Philosophical Issues. In: Lynn Nadel (Ed.): Encyclopedia of Cognitive Science, Vol. 1, London: Nature Publishing Group, pp. 552559.* Thagard, Paul (2nd, 2005). Mind : Introduction to Cognitive Science. Cambridge, MA: The MIT Press.;General* Bechtel, W. et al. Ed. (1999). A Companion to Cognitive Science. Blackwell Companions to Philosophy. Malden, MA: Blackwell Publishers.* Gardner, Howard (1987). The Minds New Science: A History of the Cognitive Revolution. New York: Basic Books.****;Classic texts*****************;Definitions* * Cognitive Science - American Assoc. for Artificial Intelligence* aiKnow: Cognitive Artificial Intelligence* MIT CogNet;Miscellaneous* Baumgartner, P., et al. Eds. (1995). Speaking Minds: Interviews With Twenty Eminent Cognitive Scientists. Princeton, NJ: Princeton University Press.* Damasio, A. R. (1994). Descartes Error: Emotion, Reason and the Human Brain. New York: Grosset/Putnam.* Gazzaniga, M. S. Ed. (1996). Conversations in the Cognitive Neurosciences. New York: The MIT Press.* Hunt, M. (1982). The Universe Within: A New Science Explores the Human Mind. Brighton: The Harvester Press.* Lakoff, G and Johnson, M. (1999). Philosophy In The Flesh. New York: Basic Books.* Port, Robert F. and vanGelder, Tim (1995). Mind as Motion: Explorations in the Dynamics of Cognition. Cambridge, MA: The MIT Press. ISBN 0262161508 .* Sun, Ron & L. Bookman, (eds.), Computational Architectures Integrating Neural and Symbolic Processes. Kluwer Academic Publishers, Needham, MA. 1994.* Thelen, Esther and Smith, Linda B. (1996). A Dynamic Systems Approach to the Development of Cognition and Action. Cambridge, MA: The MIT Press. ISBN 026270059X .* Tsakiridis, George. Evagrius Ponticus and Cognitive Science: A Look at Moral Evil and the Thoughts. Eugene, OR: Pickwick Publications, 2010.;Publications & publishers*The Journal of Cognitive Science* Cognitive Science Journal Archive: Archive of the Cognitive Science journal, plus conference proceedings and supplemental materials*  Cognitive Systems Research* WIREs Cognitive Science - publication addressing the topic of cognitive science from a range of multi-disciplinary perspectives, combining the features of a review journal with an online reference workExternal links* Cognitive Science Society* University of California San Diego, Department of Cognitive Science* iCogSci: An online information portal of everything Cognitive Science* Cognitive Science Movie Index: A broad list of movies showcasing themes in the Cognitive Sciences* Piero Scaruffis annotated bibliography on the mind* List of leading thinkers in cognitive science* Dr. Roy Ruddles history page at the University of Leeds* Dr. Carl Stahmers history page at the University of Santa Barbara* Department of Cognitive Science at the Hebrew University of Jerusalem* Cognitive Science Center Amsterdamcognitivavdade:Kognitionswissenschaftet:TunnetusteaduscognitivacognitivesCognitiveko:znanostis:Vitsmunavsindicognitivemokslaili:Cognisieweitesjaptudomnykognitifnl:Cognitiewetenschapja:vitenskapvitskaparpl:Kognitywistykacognitivaru:sciencevedanaukafi:Kognitiotiedesv:Kognitionsvetenskapaghamth:bilimhc nhn thczh:
5648
Cornwall
 subdivs  Council (unitary) of Scilly (sui generis unitary)Cornwall ( or ;()()()()  ;  or Cornuvia) is a authority and ceremonial county of England, within the United Kingdom. It is bordered to the north and west by the Sea, a part of the Ocean,(International Hydrographic Organization) to the south by the Channel, and to the east by the county of Devon, over the Tamar. Cornwall has a population of , and covers an area of .()() The administrative centre and only city is Truro.The area now known as Cornwall was first inhabited in the Palaeolithic and Mesolithic periods. It continued to be occupied by Neolithic and then Bronze Age peoples, and later (in the Age) by Brythons with distinctive cultural relations to neighbouring Wales, Ireland and Brittany. There is little evidence that Roman rule was effective west of Exeter and few Roman remains have been found. Cornwall was a division of the Dumnonii tribewhose tribal centre was in the modern county of Devonknown as the Cornovii, separated from Wales after the of Deorham, often coming into conflict with the expanding English kingdom of Wessex before Athelstan in AD 936 set the boundary between English and Cornish at the Tamar.(Stenton, F. M. (1947) Anglo-Saxon England. Oxford: Clarendon Press; p. 337) From the early Middle Ages, British language and culture was apparently shared by Brythons trading across both sides of the Channel, evidenced by the corresponding high medieval Breton kingdoms of Domnonee and Cornouaille and the Christianity common to both territories.Historically tin mining was important in the Cornish economy, becoming significant during the Middle Ages and expanding greatly during the 19th century when rich copper mines were also in production. In the mid-nineteenth century, however, the tin and copper mines entered a period of decline. Subsequently china clay extraction became more important and metal mining had virtually ended by the 1990s. Traditionally fishing (particularly of pilchards), and agriculture (particularly of dairy products and vegetables), were the other important sectors of the economy. The railways led to the growth of tourism during the 20th century, however, Cornwalls economy struggles after the decline of the mining and fishing industries. The area is noted for its wild moorland landscapes, its extensive and varied coastline, its many place names derived from the language, and its very mild climate.Cornwall is the traditional homeland of the Cornish people and is recognised as one of the nations, retaining a distinct cultural identity that reflects its history. The geographical area of Cornwall also constitutes part of the of Cornwall.(Duchy of Cornwall Charters (Royal Charter; 16 March 1337, First Duchy of Cornwall Charter;17 March 1337, Second Duchy of Cornwall Charter; 18 March 1337))  Some people question the present status of Cornwall, and a nationalist movement seeks greater autonomy within the United Kingdom in the form of a devolved legislative assembly, and greater recognition of the Cornish people as a national minority.()ToponymyFile:Saxon England according to the Saxon Chronicle.jpg|upright|thumb|left|Cornweallas in the ChronicleThe name Cornwall comes from combining two different terms from separate languages. The Roman term for the Celtic tribe which inhabited what is now Cornwall at the time of Roman rule in Britain, Cornovii, came from a Brythonic tribal name which gave modern Cornish Kernow, also known as Corneu to the Brythons.() This could be from either of two sources; the common Celtic root cern, or the Latin cornu, both of which mean horn or peninsula, suggestive of the shape of Cornwalls landmass. There is a problem with this theory however. At least two other known Celtic tribes bore the name Cornovii, one tribe in Caithness which may also be considered a headland or horn-land, yet another, the principal tribe known to the Romans as Cornovii lived in the West Midlands and Powys areas, calling into question the derivation of the name from a peninsula (however, Celtic tribes were not necessarily permanently settled, and the Latin forms may be based on different British names).() Another theory suggests that the name of the Cornovii tribes may well be connected to totemic worship of the horned god such as the Gaulish Cernunnos, or a similar totemic cult. Nevertheless, the Cornovii were sufficiently established in the present day area recognised as Cornwall for their territory to be recorded as Cornubia by 700 AD, and remained as such into the Middle Ages. The Cosmography, of around 700, makes reference to Purocoronavis, (almost certainly a corruption of Durocornovium),  a fort or walled settlement of the Cornovii, (unidentified, but possibly Tintagel or Brea).( Revised edition Cornwall: a history, Fowey: Cornwall Editions Ltd, 2004 ISBN 1-904880-00-2 (Available online on Google Books))(N.B. another Durocornovium existed at Wanborough in Wiltshire)During the 6th and 7th centuries, the name Cornubia became corrupted by extensive changes in the English language.() The Anglo-Saxons provided the suffix wealas, meaning foreigners, creating the term Corn-wealas, Cornouaille in French  also the name of a corresponding Breton colonial territory(The Breton territory is in modern French Cornouaille and Cornwall is Cornouailles)and Cornugallia in medieval Latin. Some historians note that this was the word for Wales, however it is understood that the term applied instead to all Brythonic peoples and lands, who were considered foreign by the Anglo-Saxons. As Cornwall was known as West Wales and present-day Wales as North Wales during those times, the Wales meaning is probable.HistoryImage:Men-an-Tol.jpg|thumb|right|Mn-an-Tol.Prehistory, Roman and post-Roman periodsThe present human history of Cornwall begins with the reoccupation of Britain after the last Ice Age. According to T. Koch and others, Cornwall in the Late Bronze Age was part of a maritime trading-networked culture called the Bronze Age that also included the other nations, England, France, Spain and Portugal where languages developed with the language, which he claims was the first written language so far discovered.()()() During the Iron Age Cornwall, like all of Britain south of the of Forth, was inhabited by the Celtic people known as the Britons. The Celtic British language spoken at the time eventually developed into several distinct tongues, including Cornish.( The first account of Cornwall comes from the Sicilian Greek historian Siculus (c. 90 BC  c. 30 BC), supposedly quoting or paraphrasing the fourth-century BC geographer Pytheas, who had sailed to Britain:thumb|right|Celtic tribes of Southern BritainThe identity of these merchants is unknown. It has been theorised that they were Phoenicians, but there is no evidence for this.(Halliday, p. 52.) (For further discussion of tin mining see the section on the economy below.)There is a theory that silver was extracted from the copper ores of Cornwall in pre-Roman times, as silver is easily converted to its chloride (AgCl) by surface waters containing chlorine.(Tylecote, R. F. (1962) Metallurgy in Archaeology) After a period of Roman rule, Cornwall reverted to rule by independent Celtic chieftains.Conflict with WessexThe chronology of English dominance over Cornwall is unclear. In the 8th century Cornwall came into conflict with the expanding kingdom of Wessex. There are no recorded charters or legal agreements showing Cornwall as part of Wessex.() Furthermore, there is little economic, military, social, cultural or archaeological evidence that Wessex established control over Cornwall, although some historians, notably Swanton,(Swanton, Michael, The Anglo-Saxon Chronicles, 2nd ed. London, Phoenix Press, 2000, p. 177) and Todd(Todd, Michael (1987) The South West to AD 1000. London: Longman ISBN 0-582-49273-4) assert to the contrary.The Cambriae report that in 722 AD the Britons of Cornwall won a battle at Hehil.(Annales Cambriae) It seems likely that the enemy the Cornish fought was West Saxons, as evidenced by the naming of Ine of Wessex and his kinsman Nonna in reference to an earlier Battle of Lining in 710.(Weatherhill, Craig Cornovia; p. 10) The Anglo-Saxon Chronicle states in 815 (adjusted date) & y geare gehergade Ecgbryht cyning on West Walas from easteweardum o westewearde....and in this year king Ecgbryht raided in Cornwall from east to west. and thenceforth apparently held it as a ducatus or dukedom annexed to his regnum or kingdom of Wessex, but not wholly incorporated with it.() The Chronicles states that in 825 (adjusted date) a battle was fought involving the Welsh, presumably those of Cornwall, and the Defnas (men of Devon). It only states:- The Westwealas (Cornish) and the Defnas (men of Devon) fought at Gafulforda. However, there is no mention of who won or who lost, whether the men of Cornwall and Devon were fighting each other or on the same side, and no mention of Egbert. This is the only record of this battle. In the same year Ecgbert, as a later document phrases it, disposed of their territory as it seemed fit to him, giving a tenth part of it to God. In other words he incorporated Cornwall ecclesiastically with the West Saxon of Sherborne, and endowed Ealhstan, his fighting bishop, who took part in the campaign, with an extensive Cornish estate consisting of Callington and Lawhitton, both in the Tamar valley, and Pawton near Padstow.In 838, the Cornish and their Danish allies were defeated by Egbert at Hengestesdune (Anglo-Saxon Chronicles): an unknown location (various places have been suggested over the years from Head in Dorset and Down, Devon to Hingston Down in Cornwall). In 875, the last recorded king of Cornwall, Dumgarth, is said to have drowned.(Annales Cambriae) Around the 880s, Anglo-Saxons from Wessex had established modest land holdings in the eastern part of Cornwall; notably the Great had acquired a few estates.(Keynes, Simon; Lapidge, Michael (tr.) (1983), Alfred the Great: Assers Life of King Alfred and other contemporary sources, London, Penguin Books, p. 175; cf. ibid, p. 89) of Malmesbury, writing around 1120, says that King Athelstan of England (924939) fixed the boundary between English and Cornish people at the east bank of the River Tamar.Norman periodFile:Kernow Hundreds.png|thumb|right|The ancient of CornwallOne interpretation of the Domesday Book is that by this time the native Cornish landowning class had been almost completely dispossessed and replaced by English landowners, the largest of whom was Godwinson himself. However, this is highly questionable: the manumissions show that two leading Cornish figures nominally had Saxon names, but these were both glossed with native Cornish names. This suggests that a mixing of populations and cultural syncretism occurred, as opposed to outright replacement of the original Cornish nobility.However, soon after the Norman conquest most of the land was seized and transferred into the hands of a new Breton-Norman aristocracy, with the lions share going to Count of Mortain, half-brother of King William and the largest landholder in England after the king.(Williams, Ann & Martin, G. H. (2002) (tr.) Domesday Book: a complete translation, London: Penguin, pp. 341357) Ultimately this aristocracy eventually became a Cornu-Norman ruling class, a phenomenon closely resembling the situation in the rest of England, and later in Ireland.Later medieval administration and societySubsequently, however, Norman absentee landlords became replaced by a new Cornu-Norman elite. These families eventually became the new ruling class of Cornwall (typically speaking Norman French, Cornish, Latin and eventually English), many becoming involved in the operation of the Parliament system, Earldom and eventually the Duchy.(Payton (1998) Cornwall, pp. 100108) The language continued to be spoken and it acquired a number of characteristics establishing its identity as a separate language from Breton. Cornwall showed a very different type of settlement pattern from that of Saxon Wessex and places continued, even after 1066, to be named in the Celtic Cornish tradition with Saxon architecture being uncommon. The earliest record for any Anglo-Saxon place names west of the Tamar is around 1040: they are particularly noticeable in the north-east of the county.(Christianity in CornwallMany place names in Cornwall are associated with Christian missionaries described as coming from Ireland and Wales in the fifth century AD and usually called saints (See of Cornish saints). The historicity of some of these missionaries is problematic(Orme, Nicholas (2000) The Saints of Cornwall, see also Article on Saint Uny at http://www.lelant.info/uny.htm. The patron saint of Wendron Parish Church, Saint Wendrona is another example.) and it has been pointed out by Canon Doble that it was customary in the Middle Ages to ascribe such geographical origins to saints.(Doble, G. H. (1960) The Saints of Cornwall. 5 vols. Truro: Dean and Chapter, 196070) Some of these saints are not included in the early lists of saints.(See for example absences from Olsen and Padels A tenth century list of Cornish parochial saints in Cambridge Medieval Celtic Studies; 12 (1986); and from Legenda Angliae by Capgrave (mid-15th cent.))Piran, after whom Perranporth is named, is generally regarded as the patron saint of Cornwall.() However in early Norman times it is likely that Saint Michael the Archangel was recognised as the patron saint(Henderson, Charles (1935) Cornwall and her patron saint, In: his Essays in Cornish History. Oxford: Clarendon Press; pp. 197201) and the title has also been claimed for Petroc.(The cult of St Petroc was the most important in the of Cornwall since he was the founder of the monastery of Bodmin the most important in the diocese and, with St Germans, the seat of the bishops. He was the patron of the diocese and of Bodmin: Caroline Brett, Petroc (fl. 6th cent.), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004 accessed 16 Dec 2008)The Church in Cornwall in Celtic and Anglo-Saxon timesThe church in Cornwall until the time of Athelstan of Wessex observed more or less orthodox practices, being completely separate from the Anglo-Saxon church until then (and perhaps later). The See of Cornwall continued until much later: Bishop Conan apparently in place previously, but (re-?) consecrated in 931 AD by Athelstan. However, it is unclear whether he was the sole Bishop for Cornwall or the leading Bishop in the area. The situation in Cornwall may have been somewhat similar to Wales where each major religious house corresponded to a cantref (this has the same meaning as Cornish keverang) both being under the supervision of a Bishop.(Charles-Edwards, T. (1970) The Seven Bishop Houses of Dyfed, In: Bulletin of the Board of Celtic Studies, vol. 24, (19701972), pp. 247252.) However if this was so the status of keverangow before the time of King Athelstan is not recorded. However it can be inferred from the districts included at this period that the minimum number would be three: Triggshire; Wivelshire; and the remaining area. Penwith, Kerrier, Pydar and Powder meet at a central point (Scorrier) which some have believed indicates a fourfold division imposed by Athelstan on a sub-kingdom.Middle AgesIt is notable that in Cornwall that most of the parish churches in existence in Norman times were generally not in the larger settlements and that the medieval towns which developed thereafter usually had only a chapel of ease with the right of burial remaining at the ancient parish church.(Cornish Church Guide (1925) Truro: Blackford) Over a hundred wells exist in Cornwall, each associated with a particular saint, though not always the same one as the dedication of the church.(Jenner, Henry (1925) The Holy Wells of Cornwall. In: Cornish Church Guide. Truro: Blackford; pp. 249257)(Quiller-Couch, M. & L. (1894) Ancient and Holy Wells of Cornwall. London: Chas. J. Clark)Various kinds of religious houses existed in mediaeval Cornwall though none of them were nunneries; the benefices of the parishes were in many cases appropriated to religious houses within Cornwall or elsewhere in England or France.(Oliver, George (1846) Monasticon Dioecesis Exoniensis: being a collection of records and instruments illustrating the ancient conventual, collegiate, and eleemosynary foundations, in the Counties of Cornwall and Devon, with historical notices, and a supplement, comprising a list of the dedications of churches in the Diocese, an amended edition of the taxation of Pope Nicholas, and an abstract of the Chantry Rolls supplement and index. Exeter: P. A. Hannaford, 1846, 1854, 1889)Religious history from the Reformation to the Victorian periodIn the sixteenth century there was some violent resistance to the replacement of Catholicism with Protestantism in the Book Rebellion.() In 1548 the college at Glasney, a centre of learning and study established by the Bishop of Exeter, had been closed and looted (many manuscripts and documents were destroyed) which aroused resentment among the Cornish. They, among other things, objected to the English language of Common Prayer, protesting that the English language was still unknown to many at the time. The Prayer Book Rebellion was a cultural and social disaster for Cornwall; the reprisals taken by the forces of the Crown have been estimated to account for 1011% of the civilian population of Cornwall. Culturally speaking, it saw the beginning of the slow decline of the language.From that time Christianity in Cornwall was in the main within the Church of England and subject to the national events which affected it in the next century and a half. Roman Catholicism never became extinct, though openly practised by very few; there were some converts to Puritanism, Anabaptism and Quakerism in certain areas though they suffered intermittent persecution which more or less came to an end in the reign of William and Mary. During the 18th century Cornish Anglicanism was very much in the same state as Anglicanism in most of England. Wesleyan Methodist missions began during Wesleys lifetime and had great success over a long period during which Methodism itself divided into a number of sects and established a definite separation from the Church of England.From the early nineteenth to the mid-twentieth century Methodism was the leading form of Christianity in Cornwall but it is now in decline.()(Shaw, Thomas (1967) A History of Cornish Methodism. Truro: Bradford Barton) The Church of England was in the majority from the reign of Queen Elizabeth until the Methodist revival of the 19th century: before the Wesleyan missions dissenters were very few in Cornwall. The county remained within the of Exeter until 1876 when the Anglican of Truro was created()(Brown, H. Miles (1976) A Century for Cornwall. Truro: Blackford) (the first Bishop was appointed in 1877). Roman Catholicism was virtually extinct in Cornwall after the 17th century except for a few families such as the Arundells of Lanherne. From the mid-19th century the church reestablished episcopal sees in England, one of these being at Plymouth.() Since then immigration to Cornwall has brought more Roman Catholics into the population.Physical geographythumb|right|Satellite image of CornwallCornwall forms the tip of the south-west peninsula of the island of Great Britain, and is therefore exposed to the full force of the winds that blow in from the Atlantic Ocean. The coastline is composed mainly of resistant rocks that give rise in many places to impressive cliffs. Cornwall has a border with only one other county, Devon.Coastal areasThe north and south coasts have different characteristics. The north coast on the Sea, part of the Atlantic Ocean, is more exposed and therefore has a wilder nature. The prosaically named High Cliff, between Boscastle and Gennys, is the highest sheer-drop cliff in Cornwall at .() However, there are also many extensive stretches of fine golden sand which form the beaches that are so important to the tourist industry, such as those at Bude, Polzeath, Bay, Perranporth, Porthtowan, Beach, Newquay, St Agnes, St Ives, and on the south coast Gyllyngvase beach in Falmouth. There are two river estuaries on the north coast: Estuary and the estuary of the Camel, which provides Padstow and Rock with a safe harbour.Image:St-Michael Mount.jpg|thumb|right|Michaels Mount in MarazionThe south coast, dubbed the Cornish Riviera, is more sheltered and there are several broad estuaries offering safe anchorages, such as at Falmouth and Fowey. Beaches on the south coast usually consist of coarser sand and shingle, interspersed with rocky sections of platform. Also on the south coast, the picturesque fishing village of Polperro, at the mouth of the Pol River, and the fishing port of Looe on the Looe are both popular with tourists.Inland areasThe interior of the county consists of a roughly east-west spine of infertile and exposed upland, with a series of granite intrusions, such as Moor, which contains the highest land within Cornwall. From east to west, and with approximately descending altitude, these are Bodmin Moor, the area north of Austell, the area south of Camborne, and the Penwith or End peninsula. These intrusions are the central part of the granite outcrops that form the exposed parts of the batholith of south-west Britain, which also includes Dartmoor to the east in Devon and the of Scilly to the west, the latter now being partially submerged.thumb|left|Cornwall is known for its beaches and rugged coastline.The intrusion of the granite into the surrounding sedimentary rocks gave rise to extensive metamorphism and mineralisation, and this led to Cornwall being one of the most important mining areas in Europe until the early 20th century. It is thought tin was mined here as early as the Age, and copper, lead, zinc and silver have all been mined in Cornwall. Alteration of the granite also gave rise to extensive deposits of China Clay, especially in the area to the north of Austell, and the extraction of this remains an important industry.The uplands are surrounded by more fertile, mainly pastoral farmland. Near the south coast, deep wooded valleys provide sheltered conditions for flora that like shade and a moist, mild climate. These areas lie mainly on Devonian sandstone and slate. The north east of Cornwall lies on Carboniferous rocks known as the Measures. In places these have been subjected to severe folding, as can be seen on the north coast near Haven and in several other locations.The Lizard PeninsulaThe geology of the Lizard peninsula is unusual, in that it is mainland Britains only example of an ophiolite, a section of oceanic crust now found on land.(Britains only other example on an ophiolite, the Shetland ophiolite, is older, and linked to the Grampian Orogeny) Much of the peninsula consists of the dark green and red Precambrian serpentinite, which forms spectacular cliffs, notably at Cove, and carved and polished serpentine ornaments are sold in local gift shops. This rock also forms a very infertile soil which covers the flat and marshy heaths of the interior of the peninsula. This is home to rare plants, such as the Heath, which has been adopted as the flower.(Cornwall County Council, The County Flower.)EcologyCornwall has varied habitats including terrestrial and marine ecosystems. One of the plant forms in decline locally is the lichen, which species has been made a priority for protection under the national UK Action Plan.(Price, J. H., Hepton, C. E. L. and Honey, S. I. (1979). The Inshore Benthic Biota of the Lizard Peninsula, south west Cornwall: the marine algae  History; Chlorophyta; Phaeophyta. Cornish Studies; no. 7: pp. 737)(Bere, Rennie (1982) The Nature of Cornwall. Buckingham: Barracuda Books)thumb|Red-billed chough: Pyrrhocorax pyrrhocorax pyrrhocoraxBotanists divide Cornwall and Scilly into two vice-counties: West (1) and East (2). The standard flora is by H. Davey Flora of Cornwall (1909). Davey was assisted by O. Hume and he thanks Hume, his companion on excursions in Cornwall and Devon, and for help in the compilation of that Flora, publication of which was financed by him.ClimateCornwall has a temperate climate (climate classification: Cfb) and has the mildest and sunniest climate in the United Kingdom, as a result of its southerly latitude and the influence of the Stream.(Met Office, 2000. Annual average temperature for the United Kingdom.) The average annual temperature in Cornwall ranges from 11.6 C (53 F) on the of Scilly to 9.8 C (50 F) in the central uplands. Winters are amongst the warmest in the country due to the southerly latitude and moderating effects of the warm ocean currents, and frost and snow are very rare at the coast and are also rare in the central upland areas as well. Summers are however not as warm as other areas in southern England. Due to its proximity to the sea, Cornwalls weather can be relatively changeable.Cornwall is one of the sunniest areas in the UK, with over 1541 hours of sunshine per year, with the highest average of 7.6 hours of sunshine per day in July.(Met Office, 2000. Annual average sunshine for the United Kingdom.) The moist, mild air coming from the south west brings higher amounts of rainfall than eastern Great Britain, at 1051 to 1290 mm (41.4 to 50.8 in) per year, however not as much as more northern areas of the west coast.(Met Office, 2000. Annual average rainfall for the United Kingdom.) The Isles of Scilly, for example, where there are on average less than 2 days of air frost per year, are in the USDA zone 10, which is the only area in the UK that is in this zone and where there is on average less than 1 day of air temperature exceeding 30 C per year, are in the AHS Heat Zone 1. Extreme temperatures in Cornwall are particularly rare, however extreme weather in the form of storms and floods is common.dateAugust 2010Politics and administrationImage:New County Hall.jpg|thumb|Councils headquarters in TruroWith the exception of the of Scilly, Cornwall is now governed by a authority known as Council which is based in Truro. Cornwalls Courts of Justice are also located in Truro.The Isles of Scilly form part of the county of Cornwall and have, at times, been served by the same county administration. However, since 1890 they have been administered by their own authority, now known as the Council of the Isles of Scilly. They are still grouped with Cornwall for other administrative purposes, such as the National Health Service and Devon and Cornwall Police.()()( )Prior to reorganisation on 1 April 2009, council functions throughout the rest of Cornwall were organised on a two-tier basis, with a county council and district councils for the six districts of Caradon, Carrick, Kerrier, Cornwall, Penwith, and Restormel. While projected to streamline services, cut red tape and save around 17 million a year, the reorganisation was met with wide opposition, with a poll in 2008 giving a result of 89% disapproval from Cornish residents.()()()The first elections for the new unitary authority were held on 4 June 2009. The new council has 123 seats; the largest party is the Conservative Party with 50, followed by the Democrats with 38, Independents with 32 and Kernow with 3 seats.()Prior to the creation of the new unitary council, the former county council had 82 seats, the majority of which were held by the Liberal Democrats, elected at the 2005 county council elections. The six former districts in Cornwall had a total of 249 council seats, and the numerically largest groups represented on them were Liberal Democrats, Conservatives, and Independents.;Parliamentary constituenciesFollowing a review by the Commission for England taking effect at the 2010 general election, Cornwall is divided into six constituencies to elect MPs to the of Commons of the United Kingdom.Before the 2010 boundary changes there were five constituencies in Cornwall, all of which were won by Democrats in the 2005 general election. However, at the 2010 general election Liberal Democrat candidates won three constituencies and Conservative candidates won three constituencies (see also United Kingdom general election result in Cornwall).Until 1832, Cornwall had 44 MPs-more than any other county-reflecting the importance of tin to the Crown.() Most of the increase came between 1529 and 1584 after which there was no change until 1832.(Rowse, A. L. (1941) Tudor Cornwall. London: Cape; pp. 9194)The chief registered parties contesting elections in Cornwall are Conservatives, Greens, Labour, Liberal Democrats, Kernow, Liberal Party and the Kingdom Independence Party (UKIP).In July 2007, Conservative leader Cameron appointed Prisk to the newly created post of Minister for Cornwall.()Self-rule movementThere is a growing call within Cornwall for greater self-rule. Councils February 2003 MORI poll showed 55% in favour of an elected, fully devolved regional assembly for Cornwall and 13% against. (Previous result: 46% in favour in 2002). The Cornish Constitutional Convention advocates the creation of a Assembly,( along the lines of the Assembly for Wales, Assembly and Ireland Assembly. In 2001 it presented a petition to the then Prime Minister, Blair, calling for the change. It is claimed that many of the residents are calling for a high degree of autonomy within England, or a split from England, creating a fifth nation of the United Kingdom.() and/or a separate Cornish Development Agency, a result of discontent with the South West Regional Development Agency. It is also maintained by some that Cornwall already is a nation separate from England and that the Stannary Parliament, which has not been dissolved, could be recognised, achieving these goals by recognising the currently ignored status of Cornwall rather than making changes.Cornish political partiesCornish nationalists have organised into two political parties: Kernow, formed in 1951, and the Nationalist Party. In addition to the political parties, there are various interest groups such as the Cornish Stannary Parliament and the Celtic League. In November 2000, the Cornish Constitutional Convention was formed to campaign for a Cornish Assembly. It is a cross-party organisation including representatives from the private, public, and voluntary sectors, of all political parties and none. Between 5 March 2000 and December 2001, the campaign collected the signatures of 41,650 Cornish residents endorsing the declaration for a devolved regional Cornish Assembly, along with 8,896 signatories from outside Cornwall.(The question of Cornwalls constitutional statusThe question of Cornwalls constitutional status as a de facto of England, as established by the Government Act 1888, a Duchy, i.e. the of Cornwall established in 1337 by III of England for his son, Edward, of Wales, or another constitutional entity of the United Kingdom is a complex one. In recent years there has been cross-party recognition of the issue at least as far as the calls for a Assembly are concerned. In addition there are also groups and individuals, including the Cornish Stannary Parliament, the Constitutional Convention,( and Angarrack,() who reject the present constitutional status of Cornwall, denying the legality of Cornwalls current administration as a county of England, and Cornwalls relationship to the Duchy of Cornwall.Contemporary political partiesIn 2007 Cameron, leader of the Conservative Party, in a departure from the Conservative Partys traditionally unionist stance, appointed Cornishman Prisk, MP for Hertford, Hertfordshire, England, as Minister for Cornwall. This appointment was called the fictional minister for Cornwall, by a Liberal Democrat MP, as there was no government minister to shadow.(http://www.newstatesman.com/uk-politics/2009/03/conservative-party-local-mps) The post was not continued following the 2010 election, and no longer exists. The Democrats recognise Cornwalls claims for greater autonomy, as do the Liberal Party.:The new single council is also the opportunity to gain more control over local issues from regional and national Government bureaucrats  the first step on our way to a Cornish Assembly.  The Liberal Democrat Manifesto for 2009(http://devon-cornwall-libdems.org.uk/resources/sites/84.234.17.197-44731d1eeb1e05.55457880/Cornwall+Lib+Dems+2009+Manifesto.pdf)An additional political issue is the recognition of the people as a minority.()Settlements and communicationImage:Truro stmarysst.jpg|thumb|right|upright|Truro, Cornwalls administrative centreCornwalls only city, and the home of the council headquarters, is Truro. Nearby Falmouth is notable as a port, while the ports at Penzance, the most westerly town in England, St Ives and Padstow have declined. Newquay on the north coast is famous for its beaches and is a popular surfing destination, as is Bude further north. Austell is Cornwalls largest town and is larger than the capital Truro, and a centre of the china clay industry. Redruth and Camborne together form the largest urban area in Cornwall, and both towns were significant as centres of the global tin mining industry.Cornwall borders the county of Devon at the River Tamar. Major road links between Cornwall and the rest of Great Britain are the A38 which crosses the Tamar at Plymouth via the Bridge and the town of Saltash, the road (Atlantic Highway) from Barnstaple, passing through Cornwall to end eventually in Falmouth, and the A30 which crosses the border south of Launceston. Ferry also links Plymouth with the town of Torpoint on the opposite side of the Hamoaze. A rail bridge, the Albert Bridge, built by Kingdom Brunel (1859) provides the only other major transport link. The major city of Plymouth being the nearest large urban centre to east Cornwall makes it an important location for such services as hospitals, department stores, road and rail transport, and cultural venues.Cornwall International Airport provides an airlink to the rest of the UK, Ireland and Europe, as does City Airport in Devon.Cardiff and Swansea, across the Bristol Channel, are connected to Cornwall by ferry, usually to Padstow. Swansea in particular has several boat companies who can arrange boat trips to north Cornwall, which allow the traveller to pass by the north Cornish coastline, including Castle and Padstow harbour. Very occasionally, the Waverley and Balmoral paddle steamers cruise from Swansea or Bristol to Padstow.The of Scilly are served by ferry (from Penzance), helicopter (Heliport) and fixed wing aeroplane (End Airport, near St Just) and from Newquay Airport. Further flights to St. Marys Airport, Isles of Scilly, are available from International Airport in Devon.Flagthumb|right|Souvenir flags outside a Cornish cafSaint Pirans Flag is regarded by many as the national flag of Cornwall,()() and an emblem of the Cornish people; and by others as the county flag. The banner of Piran is a white cross on a black background. Saint Piran is supposed to have adopted these two colours from seeing the white tin in the black coals and ashes during his supposed discovery of tin. Gilbert in 1826 described it as anciently the flag of St Piran and the banner of Cornwall,() and another history of 1880 said that: The white cross of St. Piran was the ancient banner of the Cornish people. The Cornish flag is an exact reverse of the former Breton national flag (black cross) and is known by the same name Kroaz Du.There are also claims that the patron saint of Cornwall is Michael or Petroc, but Saint Piran is by far the most popular of the three and his emblem is internationally()() recognised as the flag of Cornwall. Pirans Day (5 March) is celebrated by the diaspora around the world.EconomyImage:FalmouthDocks.jpg|thumb|right|Falmouth Docks is the major port of Cornwall, and one of the largest harbours in the worldImage:Eden project1.JPG|thumb|right|The Project, Cornwalls largest tourist attraction in terms of visitor numbersCornwall is one of the poorest areas in the United Kingdom. The GVA per head was 65% of the UK average for 2004.(ONS December 2006) The GDP per head for Cornwall and the Isles of Scilly was 79.2% of the EU-27 average for 2004, the UK per head average was 123.0%.(Eurostat)Historically mining of tin (and later also of copper) was important in the Cornish economy. The first reference to this appears to be by Pytheas: see above. Caesar was the last classical writer to mention the tin trade, which appears to have declined during the Roman occupation.(Halliday, p. 69.) The tin trade revived in the Middle Ages, and the Rebellion of 1497 is attributed to tin miners.(Halliday, p. 182) In the mid-nineteenth century, however, the tin trade again fell into decline.Today, the Cornish economy depends heavily on its tourist industry, which makes up around a quarter of the economy. The official measures of deprivation and poverty at district and sub-ward level show that there is great variation in poverty and prosperity in Cornwall with some areas among the poorest in England and others among the top half in prosperity. For example, the ranking of 32,482 sub-wards in England in the index of multiple deprivation (2006) ranged from 819th (part of Penzance East) to 30,899th (part of Saltash Burraton in Caradon), where the lower number represents the greater deprivation.(Poverty and deprivation in Cornwall (June 2006) and )Cornwall is one of four UK areas that qualify for poverty-related grants from the EU: it was granted 1 status by the Commission, followed by a further round of funding known as Convergence Funding.TourismTourism is estimated to contribute up to 24% of Cornwalls gross domestic product.(Cornwall Council: Cornwalls Challenges and Concerns  The Evidence Base. Accessed 21 June 2011) Cornwalls unique culture, spectacular landscape and mild climate make it a popular tourist destination, despite being somewhat distant from the United Kingdoms main centres of population. Surrounded on three sides by the Channel and Sea, Cornwall has many miles of beaches and cliffs; the West Coast Path follows a complete circuit of both coasts. Other tourist attractions include moorland, country gardens, museums, historic and prehistoric sites, and wooded valleys. Five million tourists visit Cornwall each year, mostly drawn from within the UK.(Visit Cornwall, 2007. ) Visitors to Cornwall are served by airports at Newquay and Plymouth, whilst private jets, charters and helicopters are also served by Perranporth airfield; nightsleeper and daily rail services run between Cornwall, London and other regions of the UK.Newquay and Porthtowan are popular destinations for surfers. In recent years, the Project near Austell has been a major financial success, drawing one in eight of Cornwalls visitors.(Scottish Executive, 2004. A literature review of the evidence base for culture, the arts and sport policy.)Other industriesthumb|right| Redruth Mine in 1890Other industries are fishing, although this has been significantly re-structured by EU fishing policies (the Southwest Handline Fishermens Association has started to revive the fishing industry),() and agriculture, which has also declined significantly. Mining of tin and copper was also an industry, but today the derelict mine workings survive only as a Heritage Site.(UNESCO Page on the Cornwall & West Devon application) However, the School of Mines, which was relocated to Penryn in 2004, is still a world centre of excellence in the field of mining and applied geology() and the grant of World Heritage status has attracted funding for conservation and heritage tourism.() clay extraction has also been an important industry in the St Austell area, but this sector has been in decline, and this, coupled with increased mechanisation, has led to a decrease in employment in this sector.Demographicsthumb|Graph showing Cornwalls population from 1800 to 2000Cornwalls population was 513,527 at the last count (2001), and population density 144 people per square kilometre, ranking it 40th and 41st respectively compared with the other 47 counties of England. Cornwall is 99.0% British and has a relatively high level of population growth. At 11.2% in the 1980s and 5.3% in the 1990s, it has the fifth highest population growth of the English counties.(Office for National Statistics, 2001. Population Change in England by County 19812000.) The natural change has been a small population decline, and the population increase is due to inward migration into Cornwall.(Office for National Statistics, 2001. Births, Deaths and Natural Change in Cornwall 1974  2001.) According to the 1991 census, the population was 469,800.Cornwall has a relatively high retired population, with 22.9% of pensionable age, compared with 20.3% for the United Kingdom.(Office for National Statistics, 1996. % of Population of Pension Age (1996).) This may be due to a combination of Cornwalls rural and coastal geography increasing its popularity as a retirement location, and outward migration of younger residents to more economically diverse areas. Inward migration of pensioners from southern England to Cornwall, and outward migration of young Cornish people, are persistent concerns.Question of Cornish national identityCornwall is the homeland of the Cornish people and diaspora, and is recognised by many people, organisations and media (including politicians, Kernow, the Celtic League, the International Celtic Congress, Guardian, Independent, and Raidi Teilifs ireann (RT)) alongside Brittany, Ireland, the Isle of Man, Scotland and Wales as one of the six nations.()()()()()()() Alongside Asturias and Galicia, Cornwall is also recognised as one of the eight Celtic nations by the of Man Government and the Government.()() Cornwall is represented, as one of the Celtic nations, at the Interceltique de Lorient, an annual celebration of Celtic culture held in Brittany.()Cornwall Council consider Cornwalls unique cultural heritage and distinctiveness to be one of the areas major assets. They see Cornwalls language; landscape; Celtic identity; political history; patterns of settlement; maritime tradition; industrial heritage; and non-conformist tradition, to be among the features comprising its distinctive culture.() However, it is uncertain how many of the people living in Cornwall consider themselves to be Cornish; results from different surveys (including the national census) have varied. In the 2001 census, 7 percent of people in Cornwall identified themselves as Cornish, rather than British or English. However, activists have argued that this underestimated the true number as there was no explicit Cornish option included in the official census form.() Subsequent surveys have suggested that as many as 44 percent identify as Cornish.() Many people in Cornwall say that this issue would be resolved if a Cornish option became available on the census.() The question and content recommendations for the 2011 Census provide an explanation of the process of selecting an ethnic identity which is relevant to the understanding of the often quoted figure of 37,000 who claim Cornish identity.()On 12 July 2005 Andrew George MP put forward proposals in the House of Commons for a version of devolution for Cornwall which he debated with the minister Jim Fitzpatrick, speaking on behalf of the Government.()Education systemCornwall has a comprehensive education system, with 31 state and 8 independent secondary schools. There are three further education colleges--College (a former sixth form college), College (occupying the former home of the Camborne School of Mines) and College. The Isles of Scilly only has one school while the former Restormel district has the highest school population, and school year sizes are around 200, with none above 270.Higher education is provided by College Falmouth, the of Exeter (including School of Mines), the Universities in Cornwall, and by Truro College, Penwith College and Cornwall College.Languages and dialectsEnglish is the main language used in Cornwall, although the revived language may be seen on road signs and is spoken fluently by a small minority of people.Cornish languageFile:Penzansagasdynerghcrop.jpeg|right|thumb|A sign to Penzance, in the English and Cornish languagesThe Cornish language is closely related to Welsh and Breton, and less so to Irish, Scots Gaelic and Manx. The language continued to function as a community language in parts of Cornwall until the late 18th century, and there has been a revival of the language since Jenners Handbook of the Cornish Language was published in 1904. A study in 2000 suggested that there were around 300 people who spoke Cornish fluently.(http://www.gosw.gov.uk/gosw/docs/254795/mode_of_use.doc) Cornish however had no legal status in the UK until 2002. Nevertheless, the language is taught in about twelve primary schools, and occasionally used in religious and civic ceremonies.() In 2002 Cornish was officially recognised as a UK minority language() and in 2005 it received limited Government funding.() A Written Form was agreed in 2008.()Several Cornish mining words are still in use in English language mining terminology, such as costean, gunnies, vug,(Dictionary of Mining, Mineral, and Related Terms by American Geological Institute and U S Bureau of Mines; pp. 128, 249 & 613) kibbal, gossan, kieve.Four of the current Members of Parliament (MPs) in the of the United Kingdom, Andrew George, MP for St Ives, Rogerson, MP for North Cornwall, Stephen Gilbert, MP for Austell and Newquay, and Newton, MP for and Falmouth repeated their Parliamentary oaths in Cornish.()English dialectCultureVisual artsgallery St-Ives.jpg|thumb|The Tate Gallery at St IvesFile:Sphere With Inner Form.jpg|thumb|Artwork in the Hepworth Museum in St IvesSince the 19th century, Cornwall, with its unspoilt maritime scenery and strong light, has sustained a vibrant visual art scene of international renown. Artistic activity within Cornwall was initially centred on the art-colony of Newlyn, most active at the turn of the 20th century. This School is associated with the names: Forbes, Elizabeth Forbes,() Garstin and Birch.() Modernist writers such as H. Lawrence and Woolf lived in Cornwall between the wars,() and Nicholson, the painter, having visited in the 1920s came to live in St Ives with his then wife, the sculptor Hepworth, at the outbreak of the second world war.() They were later joined by the Russian emigrant Gabo,() and other artists. These included Lanyon, Frost, Heron, Wynter and Hilton. St Ives also houses the Leach Pottery, where Leach, and his followers championed Japanese inspired studio pottery.() Much of this modernist work can be seen in St Ives.() The Newlyn Society and Society of Arts continue to be active, and contemporary visual art is documented in a dedicated online journal.()Music and festivalsCornwall has a rich and vibrant music tradition which has survived into the present and is well known for its unusual folk survivals such as Plays, the Dance in Helston played by the famous Town Band, and Oss in Padstow.As in other former mining districts of Britain, male voice choirs and Brass Bands, e.g. Brass on the Grass concerts during the summer at Constantine, are still very popular in Cornwall: Cornwall also has around 40 brass bands, including the six-times National Champions of Great Britain, Camborne Youth Band, and the bands of Lanner and St Dennis.Cornish players are regular participants in inter-Celtic festivals, and Cornwall itself has several lively inter-Celtic festivals such as Perranporths Lowender Peran folk festival.()On a more modern note, contemporary musician Richard D. James (also known as Aphex Twin) grew up in Cornwall, as did Vibert and Parks winner of Academy 2003. Roger Taylor, the drummer from the band Queen was also raised in the county, and currently lives not far from Falmouth. The American singer/songwriter Amos now resides predominantly in North Cornwall not far from Bude with her family.()LiteratureFictionSir Arthur Quiller-Couch author of many novels and works of literary criticism lived in Fowey: his novels are mainly set in Cornwall. du Maurier lived at Menabilly near Fowey and many of her novels had Cornish settings, including Rebecca, Jamaica Inn, Frenchmans Creek, Cousin Rachel, and House on the Strand.() She is also noted for writing Vanishing Cornwall. Cornwall provided the inspiration for The Birds, one of her terrifying series of short stories, made famous as a film by Hitchcock.() Image:RemainsofTintagel.jpg|thumb|right|Remains of Castle, legendary birthplace of mythical ArthurMedieval Cornwall is the setting of the trilogy by Furlong, Wise Child, Juniper, and Colman, as well as part of Charles Kingsleys the Wake. Doyles Adventure of the Devils Foot featuring Holmes is set in Cornwall.() Grahams series Poldark, Tremaynes Loveday series, Coopers novels Sea, Under Stone() and Greenwitch, and Wesleys Camomile Lawn are all set in Cornwall. Writing under the pseudonym of Alexander Kent, Reeman sets parts of his Bolitho and Adam Bolitho series in the Cornwall of the late 18th and the early 19th centuries, particularly in Falmouth.Inness novel, The Killer Mine;() de Lints novel The Little Country;() and Chapters 24 and 25 of K. Rowlings Potter and the Deathly Hallows take place in Cornwall (the Harry Potter story at Shell Cottage, which is on the beach outside the fictional village of Tinworth in Cornwall).() Georges mystery, Careless in Red, takes place on the Cornish coast. Author David Cornwell, who writes espionage novels under the name le Carr, lives and writes in Cornwall.() Nobel Prize-winning novelist Golding was born in Columb Minor in 1911, and returned to live near Truro from 1985 until his death in 1993.() H. Lawrence spent a short time living in Cornwall. Pilcher grew up in Cornwall, and several of her books take place there.PoetryImage:ForTheFallenPlaqueCornwall.jpg|thumb|For The Fallen plaque with Rumps promontory beyondThe late Laureate Sir John Betjeman was famously fond of Cornwall and it featured prominently in his poetry. He is buried in the churchyard at Enodocs Church, Trebetherick.()Causley, the poet, was born in Launceston and is perhaps the best known of Cornish poets. Clemo and the scholar L. Rowse were also notable Cornishmen known for their poetry; The Rev. R. S. Hawker of Morwenstow wrote some poetry which was very popular in the Victorian period. The Scottish poet S. Graham lived in West Cornwall from 1944 until his death in 1986.()The poet Binyon wrote For the Fallen (first published in 1914) while sitting on the cliffs between Point and The Rumps and a stone plaque was erected in 2001 to commemorate the fact. The plaque bears the inscription FOR THE FALLEN / Composed on these cliffs, 1914. The plaque also bears below this the fourth stanza (sometimes referred to as The Ode) of the poem::They shall grow not old, as we that are left grow old:Age shall not weary them, nor the years condemn:At the going down of the sun and in the morning:We will remember themOther literary worksCornwall produced a substantial number of plays such as the Ordinalia during the Middle Ages. Many are still extant, and provide valuable information about the Cornish language. See also literatureProlific writer Wilson, best known for his debut work The Outsider (1956) and for Mind Parasites (1967), lives in Haven, a little village on the southern Cornish coast, not far from Mevagissey and Austell. L. Rowse, the historian and poet, was born near St Austell. The writer M. Thomas was born in Redruth but lived and worked in Australia and the United States before returning to his native Cornwall. He has written novels, poetry, and other works, including translations from Russian.Hardys drama The Queen of Cornwall (1923) is a version of the Tristan story; the second act of Wagners opera und Isolde takes place in Cornwall, as do and Sullivans operettas Pirates of Penzance and Ruddigore. A level of Raider: Legend, a game dealing with Arthurian Legend, takes place in Cornwall at a tacky museum above King Arthurs tomb.The fairy tale the Giant Killer takes place in Cornwall.Sports and gamesImage:Gerry and Ashley Cawley.JPG|thumb|upright|wrestlingWith its comparatively small, and largely rural population, major contribution by the Cornish to national in the United Kingdom has been limited.(.) There are no teams affiliated to the County Football Association that play in Football League of and Wales, and the County Cricket Club plays as one of the counties of English cricket.( Viewed as an important identifier of ethnic affiliation, union has become a sport strongly tied to notions of Cornishness,(.) and since the 20th century, union in Cornwall has emerged as one of,the most popular spectator and team sports in Cornwall (perhaps the most popular), with professional Cornish rugby footballers being described as a formidable force,( naturally independent, both in thought and deed, yet paradoxically staunch English patriots whose top players have represented England with pride and passion.() In 1985, sports journalist Gibson made a direct connection between love of rugby in Cornwall and the ancient parish games of hurling and wrestling that existed for centuries before rugby officially began.( Among Cornwalls native sports are a distinctive form of Celtic wrestling related to Breton wrestling, and Cornish hurling, a kind of mediaeval football played with a silver ball (distinct from Irish Hurling). Wrestling is Cornwalls oldest sport and as Cornwalls native tradition it has travelled the world to places like Australia and Valley, California following the miners and rushes. Cornish hurling now takes place at Columb Major, St Ives, and less frequently at Bodmin.(The Bodmin hurl is held whenever the ceremony of the bounds takes place: each occasion must be five years or more after the last one.)Surfing and other water sportsFile:Pilot Gigs St Marys.jpg|thumb|The world pilot gig rowing championships take place annually in the of Scilly.Image:GwithianSurfing.jpg|thumb|right|Cornwalls north coast is known as a centre for surfingDue to its long coastline, various maritime sports are popular in Cornwall, notably sailing and surfing. International events in both are held in Cornwall. Cornwall hosted the Inter-Celtic Watersports Festival in 2006. Surfing in particular is very popular, as locations such as Bude and Newquay offer some of the best surf in the UK. Pilot gig rowing has been popular for many years and the World championships takes place annually on the of Scilly. On 2 September 2007, 300 surfers at Polzeath beach set a new world record for the highest number of surfers riding the same wave as part of the Global Surf Challenge and part of a project called Earthwave to raise awareness about warming.()Indoor gamesEuchre (also known as five hundred) is a popular game in Cornwall. It is normally a game for four players consisting of two teams. Its origins are unclear but some claim it is a Cornish game. There are several leagues in Cornwall at present. Whist and pub quizzes are also popular.CuisineCornwall has a strong culinary heritage. Surrounded on three sides by the sea amid fertile fishing grounds, Cornwall naturally has fresh seafood readily available; Newlyn is the largest fishing port in the UK by value of fish landed.() Television chef Stein has long operated a fish restaurant in Padstow for this reason, and Oliver recently chose to open his second restaurant, Fifteen, in Bay near Newquay. MasterChef host and founder of Smiths of Smithfield, Torode, in 2007 purchased Seiners in Perranporth. One famous local fish dish is pie, a fish-based pie in which the heads of the fish stick through the piecrust, as though star-gazing. The pie is cooked as part of traditional celebrations for Bawcocks Eve, but is not generally eaten at any other time.pasty - cut.jpeg|thumb|right|A Cornish pastyCornwall is perhaps best known though for its pasties, a savoury dish made with pastry. Todays pasties usually contain a filling of beef steak, onion, potato and swede with salt and white pepper, but historically pasties had a variety of different fillings. Turmut, tates and mate (i.e. Turnip, potatoes and meat) describes a filling once very common. For instance, the licky pasty contained mostly leeks, and the herb pasty contained watercress, parsley, and shallots.() Pasties are often locally referred to as oggies. Historically, pasties were also often made with sweet fillings such as jam, apple and blackberry, plums or cherries.()The wet climate and relatively poor soil of Cornwall make it unsuitable for growing many arable crops. However, it is ideal for growing the rich grass required for dairying, leading to the production of Cornwalls other famous export, cream. This forms the basis for many local specialities including Cornish fudge and Cornish cream. Cornish clotted cream has Geographical Status under EU law,() and cannot be made anywhere else. Its principal manufacturer is Roddas, based at Scorrier.Local cakes and desserts include Saffron cake, Cornish heavy (hevva) cake, fairings biscuits, figgy obbin, scones (often served with jam and clotted cream) and whortleberry pie.(Mason, Laura; Brown, Catherine (1999) From Bath Chaps to Bara Brith. Totnes: Prospect Books)(Pettigrew, Jane (2004) Afternoon Tea. Andover: Jarrold)(Fitzgibbon, Theodora (1972) A Taste of England: the West Country. London: J. M. Dent)There are also many types of beers brewed in Cornwall  those produced by Brewery, Brewery and Austell Brewery are the best-known  including stouts, ales and other beer types. There is some small scale production of wine, mead and cider.See also*of England*languages*nations*Celts*groups in Europe*Sheriff of Cornwall*of Parliamentary constituencies in Cornwall*of schools in Cornwall*Lieutenant of CornwallReferencesFurther reading* Balchin, W. G. V. (1954) Cornwall: an illustrated essay on the history of the landscape. (The Making of the English Landscape). London: Hodder and Stoughton*Boase, George Clement; Courtney, W. P. (18741882) Bibliotheca Cornubiensis: a catalogue of the writings, both manuscript and printed, of Cornishmen, and of works relating to the county of Cornwall, with biographical memoranda and copious literary references. 3 vols. London: Longmans, Green, Reader, and Dyer*  (illustrated edition Published by Victor Gollancz, London, 1981, ISBN 0-575-02844-0, photographs by Christian Browning)*  (Available online on Google Books).*  (Available online on Digital Book Index)*  A 2nd edition was published in 2001 by the House of Stratus, Thirsk: the original text new illustrations and an afterword by Hallidays son*  (Available online on Google Books).*  Revised edition Cornwall: a history, Fowey: Cornwall Editions Ltd, 2004 ISBN 1-904880-00-2 (Available online on Google Books).* * *Williams, Michael (ed.) (1973) My Cornwall. St Teath: Bossiney Books (eleven chapters by various hands, including three previously published essays)External links*Cornwall Council*af:Cornwallang:Corneallar:an:Cornuallaast:Cornuallesbn:zh-min-nan:Kernowbr:Kernev-Veurbg:(Gran Bretanya)cs:Cornwallcy:Cernywda:Cornwallde:Cornwallet:Cornwallel:es:Cornualleseo:Kornvaloeu:Kornuallesfa:fo:Cornwallfr:Cornouaillesfy:Cornwallna BreataineChornChrn- Kernowhi:hsb:Korniskagrofovijaio:Kornwalid:Cornwallia:Cornualliaos:is:Cornwallit:Cornovagliahe:kw:Kernowla:Cornubialv:Kornvolalb:Cornwalllt:Kornvalishu:Cornwallmr:nl:Cornwallja:no:Cornwallnn:Cornwalloc:Cornoalhapnb:pl:Kornwaliapt:Cornualharo:Cornwallqu:Cornwallru:sco:Cornwallscn:Curnuvagghiasimple:Cornwall(grfstvo)sl:Cornwallszl:Kornwalijosr:sh:Cornwallfi:Cornwallsv:Cornwalltl:Cornuallesta:th:tr:Cornwalluk:ug:Kornwlvec:Cornovagiavi:Cornwallvo:Cornwallzh:
5665
Currency
 File:Euromoenterogsedler.jpg|thumb|right|Coins and banknotes  the two most common forms of currency.In economics, currency refers to a generally accepted of exchange. These are usually the coins and banknotes of a particular government, which comprise the physical aspects of a nations supply. The other part of a nations money supply consists of deposits (sometimes called money), ownership of which can be transferred by means of cheques, cards, or other forms of money transfer. Deposit money and currency are money in the sense that both are acceptable as a means of payment.()Money in the form of currency has predominated throughout most of history. Usually (gold or silver) coins of intrinsic value (money) have been the norm. However, nearly all contemporary money systems are based on money  modern currency has value only by government order (fiat). Usually, the government declares the fiat currency (typically notes and coins issued by the bank) to be tender, making it unlawful to not accept the fiat currency as a means of repayment for all debts, public and private.()(Black, Henry Campbell (1910). A Law Dictionary Containing Definitions Of The Terms And Phrases Of American And English Jurisprudence, Ancient And Modern, page 494. West Publishing Co. Law Dictionary defines the word fiat to mean a short order or warrant of a Judge or magistrate directing some act to be done; an authority issuing from some competent source for the doing of some legal act) History  Early currency  Currency evolved from two basic innovations, both of which had occurred by 2000 BC. Originally money was a form of receipt, representing grain stored in temple granaries in Sumer in ancient Mesopotamia, then Egypt.This first stage of currency, where metals were used to represent stored value, and symbols to represent commodities, formed the basis of trade in the Crescent for over 1500 years. However, the collapse of the Near Eastern trading system pointed to a flaw: in an era where there was no place that was safe to store value, the value of a circulating medium could only be as sound as the forces that defended that store. Trade could only reach as far as the credibility of that military. By the late Age, however, a series of international treaties had established safe passage for merchants around the Eastern Mediterranean, spreading from Minoan Crete and Mycenae in the northwest to Elam and Bahrain in the southeast. Although it is not known what functioned as a currency to facilitate these exchanges, it is thought that ox-hide shaped ingots of copper, produced in Cyprus may have functioned as a currency.It is thought that the increase in piracy and raiding associated with the Age collapse, possibly produced by the of the Sea, brought this trading system to an end. It was only with the recovery of Phoenician trade in the ninth and tenth centuries BC that saw a return to prosperity, and the appearance of real coinage, possibly first in Anatolia with Croesus of Lydia and subsequently with the Greeks and Persians.In Africa many forms of value store have been used including beads, ingots, ivory, various forms of weapons, livestock, the currency, ochre and other earth oxides, and so on. The manilla rings of Africa were one of the currencies used from the 15th century onwards to buy and sell slaves. currency is still notable for its variety, and in many places various forms of barter still apply. Coinage These factors led to the shift of the store of value being the metal itself: at first silver, then both silver and gold. Metals were mined, weighed, and stamped into coins. This was to assure the individual taking the coin that he was getting a certain known weight of precious metal. Coins could be counterfeited, but they also created a new of account, which helped lead to banking. principle provided the next link: coins could now be easily tested for their fine weight of metal, and thus the value of a coin could be determined, even if it had been shaved, debased or otherwise tampered with (see Numismatics).In most major economies using coinage, copper, silver and gold formed three tiers of coins. Gold coins were used for large purchases, payment of the military and backing of state activities. Silver coins were used for midsized transactions, and as a unit of account for taxes, dues, contracts and fealty, while copper coins represented the coinage of common transaction. This system had been used in ancient India since the time of the Mahajanapadas. In Europe, this system worked through the medieval period because there was virtually no new gold, silver or copper introduced through mining or conquest. Thus the overall ratios of the three coinages remained roughly equivalent. Paper money In premodern China, the need for credit and for circulating a medium that was less of a burden than exchanging thousands of copper coins led to the introduction of paper money, commonly known today as banknotes. This economic phenomenon was a slow and gradual process that took place from the late Dynasty (618907) into the Dynasty (9601279). It began as a means for merchants to exchange heavy coinage for receipts of deposit issued as notes from shops of wholesalers, notes that were valid for temporary use in a small regional territory. In the 10th century, the Dynasty government began circulating these notes amongst the traders in their monopolized salt industry. The Song government granted several shops the sole right to issue banknotes, and in the early 12th century the government finally took over these shops to produce state-issued currency. Yet the banknotes issued were still regionally valid and temporary; it was not until the mid 13th century that a standard and uniform government issue of paper money was made into an acceptable nationwide currency. The already widespread methods of printing and then Shengs type printing by the 11th century was the impetus for the massive production of paper money in premodern China.At around the same time in the medieval Islamic world, a vigorous economy was created during the 7th12th centuries on the basis of the expanding levels of circulation of a stable high-value currency (the dinar). Innovations introduced by Muslim economists, traders and merchants include the earliest uses of credit,() cheques, notes,() accounts, accounts, loaning, trusts, rates, the transfer of credit and debt,() and institutions for loans and deposits.(In Europe, paper money was first introduced in Sweden in 1661. Sweden was rich in copper, thus, because of coppers low value, extraordinarily big coins (often weighing several kilograms) had to be made.The advantages of paper currency were numerous: it reduced transport of gold and silver, and thus lowered the risks; it made loaning gold or silver at interest easier, since the specie (gold or silver) never left the possession of the lender until someone else redeemed the note; and it allowed for a division of currency into credit and specie backed forms. It enabled the sale of stock in joint stock companies, and the redemption of those shares in paper.However, these advantages held within them disadvantages. First, since a note has no intrinsic value, there was nothing to stop issuing authorities from printing more of it than they had specie to back it with. Second, because it increased the money supply, it increased inflationary pressures, a fact observed by Hume in the 18th century. The result is that paper money would often lead to an inflationary bubble, which could collapse if people began demanding hard money, causing the demand for paper notes to fall to zero. The printing of paper money was also associated with wars, and financing of wars, and therefore regarded as part of maintaining a army. For these reasons, paper currency was held in suspicion and hostility in Europe and America. It was also addictive, since the speculative profits of trade and capital creation were quite large. Major nations established mints to print money and mint coins, and branches of their treasury to collect taxes and hold gold and silver stock.At this time both silver and gold were considered tender, and accepted by governments for taxes. However, the instability in the ratio between the two grew over the course of the 19th century, with the increase both in supply of these metals, particularly silver, and of trade. This is called bimetallism and the attempt to create a bimetallic standard where both gold and silver backed currency remained in circulation occupied the efforts of inflationists. Governments at this point could use currency as an instrument of policy, printing paper currency such as the United States Greenback, to pay for military expenditures. They could also set the terms at which they would redeem notes for specie, by limiting the amount of purchase, or the minimum amount that could be redeemed.By 1900, most of the industrializing nations were on some form of gold standard, with paper notes and silver coins constituting the circulating medium. Private banks and governments across the world followed Law: keeping gold and silver paid, but paying out in notes. This did not happen all around the world at the same time, but occurred sporadically, generally in times of war or financial crisis, beginning in the early part of the 20th century and continuing across the world until the late 20th century, when the regime of floating fiat currencies came into force. One of the last countries to break away from the standard was the United States in 1971.No country anywhere in the world today has an enforceable standard or standard currency system. Banknote eraA banknote (more commonly known as a bill in the United States and Canada) is a type of currency, and commonly used as legal tender in many jurisdictions. With coins, banknotes make up the cash form of all money. Mostly paper, Australias Scientific and Industrial Research Organisation developed the worlds first polymer currency in the 1980s that went into circulation on the nations bicentenary in 1988. Now used in some 22 countries (over 40 if counting commemorative issues), polymer currency dramatically improves the life span of banknotes and prevents counterfeiting. Modern currencies To find out which currency is used in a particular country, check of circulating currencies.Currently, the Organization for Standardization has introduced a three-letter system of codes (4217) to define currency (as opposed to simple names or signs), in order to remove the confusion that there are dozens of currencies called the dollar and many called the franc. Even the pound is used in nearly a dozen different countries, all, of course, with wildly differing values. In general, the three-letter code uses the 3166-1 country code for the first two letters and the first letter of the name of the currency (D for dollar, for instance) as the third letter. United States currency, for instance is globally referred to as USD.The Monetary Fund uses a variant system when referring to national currencies.Control and productionIn most cases, each private bank has monopoly control over the supply and production of its own currency. To facilitate trade between these currency zones, there are different rates, which are the prices at which currencies (and the goods and services of individual currency zones) can be exchanged against each other. Currencies can be classified as either floating currencies or fixed currencies based on their rate regime. In cases where a country does have control of its own currency, that control is exercised either by a bank or by a Ministry of Finance. In either case, the institution that has control of monetary policy is referred to as the monetary authority. Monetary authorities have varying degrees of autonomy from the governments that create them. In the States, the Reserve System operates without direct oversight by the legislative or executive branches. A monetary authority is created and supported by its sponsoring government, so independence can be reduced by the legislative or executive authority that creates it. Several countries can use the same name for their own distinct currencies (for example,, dollar in Canada and the United States). By contrast, several countries can also use the same currency (for example,, the euro), or one country can declare the currency of another country to be tender. For example, Panama and Salvador have declared U.S. currency to be legal tender, and from 17911857, silver coins were legal tender in the United States. At various times countries have either re-stamped foreign coins, or used board issuing one note of currency for each note of a foreign government held, as Ecuador currently does.Each currency typically has a main currency unit (the dollar, for example, or the euro) and a fractional currency, often valued at  of the main currency: 100 cents  1 dollar, 100 centimes  1 franc, 100 pence  1 pound, although units of  or  are also common. Some currencies do not have any smaller units at all, such as the krna.Mauritania and Madagascar are the only remaining countries that do not use the decimal system; instead, the Mauritanian ouguiya is divided into 5 khoums, while the Malagasy ariary is divided into 5 iraimbilanja. In these countries, words like dollar or pound were simply names for given weights of gold.() Due to inflation khoums and iraimbilanja have in practice fallen into disuse. (See currencies for other historic currencies with non-decimal divisions). Currency Convertibility Convertibility of a currency determines the ability of an individual, corporate or government to convert its local currency to another currency or vice versa with or without central bank/government intervention. Based on the above restrictions or free and readily conversion features currencies are classified as:* Fully Convertible - When there are no restrictions or limitations on the amount of currency that can be traded on the international market, and the government does not artificially impose a fixed value or minimum value on the currency in international trade. The US dollar is an example of a fully convertible currency and for this reason, US dollars are one of the major currencies traded in the FOREX market.* Partially Convertible - Central Banks control over international investments flowing in and out of the country, while most domestic trade transactions are handled without any special requirements, there are significant restrictions on international investing and special approval is often required in order to convert into other currencies. Indian Rupee is an example for partially convertible currency.* Nonconvertible - Neither participate in the international FOREX market nor allow conversion of these currencies by individuals or companies. As a result, these currencies are known as blocked currencies. e.g.: Korean Won and the Peso Local currencies In economics, a local currency is a currency not backed by a national government, and intended to trade only in a small area. Advocates such as Jacobs argue that this enables an economically depressed region to pull itself up, by giving the people living there a medium of exchange that they can use to exchange services and locally produced goods (In a broader sense, this is the original purpose of all money.) Opponents of this concept argue that local currency creates a barrier which can interfere with economies of scale and comparative advantage, and that in some cases they can serve as a means of evasion.Local currencies can also come into being when there is economic turmoil involving the national currency. An example of this is the Argentinian economic crisis of 2002 in which IOUs issued by local governments quickly took on some of the characteristics of local currencies.Proposed currencies* Amero: currency union (hypothetical)* Currency Unit: proposed for the +3* Bancor: an international currency proposed by Maynard Keynes in the negotiations that established the Woods system (never implemented)* Currency for Caribbean area()CARICOM states except the Bahamas.* African shilling: African Community (Burundi, Kenya, Rwanda, Tanzania, Uganda)* Eco: African Monetary Zone (Gambia, Ghana, Guinea, Nigeria, Leone, possibly Liberia)*(currency): Gulf Cooperation Council (Bahrain, Kuwait, Oman, Qatar, Arabia, Arab Emirates)* Metica: Mozambique (never implemented)* Perun: Montenegro (never implemented)* (currency): Currency for bilateral commerce (never implemented)* Toman: The new currency that is proposed by the Bank of Iran which would replace the Rial by slashing four zeros off the countrys national currency.* guilder, the new currency for Curaao and Maarten for 2012 replacing the Antillean guilder. See also Related concepts* money* transaction tax* exchange market* exchange reserves * of money* currency* currency area* terms for money* currencyAccounting units* pair* sign* strength* Currency Unit * currency* Poincar* currencies* Petrocurrency* Drawing RightsLists* of circulating currencies* of currencies* of fictional currencies* of historical currencies* of historical exchange rates* of international trade topics* of motifs on banknotesReferencesExternal linksar:an:Divisaarc:ast:Divisaaz:Valyutabe:be-x-old:bar:Wearungbs:Valutabr:Moneizbg:ca:Monedacs:Mnacyfredda:Valutade:Whrunget:Valuuta( )es:Divisaeo:Valutoext:Moneaeu:Dibisahif:Mudrafo:Gjaldoyra(monnaie)fy:Muntga:Airgeadragl:Divisako:()hr:Valutauangia:Numerarioos:is:Gjaldmiillit:Valutajv:Valutakn:krc:ka:kk:lo:(pecunia)lv:Valtalt:Valiuta(fizeteszkz)mk:ml:wangmn:nl:Valutanew:ja:pih:Kurenciino:Valutann:Valutanrm:Mounaie(moneda)uz:Valyutapnb:ps:nds:Geldsoortpl:Walutapt:Moedaro:Valutrm:Valutaqu:Kainarue:ru:sah:se:Ruhtasq:Devizasimple:Currencysk:Menasl:Valutackb:sr:sh:Valutauangfi:Valuuttasv:Valuta(yunit ng palitan)ta:th:tr:Dvizuk:ur:vec:Vautatwa:Manoyewar:Pananalapiyi:yo:Ownnbat-smg:Valiotazh:
5672
Cadmium
Cadmium ( ) is a element with the symbol Cd and number 48. This soft, bluish-white metal is chemically similar to the two other stable metals in group 12, zinc and mercury. Similar to zinc, it prefers state +2 in most of its compounds and similar to mercury it shows a low melting point compared to metals. Cadmium and its congeners are not always considered transition metals, in that they do not have partly filled d or f electron shells in the elemental or common oxidation states. The average concentration of cadmium in the Earths crust is between 0.1 and 0.5 parts per million (ppm). It was discovered in 1817 simultaneously by Stromeyer and Hermann, both in Germany, as an impurity in carbonate.Cadmium occurs as a minor component in most zinc ores and therefore is a byproduct of zinc production. It was used for a long time as a pigment and for corrosion resistant plating on steel while cadmium compounds were used to stabilize plastic. With the exception of its use in nickelcadmium batteries and telluride panels, the use of cadmium is generally decreasing in its other applications. These declines have been due to competing technologies, cadmiums toxicity in certain forms and concentration and resulting regulations.() Although cadmium has no known biological function in higher organisms, a cadmium-dependent anhydrase has been found in marine diatoms.CharacteristicsPhysical propertiesCadmium is a soft, malleable, ductile, bluish-white divalent metal. It is similar in many respects to zinc but forms complex compounds.() Unlike other metals, cadmium is resistant to corrosion and as a result it is used as a protective layer when deposited on other metals. As a bulk metal, cadmium is insoluble in water and is not  flammable; however, in its powdered form it may burn and release toxic fumes.()Chemical propertiesAlthough cadmium usually has an state of +2, it also exists in the +1 state. Cadmium and its congeners are not always considered transition metals, in that they do not have partly filled d or f electron shells in the elemental or common oxidation states.()Cadmium burns in air to form brown amorphous oxide (CdO); the crystalline form of this compound is a dark red which changes color when heated, similar to oxide. acid, acid and acid dissolve cadmium by forming chloride (CdCl2), sulfate (CdSO4), or nitrate (Cd(NO3)2). The oxidation state +1 can be reached by dissolving cadmium in a mixture of cadmium chloride and chloride, forming the Cd22+ cation, which is similar to the Hg22+ cation in chloride.(:Cd + CdCl2 + 2 AlCl3  Cd2AlCl42IsotopesNaturally occurring cadmium is composed of 8 isotopes. Two of them are naturally radioactive, and three are expected to decay but have not been experimentally confirmed to do so. The two natural radioactive isotopes are 113Cd (decay, half-life is 7.7  1015 years) and 116Cd (two-neutrino beta decay, half-life is 2.9  1019 years). The other three are 106Cd, 108Cd (both electron capture), and 114Cd (double beta decay); only lower limits on their half-life times have been set. At least three isotopes  110Cd, 111Cd, and 112Cd  are stable. Among the isotopes that do not occur naturally, the most long-lived are 109Cd with a half-life of 462.6 days, and 115Cd with a half-life of 53.46 hours. All of the remaining radioactive isotopes have half-lives that are less than 2.5 hours, and the majority of these have half-lives that are less than 5 minutes. Cadmium has 8 known states, with the most stable being 113mCd (t  14.1 years), 115mCd (t  44.6 days), and 117mCd (t  3.36 hours).()The known isotopes of cadmium range in mass from 94.950 u (95Cd) to 131.946 u (132Cd). For isotopes lighter than 112 u, the primary mode is capture and the dominant product is element 47 (silver). Heavier isotopes decay mostly through emission producing element 49 (indium).(One isotope of cadmium, 113Cd, absorbs neutrons with very high probability if they have an energy below the cadmium cut-off and transmits them otherwise. The cadmium cut-off is about 0.5 eV. Neutrons with energy below the cutoff are deemed slow neutrons, distinguishing them from intermediate and fast neutrons.()Cadmium is created via the long s-process in low-medium mass stars with masses of 0.6 to 10 solar masses, which lasts thousands of years. It requires a silver atom to capture a neutron and then undergo decay.()HistoryFile:Friedrich Strohmeyer.jpg|thumb|upright|left|StromeyerCadmium (Latin cadmia, Greek  meaning calamine, a cadmium-bearing mixture of minerals, which was named after the Greek mythological character,  Cadmus, the founder of Thebes) was discovered simultaneously in 1817 by Stromeyer() and Samuel Leberecht Hermann, both in Germany, as an impurity in zinc carbonate.( Stromeyer found the new element as an impurity in carbonate (calamine), and, for 100 years, Germany remained the only important producer of the metal. The metal was named after the Latin word for calamine, since the metal was found in this zinc compound. Stromeyer noted that some impure samples of calamine changed color when heated but pure calamine did not. He was persistent in studying these results and eventually isolated cadmium metal by roasting and reduction of the sulfide. The possibility to use cadmium yellow as pigment was recognized in the 1840s but the lack of cadmium limited this application.()()()Even though cadmium and its compounds may be toxic in certain forms and concentrations, the Pharmaceutical Codex from 1907 states that iodide was used as a medication to treat enlarged joints, scrofulous glands, and chilblains.()In 1927, the International Conference on Weights and Measures redefined the meter in terms of a red cadmium spectral line (1 m  1,553,164.13 wavelengths).() This definition has since been changed (see krypton).After the industrial scale production of cadmium started in the 1930s and 1940s, the major application of cadmium was the coating of iron and steel to prevent corrosion; in 1944, 62% and in 1956, 59% of the cadmium in the United States was for coating.(() In 1956, 24% of the cadmium used within the United States was used for the second application, which was for red, orange and yellow pigments based on sulfides and selenides of cadmium.( The stabilizing effect of cadmium-containing chemicals like the carboxylates cadmium laureate and cadmium stearate on PVC led to an increased use of those compounds in the 1970s and 1980s. The use of cadmium in applications such as pigments, coatings, stabilizers and alloys declined due to environmental and health regulations in the 1980s and 1990s; in 2006, only 7% of total cadmium consumption was used for plating and coating and only 10% was used for pigments.(The decrease in consumption in other applications was made up by a growing demand of cadmium in nickel-cadmium batteries, which accounted for 81% of the cadmium consumption in the United States in 2006.()OccurrenceCadmium  makes up about 0.1 ppm  of the crust. Compared with the more abundant zinc with 65 ppm cadmium is rare.() No significant deposits of cadmium-containing ores are known. Greenockite (CdS), the only cadmium mineral of importance, is nearly always associated with sphalerite (ZnS). This association is caused by the geochemical similarity between zinc and cadmium which makes geological separation unlikely. As a consequence, cadmium is produced mainly as a byproduct from mining, smelting, and refining sulfidic ores of zinc, and, to a lesser degree, lead and copper. Small amounts of cadmium, about 10% of consumption, are produced from secondary sources, mainly from dust generated by recycling iron and steel scrap. Production in the United States began in 1907,( but it was not until after World War I that cadmium came into wide use.()() One place where metallic cadmium can be found is the River basin in Siberia.()Rocks mined to produce phosphate fertilizers contain varying amounts of  cadmium, leading to a cadmium concentration of up to 300 mg/kg in the produced phosphate fertilizers and thus in the high cadmium content in agricultural soils.()() Coal can contain significant amounts of cadmium, which ends up mostly in the flue dust.()ProductionThe Geological Survey reports that in 2001, China was the top producer of cadmium, producing almost one-sixth of the world share, closely followed by South Korea and Japan.()Cadmium is a common impurity in zinc ores, and it is most often isolated during the production of zinc. Some zinc ores concentrates from sulfidic zinc ores contain up to 1.4% of cadmium.() In 1970s, the output of cadmium was 6.5 pounds per ton of zinc.( Zinc sulfide ores are roasted in the presence of oxygen, converting the zinc sulfide to the oxide. Zinc metal is produced either by smelting the oxide with carbon or by electrolysis in acid. Cadmium is isolated from the zinc metal by distillation if the zinc is smelted, or cadmium sulfate is precipitated out of the electrolysis solution.(()ApplicationsCadmium has many common industrial uses as it is a key component in battery production, is present in pigments,( coatings,( and is commonly used in electroplating.(BatteriesIn 2009, 86% of cadmium was used in batteries, predominantly in rechargeable nickel-cadmium batteries. Nickel-cadmium cells have a nominal cell potential of 1.2 V. The cell consists of a positive hydroxide electrode and a negative cadmium electrode plate separated by an alkaline electrolyte (hydroxide). The European Union banned the use of cadmium in electronics in 2004 with several exceptions but reduced the allowed content of cadmium in electronics to 0.002%.()ElectroplatingFile:CdSeqdots.jpg|thumb|A photograph and representative spectrum of photoluminescence from colloidal CdSe dots.Cadmium electroplating, consuming 6% of the global production,  can be found in the aircraft industry due to the ability to resist corrosion when applied to steel components.() This coating is passivated by the usage of chromate salts.() A limitation of cadmium plating is embrittlement of high-strength steels caused by the electroplating process. Therefore, steel parts heat-treated to tensile strength above 1300 MPa (200 ksi) should be coated by an alternative method (such as special low-embrittlement cadmium electroplating processes or physical vapor deposition). In addition, titanium embrittlement caused by cadmium-plated tool residues resulted in banishment of these tools (along with routine tool testing programs to detect any cadmium contamination) from the A-12/SR-71 and U-2 programs, and subsequent aircraft programs using titanium.()Nuclear fissionCadmium is used as a barrier to control neutrons in fission.( The water reactor designed by Electric Company uses an alloy consisting of 80% silver, 15% indium, and 5% cadmium.(Compoundsand Wear Metro train 4001 at Pelaw 01.jpg|thumb|Train painted with cadmium orangeoxide is used in black and white television phosphors and in the blue and green phosphors for color television picture tubes.() sulfide (CdS) is used as a photoconductive surface coating for photocopier drums.()In paint pigments, cadmium forms various salts, with CdS being the most common. This sulfide is used as a yellow pigment. selenide can be used as red pigment, commonly called cadmium red. To painters who work with the pigment, cadmium yellows, oranges, and reds are the most brilliant and long-lasting colors to use. In fact, during production, these colors are significantly toned down before they are ground with oils and binders, or blended into watercolors, gouaches, acrylics, and other paint and pigment formulations. Since these pigments are potentially toxic, it is recommended to use a cream on the hands to prevent absorption through the skin when working with them() even though the amount of cadmium absorbed into the body through the skin is usually reported to be less than 1%.(In PVC, cadmium was used as heat, light, and weathering stabilizers.(() Currently, cadmium stabilizers have been completely replaced with barium-zinc, calcium-zinc and organo-tin stabilizers. Cadmium is used in many kinds of solder and bearing alloys, due to a low of friction and fatigue resistance.( It is also found in some of the lowest-melting alloys, such as metal.()Laboratory usesFile:HeCd laser.jpg|thumb|Violet light from a helium cadmium metal vapor laser. The highly monochromatic color arises from the 441.563 nm transition line of cadmium.Heliumcadmium lasers are a common source of blue-ultraviolet laser light. They operate at either 325 or 422 nm and are used in microscopes and various laboratory experiments.()() Cadmium selenide dots emit bright luminescence under UV excitation (He-Cd laser, for example). The color of this luminescence can be green, yellow or red depending on the particle size. Colloidal solutions of those particles are used for imaging of biological tissues and solutions with a microscope.()Cadmium is a component of some compound semiconductors, such as cadmium sulfide, cadmium selenide, and telluride, which can be used for light detection or cells. HgCdTe is sensitive to infrared( light and therefore may be utilized as an infrared detector or switch for example in remote control devices.In molecular biology, cadmium is used to block voltage-dependent calcium channels from fluxing calcium ions, as well as in hypoxia research to stimulate proteasome-dependent degradation of Hif-1.()Biological roleCadmium has no known useful role in higher organisms.(C.Michael Hogan. 2010. Heavy metal. Encyclopedia of Earth. National Council for Science and the Environment. eds E.Monosson & C.Cleveland. Washington DC.) A role for cadmium in lower life-forms has recently been found. A cadmium-dependent anhydrase has been found in marine diatoms. Cadmium performs the same function as zinc in other anhydrases, but the diatoms live in environments with very low zinc concentrations and thus they utilize cadmium to perform functions normally carried out by zinc. The discovery relied on the use of X-ray absorption fluorescence spectroscopy (XAFS).()The highest concentration of cadmium has been found to be absorbed in the kidneys of humans, and up to about 30 mg of cadmium is commonly inhaled throughout childhood and adolescence.()()Cadmium can be used to block calcium channels in chicken neurons.()SafetyThe most dangerous form of occupational exposure to cadmium is inhalation of fine dust and fumes, or ingestion of highly soluble cadmium compounds.( Inhalation of cadmium-containing fumes can result initially in fume fever but may progress to chemical pneumonitis, edema, and death.()Cadmium is also an environmental hazard. Human exposures to environmental cadmium are primarily the result of fossil fuel combustion, phosphate fertilizers, natural sources, iron and steel production, cement production and related activities, nonferrous metals production, and municipal solid waste incineration.( However, there have been a few instances of general population toxicity as the result of long-term exposure to cadmium in contaminated food and water. In the decades leading up to War II, Japanese mining operations contaminated the River with cadmium and traces of other toxic metals. As a consequence, cadmium accumulated in the rice crops growing along the riverbanks downstream of the mines. Some members of the local agricultural communities consuming the contaminated rice developed itai-itai disease and renal abnormalities, including proteinuria and glucosuria.()File:Jinzu River.jpg|right|thumb|River area, which was contaminated with cadmiumThe victims of this poisoning were almost exclusively post-menopausal women with low iron and other mineral body stores. Similar general population cadmium exposures in other parts of the world have not resulted in the same health problems because the populations maintained sufficient iron and other mineral levels. Thus, while cadmium is a major factor in the itai-itai disease in Japan, most researchers have concluded that it was one of several factors.( Cadmium is one of six substances banned by the European Unions Restriction on Hazardous Substances (RoHS) directive, which bans certain hazardous substances in electrical and electronic equipment but allows for certain exemptions and exclusions from the scope of the law.()Although some studies linked exposure to cadmium with lung and prostate cancer, there is still a substantial controversy about the carcinogenicity of cadmium. More recent studies suggest that arsenic rather than cadmium may lead to the increased lung cancer mortality rates. Furthermore, most data regarding the carcinogenicity of cadmium rely on research confounded by the presence of other carcinogenic substances.( Tobacco smoking is the most important single source of cadmium exposure in the general population. It has been estimated that about 10% of the cadmium content of a cigarette is inhaled through smoking. The absorption of cadmium from the lungs is much more effective than that from the gut, and as much as 50% of the cadmium inhaled via cigarette smoke may be absorbed.()On average, smokers have 45 times higher blood cadmium concentrations and 23 times higher kidney cadmium concentrations than non-smokers. Despite the high cadmium content in cigarette smoke, there seems to be little exposure to cadmium from smoking. No significant effect on blood cadmium concentrations has been detected in children exposed to environmental tobacco smoke.()Cadmium exposure is a risk factor associated with early atheroslcerosis and hypertension, which can both lead to cardiovascular disease.(Cadmium Exposure can Induce Early Atherosclerotic Changes, Medinews Direct, 7 September 2009)RegulationsDue to the adverse effects on the environment and human health, the supply and use of cadmium is restricted in Europe under the REACH Regulation.(EUR-Lex. Eur-lex.europa.eu (April 18, 2011). Retrieved on June 5, 2011.)Product recallsIn May 2006, a sale of the seats from F.C.s old stadium, Highbury in London, England was cancelled after the seats were discovered to contain trace amounts of cadmium.() Reports of high levels of cadmium use in childrens jewelry in 2010 led to a US Product Safety Commission investigation.() The U.S. CPSC issued specific recall notices for cadmium content applying to jewelry sold by Claires() and Wal-Mart() stores. In June 2010 McDonalds voluntarily recalled more than 12 million promotional Shrek Forever After 3D Collectable Drinking Glasses due to concerns over cadmium levels in paint pigments used on the glassware.() The glasses were manufactured by International, of NJ, USA.()See also*pigments*tellurideReferencesExternal links*ATSDR Case Studies in Environmental Medicine: Cadmium Toxicity U.S. of Health and Human Services*Agency for Toxic Substances and Disease Registrys (ATSDR) Toxicological Profile for Cadmium*European Union Risk Assessment Reports on Cadmium Metal and Cadmium Oxide*National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health  Cadmium Page*NLM Hazardous Substances Databank  Cadmium, Elementalaf:Kadmiumar:an:Cadmioaz:Kadmiumbn:be:bs:Kadmijumbg:ca:Cadmicv:cs:Kadmiumco:Cadmiucy:Cadmiwmda:Cadmiumde:Cadmiumet:Kaadmiumel:es:Cadmioeo:Kadmioeu:Kadmiofa:hif:Cadmiumfr:Cadmiumfur:Cadmiga:Caidmiamgv:Cadmiumgl:Cadmiohak:Kakxal:ko:hy:hi:hr:Kadmijio:Kadmioid:Kadmiumis:Kadmnit:Cadmiohe:jv:Kadmiumkn:sw:Cadimikv:ht:Kadmymku:Kadmiymla:Cadmiumlv:Kadmijslb:Cadmiumlt:Kadmislij:Cadmiojbo:jinmrkadmuhu:Kadmiummk:ml:mr:ms:Kadmiummrj:nl:Cadmiumja:no:Kadmiumnn:Kadmiumoc:Cadmiuz:Kadmiypnb:nds:Cadmiumpl:Kadmpt:Cdmioro:Cadmiuqu:Kadmiyuru:stq:Cadmiumsq:Kadmiumiscn:Cadmiusimple:Cadmiumsk:Kadmiumsl:Kadmijsr:sh:Kadmijumfi:Kadmiumsv:Kadmiumta:th:tr:Kadmiyumuk:vi:Cadmiwar:Cadmyoyi:yo:Cadmiumzh-yue:zh:
